
A A DMINISTRATIVE REGULATIONS
A 1 C OMPETITION OVERVIEW
A1.1 Competition Objective
A1.1.1 The competition challenges teams of university students to conceive, design, fabricate,
develop and compete with small, formula style, race cars.
A1.2 Competition Procedure
A1.2.1 The competition is split into the following classes:
-Internal Combustion Engine Vehicle (CV) including Combustion Hybrid Vehicle (HY)
- Electric Vehicle (EV)
A1.2.2 All vehicles must meet the requirements defined in chapters T and either EV or CV, depend-
ing on their drivetrain type.
A1.2.3 The competition starts with a series of technical inspections described in chapter IN to check
the vehicle for safety and compliance with the rules.
A1.2.4 The competition is divided into a series of static and dynamic events described in chapters S
and D.
A1.2.5 The achievable points in each class are listed in table 3.
A1.2.6 Vehicles of both classes can take part in an additional Driverless Cup (DC).
A1.2.7 The maximum achievable points for the DC are listed in table 3.
A1.2.8 The team with the most overall points will win the competition for its class or the DC,
respectively.
A1.3 Competition Information
A1.3.1 The competition specific rules and information are defined in the competition handbook.
A1.3.2 The official language of the competition is English.
A1.3.3 Every organizer of a competition based on this document bears the sole responsibility.
A2 Vehicle Eligibility
CV & EV DC
Static Events:
Business Plan Presentation 75 points -
Cost and Manufacturing 100 points -
Engineering Design 150 points 150 points
Dynamic Events:
Skidpad 50 points -
Driverless (DV) Skidpad 75 points 75 points
Acceleration 50 points -
Driverless (DV) Acceleration 75 points 75 points
Autocross 100 points -
Driverless (DV) Autocross - 100 points
Endurance 250 points -
Efficiency 75 points -
Trackdrive - 200 points
Overall 1000 points 600 points
Table 3: Maximum points awarded
A 2 V EHICLE ELIGIBILITY
A2.1 Student Competition
A2.1.1 Vehicles entered into the competition must be conceived, designed and maintained by the
student team members without direct involvement from external professional engineers,
racers, machinists or related professionals.
A2.1.2 The student team may use any information from professionals or from academics as long as
the information is given as a discussion of alternatives with their pros and cons.
A2.1.3 Professionals must not make design decisions or drawings.
A2.1.4 Students should perform fabrication tasks where ever possible.
A2.2 First Year Vehicles
A2.2.1 A vehicle may only be used for one year, counting from the first day onsite of its first
competition.
A2.2.2 To be classified as new, a vehicle must have a newly manufactured chassis.
A2.2.3 In the following cases, the existing chassis may be used for one more consecutive year:
- Changing the powertrain from CV →EV or CV →HY or HY →EV
- Initial implementation of an Autonomous System, see T14
The team must inform the officials ahead of time if they intend to use this exception.
A3 Rules of Conduct
A 3 R ULES OF CONDUCT
A3.1 General Officials Authority
A3.1.1 The officials reserve the right to revise the schedule of the competition and/or interpret or
modify the competition rules at any time and in any manner that is, in their sole judgment,
required for safe and efficient operation.
A3.1.2 All team members are required to cooperate with, and follow all instructions from the
officials.
A3.1.3 Official announcements are considered part of these rules.
A3.1.4 All guidelines and clarifications posted in the “Rules and Important Documents” sections
on the competition website for the current season including the competition handbook are
considered part of these rules.
A3.2 Official Instructions
A3.2.1 Failure of a team member to follow an instruction or command directed specifically to that
team or team member results in 25 penaltypoints being deducted from the team’s overall
score.
A3.3 Arguments with Officials
A3.3.1 Argument with, or disobedience to, any official results in the team being eliminated from the
competition.
A3.4 Unsportsmanlike Conduct
A3.4.1 In the event of unsportsmanlike conduct, 25 penaltypoints will be deducted from the team’s
overall score. A second violation results in expulsion of the team from the competition.
A3.5 Violations of Intent
A3.5.1 Violation of the intent of a rule will be considered a violation of the rule itself.
A3.5.2 Any parts, devices or software fragments designed with the intent to violate a rule, will be
considered as a violation.
A3.6 Questions about the Rules
A3.6.1 Questions about the rules may be asked to the officials.
A3.6.2 The frequently asked questions (FAQ) section on the competition website must be checked
before submitting a question.
A3.6.3 The officials will only answer questions that are not already answered in the rules or FAQs
or that require new or novel interpretation.
A4 General Requirements for Teams & Participants
A3.6.4 Refer to the competition website for specific directions how to submit a rules question.
A3.7 Protests
A3.7.1 A team may protest any rule interpretation, score or official action which they feel has caused
some actual, non-trivial, harm to their team, or has had a substantive effect on their score.
A3.7.2 All protests must be submitted in writing as defined in the competition handbook by the team
captain within the announced protest period. In order to have a protest considered, a team
must post a 25 point protest bond which will be forfeited if their protest is rejected.
A3.7.3 The decision of the officials regarding any protest will be in a written form and is final.
A3.8 Penalties
A3.8.1 Rule violations result in at least 20 penalty points, unless explicitly defined otherwise. The
penalty points will be deducted from the team’s overall score.
A3.8.2 Overall penalties apply to CV, EV and DC score, except for penalties concerning events
which are not part of the respective class or cup.
A 4 G ENERAL REQUIREMENTS FOR TEAMS & P ARTICIPANTS
A4.1 Teams per University
A4.1.1 A university can register one CV team and one EV team which both can take part in the DC.
A4.1.2 For the purposes of registering and competing, a university’s CV team and EV team are
considered to be separate and independent entities.
A4.1.3 Teams which are formed with members from two or more universities are treated as a single
team.
A4.2 Team Members and Participants
A4.2.1 Each participant must provide proof of valid private liability & individual health insurance
for the competition.
A4.2.2 All onsite participants must sign a liability waiver upon registering onsite which can be found
on the competition website.
A4.2.3 A team member may only be part of one team, work on one vehicle and take part in static
and dynamic events for only one team.
A4.2.4 Each team must have one team member identified as the team captain. The team captain is
the main contact person for the officials during the registration process and the competition.
A4.2.5 Persons who have previously attended any official event as a judge are not allowed to
participate as team members.
A4 General Requirements for Teams & Participants
A4.2.6 Team members must be enrolled as degree seeking undergraduate or graduate students in
any university. Team members who have graduated within the seven month period before the
competition remain eligible to participate.
A4.2.7 Students seeking a PhD degree/PhD students or equivalent are not allowed to participate.
A4.2.8 Counting from the year of their first competition, team members can only participate for four
additional full years. First competition is defined as the first registration of a team member
for a competition by the team captain, irrespective if the team or the team member actually
physically participated.
A4.2.9 Team members must be at least 18 years of age.
A4.2.10 Team members who will drive a competition vehicle at any time during a competition
must present a valid, government issued driver’s license for passenger cars, containing a
photograph.
A4.3 [EV ONLY ] Electrical System Officer
A4.3.1 Every participating team has to appoint one to four ESOs for the competition.
A4.3.2 The ESOs are responsible for all electrical work carried out on the vehicle during the
competition.
A4.3.3 The ESOs are the only persons in the team who may declare the vehicle electrically safe, in
order for work to be performed on any system of the vehicle by the team.
A4.3.4 The ESOs must be valid team members, i.e. they must have student status, see A4.2.6.
A4.3.5 The ESOs must be contactable by phone at all times during the competition.
A4.3.6 An ESO must accompany the vehicle whenever it is operated or moved around at the
competition site.
A4.3.7 If only one ESO is named by the team, this ESO must not be a driver.
A4.3.8 An appropriate Electrical System Officer Qualification (ESOQ) requires the proof of a
practical and theoretical training for working on the TS. Regarding content, the training
should be on the basis of DGUV 209-093 stage 2E/3E1and held by an external expert.
A4.4 Autonomous System Responsible
A4.4.1 To operate the Autonomous System (AS), the participating team must appoint at least one
ASR for the competition. This person is responsible for all autonomous operations of the
vehicle during the competition which includes any work on the AS as well as racing and
testing.
A4.4.2 For vehicles with an electric drivetrain the ASR must fulfill A4.3 and therefore replaces
the ESO. The team may register additional ESOs for accumulator inspection and work on
Tractive System (TS) only. The sum of registered ASRs and ESOs must not exceed four
persons.
1https://fsg.one/4i5SP
A5 Documentation & Deadlines
A4.4.3 The ASR is the only person in the team who is allowed to declare the AS safe, so that the
vehicle may be operated in manual or autonomous mode.
A4.4.4 The ASR must be a valid team member, i.e. they must have student status, see A4.2.6.
A4.4.5 The ASR must accompany the vehicle whenever it is operated or moved around at the
competition site.
A4.4.6 If only one ASR is named by the team, this ASR must not be a driver.
A4.4.7 The ASR must be properly qualified to handle the AS and to understand and deal with
problems and failures. As ASR Qualification (ASRQ), a bachelor degree in computer
science, electrical engineering, mechatronics, automation engineering, robotics or similar,
i.e. comparable study content or progress, is a sufficient qualification. The qualification
certificate needs to be an official university document and contain information on completed
courses.
A 5 D OCUMENTATION & D EADLINES
A5.1 Required Documents and Forms
A5.1.1 Several documents and forms must be submitted by the action deadlines defined in the
competition handbook.
A5.2 Submission
A5.2.1 Submitted documents may only be viewed by members of the submitting team, authorized
judges and officials.
A5.2.2 By submitting documents via the competition website, the team agrees that they may
be reproduced and distributed by the officials, in both complete and edited versions, for
educational purpose.
A5.2.3 Documents or videos that are largely incomplete or not readable/viewable will be considered
as not submitted.
A5.3 Correction Requests
A5.3.1 If the officials request a correction for a document, the corrected version has to be submitted
within 168 hours (7 days) following the request.
A5.3.2 Corrections requested before the initial deadline are treated as if they were requested at the
initial deadline.
A5.3.3 Separate requests for different parts within one document or form will be treated indepen-
dently.
A5.3.4 If the corrected version of the document does not completely contain all requested corrections,
the team will be de-registered from the competition.
A5 Documentation & Deadlines
A5.4 Late Submission or Non-Submission
A5.4.1 For each submission later than the respective deadline 10 penaltypoints are deducted from
the team’s overall score.
A5.4.2 Teams that do not submit documents until 24hours ( 1day) after the respective deadline will
be de-registered from the competition.
A5.5 De-registration
A5.5.1 A team which is de-registered from the competition has a single chance to apply for a place
on the waiting list.
A5.5.2 To apply, the team must complete the following within 24hours after the de-registration
notification
- Submit an informal application to the officials
- Correct the reason for de-registration (e.g. submission of a document)
A5.5.3 If the application is positively confirmed by the officials, the team will:
- Be placed at the end of the waiting list.
- Receive 20 penalty points.
A5.5.4 Applications will be declined if the rework is inadequate or de-registration was caused by
misbehavior of the team.
A5.6 Vehicle Status Video
A5.6.1 All teams must submit a video showing the vehicle driving in manual mode before the
competition. The video must be submitted before the deadline specified in the competition
handbook.
A5.6.2 [DC ONLY ]The vehicle must instead drive in autonomous mode. No manual mode VSV is
necessary.
A5.6.3 The video must show the following sequences in the described order:
- Standing still
- 360◦video around the vehicle (close up, may overlap with the following two bullet
points)
- [CV ONLY ] Start engine / [EV ONLY ] Activate TS
-Straight driving, minimum distance is 30 m , minimum speed is 10km/hfor manual
mode
- Full stop (not needed for autonomous mode VSV)
- 180◦cornering
- Straight driving back to start point, minimum speed is 10km/hfor manual mode
-[DC ONLY ]At the end of the VSV, the vehicle must be stopped by an emergency
brake maneuver, see T15.
A5 Documentation & Deadlines
- Standing still, [CV ONLY ] engine off / [EV ONLY ] TS deactivated
A5.6.4 The video must fulfill the following criteria:
- Continuous video from a third person view - no assembled sequences
-Vehicle must be clearly visible (light, video resolution, landscape mode, frames and
frequency)
- Vehicle must run under its own power
- Driving must follow A6.3.4
- Vehicle must be presented in ready-to-race conditions incl. body work
-No crossing in front of the vehicle after [EV ONLY ]TS activated / [CV ONLY ]engine
started
-[EV ONLY ]Tractive System Active Light (TSAL), [DC ONLY ]Autonomous System
Status Indicator (ASSI), and brake light, must be clearly visible in the video
- [EV ONLY ] Ready-to-drive (R2D) sound must be audible in the video
-[DC ONLY ]In addition to the third person view, an onboard view and a visualization
of the vehicle’s environment perception and path planning must be shown in split
screen. All parts must be time synchronized.
- Must not exceed a length of 60 seconds.
A5.6.5 If a team fails only the [DC ONLY ] part, it will only be de-registered from the DC.
A5.6.6 A team which uploads a VSV with a previous year vehicle will be de-registered from the
competition.
A5.7 SES Approval
A5.7.1 Teams using a monocoque must submit a SESA as one document, in addition to the SES
deadline. The SESA template will be available on the competition website.
A5.7.2 The Structural Equivalency Spreadsheet (SES) must be checked and approved by a graduated
engineer with appropriate expertise.
A5.7.3 Once the SES has been approved, the SESA form should be filled out, signed and submitted
until the SESA deadline.
A5.7.4 If any changes to the original SES become necessary due to the approval process, the updated
final SES must be submitted again on the competition website.
A5.7.5 The changelog with details of all changes made from the “Version History” tab of the SES
form must be attached to the SESA document and must also be signed by the SES reviewer.
A5.7.6 The officials will randomly double check submitted SESA with their respective submitted
SES.
A6 General Rules
A 6 G ENERAL RULES
A6.1 Removing the Vehicle from the Site
A6.1.1 Teams who remove their vehicle ( [EV ONLY ]or TS accumulator) from the competition site
after the competition has begun will be disqualified from the competition.
A6.2 Forfeit for Non-Appearance
A6.2.1 It is the responsibility of each team to be in the right place at the right time.
A6.2.2 If a team is not present and ready to compete at the scheduled time, they forfeit their attempt
at that event.
A6.3 Testing and Work Safety
A6.3.1 Competition organizers are not responsible for the use of the vehicles outside of their
competition.
A6.3.2 The competition officials disassociate themselves from all activities of the teams besides
their own competition and associated events.
A6.3.3 All teams are advised to follow common practices and common sense when working on the
vehicle and when operating the vehicle, before, during and after a competition.
A6.3.4 The following listed requirements are considered the minimum for a testing/operating
environment to qualify as safe. Following these guidelines does not guarantee safety under
all circumstances:
- Driver wearing full protection gear according to T13.3
-Working AMS, APPS, ASSI, BSPD, EBS, ETC plausibility check, IMD, RES and
TSAL if applicable
- Rules compliant chassis and mounted Impact Attenuator (IA)
-No other passenger cars, trucks etc. being parked or driven on the same premise at the
same time, unless the areas are clearly separated
- No running under low visibility conditions
- No running at speeds above typical event speeds
-No running in areas where crashing into obstacles at the height of the driver’s head is
possible, such that parts of the vehicle may pass below an obstacle, but the driver’s
head can be trapped between the obstacle and the main hoop for example
A6.3.5 Organizers reserve the right to disqualify a team registered for their competition in case of
unsafe driving behavior, especially if the reputation of the competition, sponsors and other
teams is compromised. Examples of what could be seen as “unsafe driving behaviour” are
wheel-to-wheel racing or racing in unsuitable events, e.g. hill climb races or drag races,
depending on the respective circumstances.
A6 General Rules
A6.4 Onsite Working Safety
A6.4.1 Everyone in the dynamic area and everybody working on the vehicle must wear appropriate,
closed-toed shoes.
A6.4.2 Appropriate personal protective equipment must be used.
A6.4.3 Any operation producing litter or debris, e.g. cutting of carbon fiber, should not be performed
in the pits.
A6.4.4 When jacking up the vehicle a safe and stable support device rated for the load must be used.
A6.5 Alcohol, Drugs and Illegal Material
A6.5.1 The use of alcohol or any other drug is strictly prohibited on the competition site. If any team
member is tested with an alcohol level higher than 0 .0 ‰ or positive for drugs, they will be
disqualified for the rest of the competition immediately. A second team member being found
to have an alcohol level higher than 0.0 ‰ or positive for drugs results in the entire team
being disqualified immediately.
A6.5.2 Weapons or other illegal material are prohibited on the competition site.
A6.6 Vehicle Movement
A6.6.1 Vehicles must not move under their own power anywhere other than on the practice or
competition tracks.
A6.6.2 [EV ONLY ]The detachable handle or key of the Tractive System Master Switch (TSMS)
must be completely removed and kept by an ESO. The lockout/tagout function of the TSMS,
see EV6.2.2, must be used.
A6.6.3 For vehicles with an AS, the detachable handle or key of the Autonomous System Master
Switch (ASMS) must be completely removed and kept by an ASR. The lockout/tagout
function of the ASMS, see T14.5.8, must be used.
A6.6.4 Vehicles must be pushed at a normal walking pace by means of a “push bar”, see T13.1,
and with a team member in the cockpit wearing the required driver equipment as defined in
T13.3 except for helmet, arm restraints and balaclava.
A6.6.5 The team member in the cockpit must have full control of steering and braking.
A6.6.6 When the push bar is attached to the vehicle, the engine/TS must remain switched off.
A6.6.7 Vehicles with wings are required to have two team members walking on either side of the
front wing whenever the vehicle is being pushed.
A6.7 [CV ONLY ] Engine Running
A6.7.1 Running engines is not allowed in the pits.
A6.7.2 Engine running and hybrid system activation is allowed in the engine test area and in the
dynamic area, when the following conditions are met:
A6 General Rules
- The vehicle must have passed mechanical inspection.
- The vehicle must be jacked using the jacks, see T13.2.
-A driver, wearing required driver equipment, see T13.3, must be seated in the cockpit.
- A fire extinguisher must be immediately available.
- Driven wheels can only remain fitted to the vehicle if they will not rotate.
- No one is allowed under the vehicle while the engine is running.
A6.7.3 Cranking engines in the pits is allowed, when the following conditions are met:
- The vehicle has passed mechanical inspection.
- The driven axles are securely jacked up.
- Gearbox is in neutral.
- All driven wheels are removed.
- Connectors to all injectors and ignition coils are detached.
- A fire extinguisher must be placed next to the engine.
A6.8 Fueling and Hazardous Waste
A6.8.1 Fueling may only take place at the official fuel station.
A6.8.2 Open fuel containers are not allowed at the competition.
A6.8.3 Disposal procedures for hazardous waste, like oil and battery cells, are defined in the
competition handbook.
A6.9 [EV ONLY ] Working on the Vehicle
A6.9.1 All activities require the TSAL to be green.
A6.9.2 A prominent manual sign indicating the “TSAL green” state must be present whenever the
LVS is switched off and the requirements for an only green TSAL according to EV4 .10 are
met.
A6.9.3 All activities on the vehicle, except when working on an active TS, require the High V oltage
Disconnect (HVD) to be removed.
A6.10 [EV ONLY ] Working on the Tractive System
A6.10.1 Activities on the TS, except for the accumulator, see A6.11, must take place in the pit.
A6.10.2 All activities require the attendance of the ESO.
A6.10.3 For activities on the inactive TS, the following procedure must be carried out:
-The vehicle must be barred from anyone not involved in the work, by using barrier
tape.
- The Tractive System Master Switch (TSMS) must be switched off.
A6 General Rules
-It must be assured that the TS cannot be activated by, at a minimum, using the
lockout/tag out of the TSMS.
- A check for zero-potential must be carried out.
-A sign that declares the vehicle is electrically safe must be installed. The name of the
ESO who is supervising the activities must be noted on the sign. This ESO is the only
person who may remove the sign and the barrier.
A6.10.4 In case of measurements on the active TS or an activation of the TS in the pit for testing
purposes, the following steps must be followed:
-The vehicle must be barred from anyone not involved in the work, by using barrier
tape.
- The vehicle must be jacked up and the driven wheels removed.
- One team member must be prepared to push a shutdown button at any time.
- The TS must only be activated for as long as necessary.
- Appropriate insulated tools and equipment must be used.
-Safety glasses with side shields and compliant safety gloves must be worn by all
participating team members when parts of the TS are exposed.
- No other work on the vehicle is allowed when the TS is active.
A6.10.5 If the TSAL is flashing red or malfunctioning, the TS is considered as active.
A6.10.6 There must be at least one team member present, who is not directly involved in the work,
but who could assist in case of an incident.
A6.11 [EV ONLY ] Working on Tractive System Accumulators
A6.11.1 Opening or working on Tractive System Accumulator Containers (TSACs) is only allowed
in the provided work places in the charging area, see A6.12.
A6.11.2 All activities require the attendance of an ESO.
A6.11.3 Whenever the TSACs are opened, the cell segments must be separated with the maintenance
plugs, see EV5.4.4.
A6.11.4 Appropriate insulated tools and equipment must be used.
A6.11.5 Safety glasses with side shields and compliant safety gloves must be worn by all participating
team members.
A6.11.6 There must be at least one team member present, who is not directly involved in the work
conducted on the accumulator, but who could assist in case of an incident.
A6.11.7 Moving accumulator cells and/or accumulator segment(s) around at the competition site is
only allowed if they are inside a completely closed TSAC.
A6.11.8 All parts and modules of the TSAC that are not currently being worked on must be covered
at least according to IPxxB while working on the accumulator container.
A6 General Rules
A6.12 [EV ONLY ] Charging
A6.12.1 There will be a separated charging area on the competition site. Charging TS accumulators
is only allowed inside this area.
A6.12.2 Accumulators must be removed from the vehicle and placed on the TSAC hand cart, see
EV8.1, for charging.
A6.12.3 No grinding, drilling, etc. is allowed in the charging area.
A6.12.4 At least one team member who has knowledge of the charging process must stay with the
accumulator(s) during charging.

T G ENERAL TECHNICAL
REQUIREMENTS
T 1 D EFINITIONS
T1.1 Chassis Definitions
T1.1.1 Chassis – the fabricated structural assembly that supports all functional vehicle systems. This
assembly may be a single welded structure, multiple welded structures or a combination of
composite and welded structures.
T1.1.2 Bodywork – the outermost surface of the chassis or any fairing parts and covers.
T1.1.3 Cockpit – the volume which accommodates the driver which is defined by the top of the
vehicle, the floor closeout, the inner side of the bodywork, the front bulkhead and the firewall.
T1.1.4 Chassis member – a minimum representative single piece of uncut, continuous tubing or
equivalent structure.
T1.1.5 Front bulkhead – a planar structure that defines the forward plane of the chassis and provides
protection for the driver’s feet (in front view, together with the Anti Intrusion Plate (AIP),
covers the driver’s feet).
T1.1.6 Front bulkhead support – a structure that defines the side of the chassis from the front
bulkhead back to the top of the upper side impact structure and the bottom of the front hoop.
T1.1.7 Front hoop – a roll bar located above the driver’s legs, in proximity to the steering wheel.
T1.1.8 Impact Attenuator (IA) – a deformable, energy absorbing device located forward of the front
bulkhead.
T1.1.9 Main hoop – a roll bar located alongside or just behind the driver’s torso.
T1.1.10 Monocoque – a chassis made of composite material.
T1.1.11 Node-to-node triangulation – an arrangement of chassis members projected onto a plane,
where a co-planar load applied in any direction, at any node, results in only tensile or
compressive forces in the chassis members as shown in figure 1.
T1.1.12 Primary structure – the primary structure is comprised of the following components:
- Main hoop
- Front hoop
- Roll hoop braces and supports
- Impact structures as mentioned under T3.14
- Anti Intrusion Plate
T1 Definitions
Figure 1: Node-to-node triangulation of chassis members (left correct and right incorrect).
- Front bulkhead
- Front bulkhead support system
-All chassis members, guides and supports that transfer load from the driver’s restraint
system into the above mentioned components of the primary structure
T1.1.13 Roll hoops – both the front hoop and the main hoop are classified as “roll hoops”
T1.1.14 Roll hoop bracing – the structure from a roll hoop to the roll hoop bracing support.
T1.1.15 Roll hoop bracing supports – the structure from the lower end of the roll hoop bracing back
to the roll hoop(s).
T1.1.16 Rollover protection envelope – the union of
-the primary structure and any additional structures fixed to the primary structure which
meet the minimum specification defined in T3.2 or equivalent
- the plane from the top of the main hoop to the top of the front hoop
-the plane from the top of the main hoop to the rearmost structure according to T3.2 or
equivalent
Example depicted in figure 2.
T1.1.17 Side impact structure – the area of the side of the chassis between the front hoop and the
main hoop and from the chassis floor to the height as required in T3.14 above the lowest
inside chassis point between front hoop and main hoop.
T1.1.18 Surface envelope – the surface envelope is the surface of the union of the rollover protection
envelope, see T1.1.16, and the volume defined by
- the top of the main hoop and the outside edges of the four tires
- a plane from the top of the main hoop to the top of the front bulkhead
-a plane from the top of the main hoop to the the rearmost structure according to T3.2
or equivalent
- a projection in side view of the lower boundaries of the rollover protection envelope
Example depicted in figure 3.
T1 Definitions
Figure 2: Rollover protection envelope T1.1.16, thick lines are primary structure members
according to T3.2
Figure 3: Surface Envelope T1.1.18
T1.2 Material Definitions
T1.2.1 Fire Retardant – a material meeting one of the following standards:
- UL94 V-0 for the minimum used material thickness
- FAR 25.853(a)(1)(i)
- For foams only: UL94 HF-1 and UL94 VTM-0
Equivalent standards are only accepted, if the team shows equivalence and this is approved
by the officials before the event.
T1.2.2 Coolant – a substance used for heat transfer by convection.
T1.3 Electrical Definitions
T1.3.1 Direct Connection – two devices or circuits are directly connected if the connection is not
routed through any common PCB and does not include any devices or functionality other
than overcurrent protection or connectors.
T1.4 Driving Mode Definitions
T1.4.1 Manual Mode – a vehicle is in manual mode when driven by a human driver. In this case the
ASMS must be off (AS deactivated).
T1.4.2 Autonomous Mode – a vehicle is in autonomous mode when the AS is activated. When a
vehicle is in autonomous mode, there must be no person inside the vehicle.
T2 General Design Requirements
T 2 G ENERAL DESIGN REQUIREMENTS
T2.1 Vehicle Configuration
T2.1.1 The vehicle must be designed and fabricated in accordance with good engineering practices.
T2.1.2 The vehicle must be open-wheeled, single seat and open cockpit (a formula style body) with
four wheels that are not in a straight line.
T2.1.3 Open wheel vehicles must satisfy the following, see also figure 4:
- The wheel/tire assembly must be unobstructed when viewed from the side.
-No part of the vehicle may enter a keep-out-zone defined by two lines extending
vertically from positions 75 mm in front of and 75 mm behind the outer diameter of
the front and rear tires in the side view of the vehicle, with steering straight ahead.
This keep-out zone extends laterally from the outside plane of the wheel/tire to the
inboard plane of the wheel/tire assembly.
75 mm 75 mm 75 mm 75 mm
No Parts allowed 
in this Area
View on this Surface 
must be unobstructed
Figure 4: Keep-out-zones for the definition of an open-wheeled vehicle.
T2.2 Ground Clearance
T2.2.1 The minimum static ground clearance of any portion of the vehicle, other than the tires,
including a driver, must be 30 mm . If an active suspension system is installed, the static
ground clearance is measured in the lowest adjustable position.
T2.2.2 Sliding skirts or other aerodynamic devices that by design, fabrication or as a consequence
of moving, contact the track surface are prohibited.
T2 General Design Requirements
T2.3 Bodywork
T2.3.1 There must be no openings through the bodywork into the cockpit other than that required
for the cockpit opening. Minimal openings around the front suspension and steering system
components are allowed.
T2.3.2 In any side view in front of the cockpit opening and outside the area defined in T8.2 all
parts of the bodywork must have no external concave radii of curvatures. Any gaps between
bodywork and other parts must be reduced to a minimum.
T2.3.3 Enclosed chassis structures and structures between the chassis and the ground must have
two venting holes of at least 25 mm diameter in the lowest part of the structure to prevent
accumulation of liquids. Additional holes are required when multiple local lowest parts exist
in the structure.
T2.3.4 The bodywork in front of the front wheels with the tangent of surface above 45◦relative to
the forward direction must have a radius of at least 38 mm along the top, sides and bottom of
all affected edges.
T2.4 Minimum Edge Radii of Bodywork and Aerodynamic Devices
T2.4.1 For all edges that could come into contact with any standing pedestrian without reaching to
the vehicle, the minimum radius of the bodywork and aerodynamic devices is 3 mm for all
forward facing edges and 1 mm for all other edges.
T2.5 Suspension
T2.5.1 The vehicle must be equipped with fully operational front and rear suspension systems
including shock absorbers and a usable wheel travel of at least 50 mm and a minimum jounce
of 25 mm with driver seated.
T2.5.2 All suspension mounting points must be visible at technical inspection, either by direct view
or by removing any covers.
T2.6 Wheels
T2.6.1 Any wheel mounting system that uses a single retaining nut must incorporate a device to
prevent loosening of the nut and the wheel. A second nut (“jam nut”) does not meet these
requirements.
T2.6.2 Wheel lug bolts, drive pegs and studs must be made of steel or titanium. The team must
be able to show good engineering practice and providing adequate strength by calculations.
Wheel lug bolts, drive pegs and studs must not be hollow.
T2.6.3 Aluminium wheel nuts may be used, but they must be hard anodized and in pristine condition.
T2.6.4 The distance between any non-rotating part and the inner rim base must be at least 5 mm in
static condition.
T2 General Design Requirements
T2.7 Tires
T2.7.1 Vehicles must have two types of tires as follows:
-Dry tires - The tires on the vehicle when it is presented for technical inspection are
defined as its “dry tires”.
- Wet tires - Wet tires may be any size or type of treaded or grooved tire provided:
–The tread pattern or grooves were molded in by the tire manufacturer or were cut
by the tire manufacturer or their appointed agent. Any grooves that have been
cut must have documentary proof that it was done in accordance with these rules.
–There is a minimum tread depth of 2 .4 mm.
T2.7.2 Tires on the same axle must have the same manufacturer, size and compound.
T2.7.3 Tire warmers are not allowed.
T2.7.4 Special agents that increase traction must not be added to the tires or track surface.
T2.8 Steering
T2.8.1 Steering systems using cables or belts for actuation are prohibited. This does not apply for
autonomous steering actuators.
T2.8.2 The steering wheel must directly mechanically actuate the front wheels.
T2.8.3 The steering system must have positive steering stops that prevent the steering linkages from
locking up. The stops must be placed on the rack and must prevent the tires and rims from
contacting any other parts. Steering actuation must be possible during standstill.
T2.8.4 Allowable steering system free play is limited to a total of 7◦measured at the steering wheel.
T2.8.5 The steering wheel must be attached to the column with a quick disconnect. The driver must
be able to operate the quick disconnect while in the normal driving position with gloves on.
T2.8.6 The steering wheel must be no more than 250 mm rearward of the front hoop. This distance
is measured horizontally, on the vehicle centerline, from the rear surface of the front hoop to
the forward most surface of the steering wheel with the steering in any position.
T2.8.7 The steering wheel must have a continuous perimeter that is near circular or near oval. The
outer perimeter profile may have some straight sections, but no concave sections.
T2.8.8 In any angular position, the top of the steering wheel must be no higher than the top-most
surface of the front hoop.
T2.8.9 The steering rack must be mechanically attached to the primary structure and all stationary
parts must be within the rollover protection envelope, see T1.1.16.
T2.8.10 Joints between all components attaching the steering wheel to the steering rack must be
mechanical and visible at technical inspection. Bonded joints are allowed in accordance with
T3.2.8.
T2.8.11 Rear wheel steering, which can be electrically actuated, is allowed if mechanical stops
limit the range of angular movement of the rear wheels to a maximum of 6◦. This must be
T3 General Chassis Design
demonstrated with a driver in the vehicle and the team must provide the equipment for the
steering angle range to be verified at technical inspection.
T2.9 Wheelbase, Track and Rollover Stability
T2.9.1 The vehicle must have a wheelbase of at least 1525 mm.
T2.9.2 The smaller track of the vehicle (front or rear) must be no less than 75 % of the larger track.
T2.9.3 The track and center of gravity of the vehicle must combine to provide adequate rollover
stability. This is tested by the tilt test IN7.
T 3 G ENERAL CHASSIS DESIGN
T3.1 General Requirements
T3.1.1 Among other requirements, the vehicle’s structure must include:
- Two roll hoops that are braced
- A front bulkhead with support system and IA
- Side impact structures
T3.2 Minimum Material Requirements
T3.2.1 Table 4 shows the minimum requirements for the members of the primary structure if made
from steel tubing.
Item or application Minimum Minimum cross Minimum area
wall thickness sectional area moment of inertia
Main and front hoops, 2 .0 mm 173 mm211320 mm4
shoulder harness mounting bar
Impact structures, 1 .2 mm 119 mm28509 mm4
front bulkhead,
roll hoop bracing,
driver’s restraint
harness attachment
(except as noted above)
Front bulkhead support, 1 .2 mm 91 mm26695 mm4
main hoop bracing supports
Table 4: Minimum Material Requirements
T3.2.2 Steel tubing has to be made from unalloyed carbon steel with a maximum content of
0.3 %carbon, 1.7 %manganese and 0.6 %of any other element. All other steel grades are
considered alternative materials and require additional testing and documentation, see T3.3.
T3.2.3 Except for inspection holes, any holes drilled in any part which is a member of the primary
structure must be considered in the SES.
T3 General Chassis Design
T3.2.4 The steel properties used for the calculations in the SES must be the following, or what is
written in the material property documentation, whichever is lower:
Non-welded strength for continuous material calculations:
- Young’s Modulus (E) = 200 GPa
- Yield Strength (S y) = 305 MPa
- Ultimate Strength (S u) = 365 MPa
Welded strength for discontinuous material such as joint calculations:
- Yield Strength (S y) = 180 MPa
- Ultimate Strength (S u) = 300 MPa
T3.2.5 Any tubing with a wall thickness less than 1.2 mm or a minimum area moment of inertia less
than 6695 mm4is considered non-structural and will be ignored when assessing compliance
to any rule regarding the vehicle structure.
T3.2.6 If a member of the primary structure (except for the roll hoops) is a bent tube or made from
multiple tubes an additional tube must support it. This support tube must:
-Have its attachment point at the position along the bend tube where it deviates farthest
from a straight line connecting both ends.
- Be of the same dimension as the supported tube(s).
- Terminate at a node of the primary structure.
- Be angled no more than 30◦from the plane of the supported tube(s).
T3.2.7 Any welded seams shape must not be mechanically altered in any way.
T3.2.8 Where bonded joints are applicable and governed by the rules, a 50 % reduction must be
applied to all nominal and tested adhesive values. Bonded joints in the primary structure
must be documented in the SES.
T3.3 Alternative Materials
T3.3.1 Alternative materials may be used for all parts of the primary structure and the TSAC with
the following exceptions:
- The main hoop and the main hoop bracing must be steel
- The front hoop must be metal
- Any welded structures of the primary structure must be steel
- However, the front hoop may be an aluminium welded structure
T3.3.2 If any other materials than steel tubing are used in the primary structure or the TSAC,
physical testing is required to show equivalency to the minimum material properties for steel
in T3.2.
T3.3.3 If alloyed steel as defined by T3.2.2 is used, the team has to include tests and documentation
in the SES to show structural equivalency. This may include, but is not limited to:
T3 General Chassis Design
- Receipts and data sheets of the used tubing materials
- Documentation about welding processes and filler materials
- Documentation about heat treatments
- Tests showing adequate strength and elongation at break in the welded condition
T3.4 Composite Structures
T3.4.1 If composite structures are used in the primary structure and/or the TSAC, the Flexural
Rigidity (EI) of that structure must be calculated with the tools and formulas in the SES
and/or Accumulator Structural Equivalency Spreadsheet (ASES). The EI must be calculated
as the EI of a flat panel about its neutral axis. This panel must have the same composition as
the structure used in the primary structure or the TSAC. The actual geometry and curvature
of the panel may only be taken into account, if the flat panel EI equivalency is greater than
60 % , for the main hoop bracing support, the front hoop bracing, the front bulkhead support
structure, the shoulder harness bar, the TS and TSAC protective structure.
T3.4.2 If composite materials are used in the primary structure or the TSAC the SES must include:
- Material type(s)
- Cloth weights
- Resin type
- Fiber orientation
- Number of layers
- Core material
- Lay-up technique
- 3-point-bend test and shear test data
T3.4.3 For any laminate in the primary structure and/or the TSAC, the maximum weight content
of parallel fibers, relative to the weight of all fibers in the laminate, is 50 % . All fibers laid
within any orientation +/-10◦count as parallel in this case.
T3.4.4 If an asymmetrical lay-up is used in the primary structure, the thinner skin must have a
thickness of at least 40 % of the thicker skin or 1 mm whichever is less.
T3.4.5 Wherever backing plates are required, they must be fully supported by the structure they are
attached to.
T3.4.6 Backing plates must have a continuous perimeter that is near circular or near oval. The outer
perimeter profile may have some straight sections, but no concave sections. Backing plates
must not have any cut-outs within their outside perimeter except for the holes for bolts.
T3.5 Laminate Testing
T3.5.1 If composite materials are used for any part of the primary structure or the TSAC the team
must:
T3 General Chassis Design
- Build a representative test panel which must measure exactly 275 mm ×500 mm that
has the same design, laminate and fabrication method as used for the respective part of
the primary structure represented as a flat panel. The sides of the test panel must not
be laminated (core material must be visible).
- Perform a 3-point bending test on this panel
The data from these tests and pictures of the test samples and test setup must be included
in the SES. In the pictures, the following must be identifiable: distance between the two
supports, dimensions of the load applicator and test sample marking as per T3.5.5. The test
results must be used to derive strength and stiffness properties used in the SES formula for
all laminate panels.
Representative test panels for parts of the TSAC may use smaller dimensions, provided that
the panel core thickness is 5 mm or smaller. This representative test panel must then measure
150 mm ×275 mm . In this case, the distance between the two test panel supports must be at
least 200 mm and the load applicator must have a radius of at least 5 mm .T3.5.6 and T3.5.7
do not apply.
T3.5.2 If a panel represents side impact structure it must be proven that it has at least the same
properties as two steel tubes meeting the requirements for side impact structure tubes for
buckling modulus, yield strength and absorbed energy.
T3.5.3 Composite structures with different core thicknesses but otherwise identical construction
may use material properties derived from a single test panel. The panel with the thicker
core must be tested and the structure using derived material properties must not use a core
thickness of less than 66 % of the tested panel.
T3.5.4 When a laminate is not quasi-isotropic, i.e. has equal strength and stiffness in the 0◦,90◦and
±45◦direction, the results from the 3point bending test will be assigned to the 0◦lay-up
direction. To show equivalence in the SES, the 0◦lay-up direction must be used and oriented
accordingly in the chassis.
T3.5.5 The test samples must be presented at technical inspection. All samples must be marked
with the following non-removable (e.g.: permanent marker or engraving, but no sticker)
information: laminated structure acronym and date of testing.
T3.5.6 The distance between the two test panel supports must be at least 400 mm.
T3.5.7 The load applicator used to test any panel or tube must be metallic and have a radius of
50 mm.
T3.5.8 The load applicator must overhang the test piece to prevent edge loading.
T3.5.9 There must be no material between the load applicator and the test piece.
T3.5.10 Perimeter shear tests must be completed which measure the force required to push or pull
a25 mm diameter flat punch through a flat laminate sample. The sample must be at least
100 mm ×100 mm . Core and skin thicknesses must be identical to those used in the actual
primary structure and be manufactured using the same materials and processes. If an
asymmetrical lay-up is used, the thinner skin must face the punch
T3.5.11 The test fixture must support the entire sample, except for a 32 mm hole aligned co-axially
with the punch. The sample must not be clamped to the fixture.
T3 General Chassis Design
T3.6 Structural Documentation
T3.6.1 All teams must submit a Structural Equivalency Spreadsheet (SES), Structural Equivalency
3D Model (SE3D) and [EV ONLY ] ASES.
T3.6.2 The SES and [EV ONLY ] ASES can be downloaded from the competition website.
T3.6.3 The SE3D must contain a three dimensional CAD model of the chassis including all members
of the primary structure and their mechanical attachment details.
-[MONOCOQUE ONLY ] The SE3D must include the inner, outer skin and core thick-
nesses.
-[MONOCOQUE ONLY ] If the actual EI of a structure is used in the SES, this must be
highlighted and included as a measurable instance.
- [EV ONLY ] The TSACs and their attachment must be included.
- [CV ONLY ] The air intake system, the fuel tank and filler neck must be included.
T3.6.4 Vehicles must be fabricated in accordance with the materials and processes described in the
SES.
T3.6.5 Teams must bring a copy of the approved SES to technical inspection.
T3.7 Roll Hoops
T3.7.1 Both roll hoops must be securely integrated to the primary structure using node-to-node
triangulation or equivalent joining methods.
T3.7.2 The minimum radius of any bend, measured at the tube centerline, must be at least three
times the tube outside diameter. Bends must be smooth and continuous with no evidence of
crimping or wall failure. The minimum area moment of inertia, see T3.2, must be maintained
in all areas, including the bends of the manufactured tubes.
T3.7.3 In a plane perpendicular to the longitudinal axis of the vehicle and through the lower
endpoints of the roll hoop, no part of the primary structure may lie below 30 mm of the
endpoints of the roll hoop.
T3.7.4 Roll hoops attached to a composite primary structure must be mechanically attached at the
top and bottom of both sides of that structure and at intermediate locations if needed to show
equivalency. The lower roll hoop tubing attachment points must be within 50 mm of the
endpoints of the roll hoop.
T3.7.5 Mounting plates welded to the roll hoops must be at least 2 mm thick steel or 3 mm thick
aluminium, dependent of the roll hoop material.
T3.7.6 Both roll hoops must have one 4.5 mm inspection hole in a non-critical straight location and
its surface at this point must be unobstructed for at least 180◦.
T3.8 Main Hoop
T3.8.1 The main hoop must be constructed of a single piece of uncut, continuous, closed section
steel tubing.
T3 General Chassis Design
T3.8.2 In side view the portion of the main hoop which is above its upper attachment point to the
side impact structure must be inclined less than 10◦from vertical.
T3.8.3 In side view any bends in the main hoop above its upper attachment point to the primary
structure must be braced to a node of the main hoop bracing support structure with tubing
meeting the requirements of main hoop bracing.
T3.8.4 In side view any portion lower than the upper attachment point to the side impact structure
must be inclined either forward or not more than 10◦rearward.
T3.9 Front Hoop
T3.9.1 The front hoop must be constructed of a continuous and closed section.
T3.9.2 If the front hoop is made from more than one piece it must be supported by node-to-node
triangulation or an equivalent construction.
T3.9.3 In side view, no part of the front hoop can be inclined more than 20◦from vertical.
T3.9.4 If the front hoop is a welded construction made from multiple aluminium profiles, the
equivalent yield strength must be considered in the as-welded condition unless the team
demonstrates and shows proof that it has been properly solution heat treated and artificially
aged. The team must supply sufficient documentation proving the appropriate heat treatment
process was performed.
T3.9.5 The front hoop requires six attachment points, two on each side connecting to the front
bulkhead support structures and two connecting to the front hoop bracing, and must therefore
show equivalency to 180 kN, as follows from T3.15.1 and T3.11.4.
T3.9.6 Fully laminating the front hoop to the monocoque is acceptable. Fully laminating means that
the hoop has to be encapsulated with laminate around its whole circumference, see figure 5.
Equivalence to T3.7.4 must be shown in the SES. The laminate encapsulating the front hoop
must overlap by at least 25 mm on each side. It must have the same lay-up as the laminate
that it is connecting to.
Figure 5: Front hoop laminating requirements
T3.10 Main Hoop Bracing
T3.10.1 The main hoop must be supported to the front or the rear by bracing tubes on each side of
the main hoop.
T3 General Chassis Design
T3.10.2 In side view the main hoop and the main hoop braces must not lie on the same side of a
vertical line coincident with the top of the main hoop.
T3.10.3 The main hoop braces must be attached to the main hoop no lower than 160 mm below the
top-most surface of the main hoop. The included angle formed by the main hoop and the
main hoop braces must be at least 30◦.
T3.10.4 The main hoop braces must be straight.
T3.10.5 The lower ends of the main hoop braces must be supported back to the upper attachment
point of the main hoop to the side impact structure and to the lower attachment point of the
main hoop to the side impact structure by a node-to-node triangulated structure or equivalent
composite structure.
T3.10.6 If any item which extends outside of the primary structure is attached to the main hoop
braces, additional bracing is required to prevent bending loads in a rollover situation.
T3.11 Front Hoop Bracing
T3.11.1 The front hoop bracing attaches on each side of the front hoop as well as the structure forward
of the driver’s feet. A minimum of two tubes without any bends must be straight on a line in
side view of the frame and must have a minimum distance of 100 mm between each other at
the front hoop.
T3.11.2 The front hoop bracing structure must be attached no lower than 50 mm below the top-most
surface of the front hoop, see figure 6.
T3.11.3 If the front hoop is inclined more than 10◦to the rear, additional braces extending rearwards
are required.
T3.11.4 Composite front hoop bracing structures and their attachments cannot be counted towards the
front bulkhead support structures and vice-versa for the structural equivalency documentation.
160 mm
30°Steering Wheel must
be below this Line50 mm
30°max.max.
min.
min.
Figure 6: Front hoop bracing, main hoop bracing and steering wheel requirements
T3.12 Front Bulkhead
T3.12.1 Any alternative material used for the front bulkhead must have a perimeter shear strength
equivalent to a 1 .5 mm thick steel plate.
T3 General Chassis Design
T3.12.2 If the front bulkhead is part of a composite structure and is modeled as an “L” shape, the EI
of the front bulkhead about the vertical and lateral axes must be equivalent to a steel tube
meeting the requirements for the front bulkhead. The length of the section perpendicular to
the bulkhead may be a maximum of 25 mm measured from the rearmost face of the bulkhead.
T3.13 Front Bulkhead Support
T3.13.1 The front bulkhead must be supported back to the front hoop by a minimum of three tubes on
each side; an upper member, a lower member and diagonal bracing to provide triangulation.
-The upper support member must be attached to the front bulkhead a maximum of
50 mm below the top-most surface of the front bulkhead, and attached to the front hoop
a maximum of 50 mm below the upper side impact member. If the attachment point
of the upper member is greater than 100 mm above the upper side impact member,
node-to-node triangulated bracing is required to transfer load to the main hoop.
-The lower support member must be attached to the base of the front bulkhead and the
base of the front hoop.
-The diagonal bracing must triangulate the upper and lower support members node-to-
node.
T3.13.2 If the front bulkhead support is part of a composite structure, it must have equivalent EI to the
sum of the EI of the six baseline steel tubes that it replaces and it must not be counted towards
the composite front hoop bracing structures for the structural equivalency documentation, i.e.
T3.11.4.
T3.13.3 The EI of the vertical side of the front bulkhead support structure must be equivalent to at
least the EI of one baseline steel tube that it replaces.
T3.13.4 The perimeter shear strength of the monocoque laminate in the front bulkhead support
structure must be at least 4 kN.
T3.14 Impact Structures
T3.14.1 The side impact structure must consist of at least three steel tubes, see T3.2, on each side of
the cockpit, see figure 7.
- The upper member must connect the main hoop and the front hoop.
-The upper member must be at a height between 240 mm and320 mm above the lowest
inside chassis point between the front and main hoop.
-The lower member must connect the bottom of the main hoop and the bottom of the
front hoop.
- The diagonal member must triangulate the upper and lower member between the roll
hoops node-to-node.
T3.14.2 Other impact structures, see CV1 .3.2, EV4 .4.2 and EV5 .5.2, must be fully triangulated
structures and consist of at least three steel tubes, see T3.2, on each side and rearward of the
component that needs to be protected.
T3 General Chassis Design
-If the component projects outwards from the roll hoops to the side, the front of the
component must also be protected.
-The upper member must not be higher than 320 mm above the lowest inside chassis
point between the front and main hoop.
T3.14.3 If the impact structure is part of a composite structure, the following is required:
-The region of the structure up to a height of 320 mm above the lowest inside chassis
point between the front and main hoop must have an EI equal to the three baseline
steel tubes that it replaces. An example for side impact structure is given in figure 8.
-The vertical impact structure must have an EI equivalent to two baseline steel tubes
and half the horizontal floor must have an EI equivalent to one baseline steel tube.
-The vertical impact structure must have an absorbed energy equivalent to two baseline
steel tubes, exceeding 65 J.
- The perimeter shear strength must be at least 7 .5 kN.
240 mm320 mm
Lower Side Impact MemberUpper Side Impact Member
(completely in zone)
Lowest Point in CockpitDiagonal Side Impact Member
Figure 7: Side impact structure
320 mmLowest Point inside ChassisSide 
Impact Structure
Figure 8: Side impact structure monocoque
T3 General Chassis Design
T3.15 Bolted Primary Structure Attachments
T3.15.1 If two parts of the primary structure are bolted together, each attachment point between the
two parts must be able to carry a load of 30 kN in any direction.
T3.15.2 Data obtained from the laminate perimeter shear strength test must be used to prove that
adequate shear area is provided.
T3.15.3 Each attachment point requires a minimum of two 8 mm metric grade 8.8bolts and steel
backing plates with a minimum thickness of 2 mm.
T3.15.4 For the attachment of front hoop bracing, main hoop bracing and main hoop bracing support
to the primary structure the use of one 10 mm metric grade 8.8bolt is sufficient, if the bolt is
on the centerline of the tube, see figure 9.
Figure 9: Bolted roll hoop bracing support
T3.15.5 When using bolted joints within the primary structure, no crushing of the laminate core
material is allowed.
T3.15.6 For the AIP to front bulkhead attachment, and if two panels or plates of the primary structure
are bolted together, for each 200 mm of reference perimeter a minimum of one 8 mm metric
grade 8.8bolt(s) must be used, rounded up to the next integer. Smaller, but more, bolts may
be used, if equivalency is shown. The bolts must be evenly distributed over the circumference
using good engineering practices. The reference perimeter is the outside perimeter of the
attached part at the connection. The bolts are considered critical fasteners, must comply with
T10 and require steel backing plates with a minimum thickness of 2 mm.
T3.15.7 For the bolted connections of T3.15.6 an exception in favor of blind inserts may be given, if
physical testing is documented in the SES, where the bolted connection can carry a load of
15 kN in any direction.
T3.16 Impact Attenuator
T3.16.1 Each vehicle must be equipped with an IA assembly consisting of an IA and AIP.
T3.16.2 The IA must:
T3 General Chassis Design
- Be installed forward of the front bulkhead.
-Be at least 100 mm high and 200 mm wide for a minimum distance of 200 mm forward
of the front bulkhead.
-Not be positioned more than 350 mm above the ground, for any portion of the required
100×200×200 mm3volume.
- Not be able to penetrate the front bulkhead in the event of an impact.
- Be attached securely and directly to the AIP.
- Not be part of the non-structural bodywork.
- Be designed with a closed front section.
- Not be wider or higher than the AIP.
T3.16.3 The baseline design for the AIP is a 1 .5 mm solid steel or 4 .0 mm solid aluminium plate.
-If the IA and AIP (IA assembly) are bolted to the front bulkhead, it must be the same
size as the outside dimensions of the front bulkhead.
-If it is welded to the front bulkhead, it must extend at least to the centerline of the front
bulkhead tubing in all directions.
- The AIP must not extend past the outside edges of the front bulkhead.
T3.16.4 Alternative AIP designs are permissible if equivalency to T3.16.3 is proven by physical
testing as in T3.18.2.
T3.16.5 The IA may be attached to the AIP by a minimum of four 8 mm metric grade 8.8bolts that
are considered critical fasteners and must comply with T10. Attachment(s) using adhesive
must be able to carry a load of 60 kN in any direction.
T3.16.6 The attachment of the IA assembly must be designed to provide an adequate load path for
transverse and vertical loads in the event of off-center and off-axis impacts. Segmented foam
attenuators must have the segments bonded together to prevent sliding or parallelogramming.
T3.16.7 A team may use one of the “standard” FSAE IAs, in order to avoid testing, provided that:
-if the front bulkhead width is larger than 400 mm and/or its height is larger than
350 mm a diagonal or X-bracing that is a front bulkhead support tube or an approved
equivalent per T3.2, must be included in the front bulkhead. Or equivalent for mono-
coque bulkheads.
-must use a 1.5 mm solid steel AIP that is welded along its full perimeter to a steel
bulkhead or use a 4 mm solid aluminium AIP that is bolted to any bulkhead with a
minimum of eight 8 mm metric grade 8 .8 bolts
- if the “standard” honeycomb IA is used, the IA must be of pre-crushed type
-adhesive used to mount the “standard” IA to the AIP must have a shear strength of at
least 24 MPa
T3.16.8 If the standard IA is used, but does not comply with the requirements of T3.16.7 physical
testing must be carried out to prove that the AIP does not permanently deflect more than
25 mm.
T3 General Chassis Design
T3.17 Impact Attenuator Data Requirement
T3.17.1 All teams must submit an IA data report using the Impact Attenuator Data (IAD) template
provided at the competition website.
T3.18 Impact Attenuator Test Requirements
T3.18.1 The IA assembly, when mounted on the front of a vehicle with a total mass of 300 kg and
impacting a solid, non-yielding impact barrier with a velocity of impact of 7m/s, must meet
the following requirements:
- Decelerate the vehicle at a rate not exceeding 20 g average and 40 g peak.
- The energy absorbed in this event must meet or exceed 7350 J.
-Teams using the standard IA are not required to submit test data with their IAD report,
but all other requirements must be included.
Equivalent (higher) test velocities are only allowed to accommodate for a lower total testing
mass, as long as the energy absorbed is 7350 J or more. If these requirements cannot be met,
a team must use the standard IA.
T3.18.2 During the IA test:
- The IA must be attached to the AIP using the intended vehicle attachment method.
-The IA assembly must be attached to a test fixture that has geometry representative
of the intended primary structure and equal or higher stiffness and strength. When
alternative materials are used for the AIP, the test fixture must be a copy of the intended
primary structure (i.e. materials, lay-up, joining methods).
- There must be at least 50 mm clearance rearwards of the AIP to the test fixture.
-No part of the AIP may permanently deflect more than 25 mm beyond the position of
the AIP before the test.
T3.18.3 Teams using IAs (typically structural noses) directly attached to the front bulkhead, which
shortcut the load path through the bulk of the AIP, must conduct an additional test. This test
must prove that the AIP can withstand a load of 120 kN (300 kg multiplied by 40 g), where
the load applicator matches the minimum IA dimensions.
T3.18.4 Vehicles with aerodynamic devices and/or sensors in front of the front bulkhead must not
exceed the peak deceleration of T3.18.1 for the combination of their IA assembly and the
non-crushable object(s). One of the following three methods must be used to prove the
design does not exceed 120 kN:
-Physical testing of the IA assembly including any attached non-crushable object(s) or
structurally representative dummies thereof in front of the AIP. When non-crushable
object(s) are located in front view of the AIP, physical testing is required.
-Combining the peak force from physical testing of the IA assembly with the failure
load for the mounting of the non-crushable object(s), calculated from fastener shear
and/or link buckling.
-Combining the “standard” IA peak load of 95 kN with the failure load for the mounting
of the non-crushable object(s), calculated from fastener shear and/or link buckling.
T4 Cockpit
T3.18.5 Dynamic testing (sled, pendulum, drop tower, etc) of the IA may only be conducted at a
dedicated test facility. This facility may be part of the university, but must be supervised by
professional staff. Teams are not allowed to design their own dynamic test apparatus.
T3.18.6 When using acceleration data from the dynamic test, the average deceleration must be
calculated based on the raw unfiltered data. If peaks above the 40 g limit are present in the
data, a 100 Hz, 3rdorder, low pass Butterworth ( −3 dB at 100 Hz) filter may be applied.
T3.19 Non-Crushable Objects
T3.19.1 All non-crushable objects (e.g. pedals, master cylinders, hydraulic reservoirs) must be
rearward of the rear most plane of the front bulkhead and at least 25 mm behind the AIP at
any time, except for sensors, aerodynamic devices and their mountings.
T 4 C OCKPIT
T4.1 Cockpit Opening
T4.1.1 The size of the cockpit opening needs to be sufficient for the template shown on the left of
figure 10 to pass vertically from the cockpit opening to below the upper side impact member
when held horizontally. The template may be moved fore and aft.
T4.1.2 If the side impact structure is not made of tubes, the template must pass until it is 320 mm
above the lowest inside chassis point between the front and main hoop.
T4.1.3 The steering wheel, seat and all padding may be removed for the template to fit. Any other
parts may only be removed if they are integrated with the steering wheel.
T4.2 Cockpit Internal Cross Section
T4.2.1 The cockpit must provide a free internal cross section sufficient for the template shown on
the right in figure 10 to pass from the cockpit opening to a point 100 mm rearwards of the
face of the rearmost pedal in an inoperative position. The template may be moved up and
down. Adjustable pedals must be in their most forward position.
T4.2.2 The steering wheel and any padding that can be removed without the use of tools while the
driver is seated may be removed for the template to fit.
T4.2.3 The driver’s feet and legs must be completely contained within the primary structure when
the driver is seated normally and the driver’s feet are touching the pedals. In side and front
views, any part of the driver’s feet or legs must not extend above or outside of this structure.
T4.3 Percy (95thpercentile male)
T4.3.1 When seated normally and restrained by the driver’s restraint system, the helmet of a 95th
percentile male and all of the team’s drivers must, see figure 11:
-Be a minimum of 50 mm away from the straight line drawn from the top of the main
hoop to the top of the front hoop.
T4 Cockpit
Front
parts of the steering system 
may pass through this area
Top600 mm
100 mm
100 mm 350 mm(400 mm) 75 mm50 mm50 mm50 mm
50 mm
350 mmmax. thickness 7 mm
350 mm
50 mm100 mm
50 mm
parts of the steering system 
may pass through this area
Figure 10: Cockpit opening template (left) and cockpit internal cross section template (right)
-Be a minimum of 50 mm away from the straight line drawn from the top of the main
hoop to the lower end of the main hoop bracing if the bracing extends rearwards.
-Be no further rearwards than the rear surface of the main hoop if the main hoop bracing
extends forwards.
50 mm
50 mmHelmet must be forward
of this Line
Figure 11: Minimum helmet clearance
T4.3.2 The 95thpercentile male is represented by a two dimensional figure consisting of two
circles of 200 mm diameter (one representing the hips and buttocks and one representing the
shoulder region) and one circle of 300 mm (representing the head with helmet).
T4.3.3 The two 200 mm circles are connected by a straight line measuring 490 mm . The 300 mm
circle is connected by a straight line measuring 280 mm with the upper 200 mm circle.
T4.3.4 The figure has to be positioned in the vehicle as follows, see figure 12:
- The seat adjusted to the rearmost position
- The pedals adjusted to the frontmost position
-The bottom 200 mm circle placed on the seat bottom. The distance between the center
of the circle and the rearmost actuation face of the pedals must be minimum 915 mm .
- The middle circle positioned on the seat back
- The upper 300 mm circle positioned 25 mm away from the head restraint.
T4 Cockpit
Head
Restraint
R915 mm min.25 mm
rearmost
Pedal Face
Seat BottomSeat Back
300 mm
490 mm
280 mm
200 mm
200 mm
Figure 12: Percy placement
T4.4 Side Tubes
T4.4.1 If there is any chassis member alongside the driver at the height of the neck of any of the
drivers in the team, a metal tube or piece of sheet metal must be attached to the chassis to
prevent the driver’s shoulders from passing under that chassis member.
T4.5 Driver’s Harness Attachment
T4.5.1 Any harness attachment to a monocoque must be using one 10 mm metric grade 8 .8 bolt or
two8 mm metric grade 8.8bolts (or bolts of an equivalent standard) and steel backing plates
with a minimum thickness of 2 mm.
T4.5.2 Any harness that is fastened to the primary structure using brackets must use two 8 mm
metric grade 8 .8 or stronger fasteners.
T4.5.3 It must be proven that the attachments for shoulder and lap belts can support a load of 13 kN
and the attachment points of the anti-submarine belts can support a load of 6 .5 kN.
T4.5.4 If the lap belts and anti-submarine belts are attached less than 100 mm apart, these must
support a total load of 19 .5 kN.
T4.5.5 If the belts are attached to a laminated structure or the mounting brackets and tabs are
not made from steel at least 1.6 mm thick, physical testing is required. The following
requirements must be met:
-Load is applied to a test sample representing the tubular or laminated structure and
must use the same brackets and tabs
-Edges of the test fixture supporting the sample must be a minimum of 125 mm from
the load application point.
-The width of the shoulder harness test sample must not be any wider than the shoulder
harness panel height used to show equivalency for the shoulder harness mounting bar.
T4 Cockpit
-Designs with attachments near a free edge must not support the free edge during the
test.
-Harness loads must be tested with the worst case for the range of the angles specified
for the driver’s harness.
T4.6 Driver’s Seat
T4.6.1 The lowest point of the driver’s seat must in side view not extend below the upper face of the
lowest side impact structure member or have a longitudinal tube (or tubes) that meets the
material requirements for the side impact structure, see T3.2, passing underneath the lowest
point of the seat.
T4.6.2 Adequate heat insulation must be provided to ensure that the driver is not able to contact any
parts of the vehicle with a surface temperature above 60◦C. The insulation may be external
to the cockpit or incorporated with the driver’s seat or firewall. The design must address
all three types of heat transfer with the following minimum requirements between the heat
source and the part that the driver could contact:
(a) Conduction insulation by:
(i) No direct contact, or
(ii)a heat resistant, conduction insulation material with a minimum thickness of
8 mm.
(b) Convection insulation by a minimum air gap of 25 mm.
(c) Radiation insulation by:
(i) A solid metal heat shield with a minimum thickness of 0 .4 mm or
(ii) reflective foil or tape when combined with T4.6.2.a.ii.
T4.7 Floor Closeout
T4.7.1 All vehicles must have a floor closeout made of one or more panels, which separate the driver
from the ground.
T4.7.2 The closeout must extend from the front bulkhead to the firewall.
T4.7.3 The panels must be made of a solid, non-brittle material.
T4.7.4 If multiple panels are used, gaps between panels must not exceed 3 mm.
T4.8 Firewall
T4.8.1 A firewall must separate the cockpit from all components of the fuel supply system, hydraulic
fluid (except brake system and dampers), flammable liquids, the LV battery and any TS
component, see EV1.1.1.
T4.8.2 The firewall must cover any straight line between the parts mentioned in T4.8.1 and any part
of the tallest driver below a plane 100 mm above the bottom of the helmet.
T4 Cockpit
T4.8.3 The firewall must be a non-permeable surface made from a rigid, fire resistant material, see
T1.2.1, which must be rigidly mounted to the vehicle’s structure.
T4.8.4 Any firewall must seal completely against the passage of fluids, especially at the sides and
the floor of the cockpit.
T4.8.5 Pass-throughs for wiring, cables, etc. are allowed if grommets, cable glands or connectors
are used to seal the pass-through.
T4.8.6 Multiple panels may be used to form the firewall but must overlap at least 5 mm and be
sealed at the joints. Any sealing material must not be vital to the structural integrity of the
firewall.
T4.8.7 [EV ONLY ]The TS firewall between driver and TS components must be composed of two
layers:
-One solid layer, facing the TS side, must be made of aluminium with a thickness of at
least 0 .5 mm. This part of the TS firewall must be grounded according to EV3.1.
-The second layer, facing the driver, must be made of an electrically insulating and fire
retardant material, see T1.2.1. The second layer must not be made of CFRP.
-The thickness of the second layer must be sufficient to prevent penetrating this layer
with a 4 mm wide screwdriver and 250 N of force.
A sample of the TS firewall must be presented at technical inspection.
T4.8.8 [EV ONLY ]Conductive parts, except for the chassis and firewall mounting points, must not
protrude through the TS firewall or must be properly insulated on the driver’s side. The driver
must not be able to touch uninsulated firewall mounting points while operating the vehicle.
T4.8.9 [EV ONLY ] TS parts outside of the rollover protection envelope, see T1.1.16 and EV4.4.3,
do not need a firewall.
T4.9 Accessibility of Controls
T4.9.1 All vehicle controls must be operated from inside the cockpit without any part of the driver,
e.g. hands, arms or elbows, being outside the vertical planes tangent to the outermost surface
of the side impact structure.
T4.10 Driver Visibility
T4.10.1 The driver must have adequate visibility to the front and sides of the vehicle. Seated in a
normal driving position, the driver must have a minimum field of vision of 100◦to either
side. The required visibility may be obtained by the driver turning their head and/or the use
of mirrors.
T4.10.2 If mirrors are required to meet T4.10.1, they must remain in place and be adjusted to enable
the required visibility throughout all dynamic events.
T5 Driver Restraint System
T4.11 Driver Egress
T4.11.1 All drivers must be able to exit to the side of the vehicle in less than 5 swith the driver in
the fully seated position, hands in the driving position on the connected steering wheel (in
all possible steering positions) and wearing the required driver equipment as in T13.3. The
egress time will stop when the driver has both feet on the ground.
T 5 D RIVER RESTRAINT SYSTEM
T5.1 Definitions
T5.1.1 6-point system – consists of a two-piece lap belt (minimum width 50 mm ), two shoulder
straps (minimum width 75 mm ) and two leg or anti-submarine straps (minimum width
50 mm).
T5.1.2 7-point system – same as the 6-point system except it has three anti-submarine straps.
T5.1.3 upright driving position – position with a seat back angled at 30◦or less from the vertical as
measured along the line joining the two 200 mm circles of the 95thpercentile male template
as defined in T4.3 and positioned per T4.3.4.
T5.1.4 reclined driving position – position with a seat back angled at more than 30◦from the
vertical as measured along the line joining the two 200 mm circles of the 95thpercentile male
template as defined in T4.3 and positioned per T4.3.4
T5.2 Belts - General
T5.2.1 All drivers must use a 6-point or 7-point restraint harness meeting the following specifica-
tions:
- All driver restraint systems must meet SFI Specification 16.1, SFI Specification 16.5,
SFI Specification 16.6 or FIA specification 8853/2016.
- The belts must bear the appropriate dated labels.
- The material of all straps must be in perfect condition.
- There must be a single metal-to-metal latch type quick release for all straps.
-All lap belts must incorporate a tilt lock adjuster (“quick adjuster”). A tilt lock adjuster
in each portion of the lap belt is highly recommended. Lap belts with “pull-up”
adjusters are recommended over “pull-down” adjusters.
-Vehicles with a “reclined driving position” must have either anti-submarine belts with
tilt lock adjusters (“quick adjusters”) or have two sets of anti-submarine belts installed.
-The shoulder harness must be the “over-the-shoulder type”. Only separate shoulder
straps are allowed (i.e. “Y”-type shoulder straps are not allowed). The “H”-type
configuration is allowed.
-The shoulder harness straps must be threaded through the three bar adjusters in
accordance with the manufacturer’s instructions.
-When a HANS device is used by the driver, FIA certified 50 mm wide shoulder
harnesses are allowed.
T5 Driver Restraint System
T5.2.2 SFI spec harnesses must be replaced following December 31stof the 2ndyear after the date
of manufacture as indicated by the label. FIA spec harnesses must be replaced following
December 31stof the year marked on the label.
T5.2.3 The restraint system must be worn tightly at all times.
T5.3 Belt, Strap and Harness Installation - General
T5.3.1 The lap belt, shoulder harness and anti-submarine strap(s) must be securely mounted to
the primary structure. This structure and any guide or support for the belts must meet the
minimum requirements of T3.2.
T5.3.2 Harnesses, belts and straps must not pass through a firewall, i.e. all harness attachment points
must be on the driver’s side of any firewall.
T5.3.3 The attachment of the driver’s restraint system requires an approved SES per T3.6 The lap
belts and anti submarine belts must not be routed over the sides of the seat. Where the belts
or harness pass through a hole in the seat, the seat must be rolled or grommeted to prevent
chafing of the belts.
T5.4 Lap Belt Mounting
T5.4.1 The lap belt must pass around the pelvic area below the anterior superior iliac spines (the hip
bones).
T5.4.2 The lap belts must come through the seat at the bottom of the sides of the seat to maximize
the wrap of the pelvic surface and continue in a straight line to the anchorage point.
T5.4.3 In side view, the lap belt must be capable of pivoting freely by using either a shouldered bolt
or an eye bolt attachment.
T5.4.4 With an “upright driving position”, in side view the lap belt must be at an angle of between
45◦and 65◦to the horizontal.
T5.4.5 With a “reclined driving position”, in side view the lap belt must be between an angle of 60◦
and 80◦to the horizontal.
T5.4.6 The centerline of the lap belt at the seat bottom must be between 0 mm to 76 mm forward of
the seat back to seat bottom junction as in figure 13.
T5.5 Shoulder Harness
T5.5.1 The shoulder harness must be mounted behind the driver to a structure that meets the
requirements of the primary structure. However, it cannot be mounted to the main hoop
bracing or attendant structure without additional bracing to prevent loads being transferred
into the main hoop bracing.
T5.5.2 If the harness is mounted to a tube that is not straight, the joints between this tube and the
structure to which it is mounted must be reinforced in side view by triangulation tubes to
prevent torsional rotation of the harness mounting tube. Supporting calculations are required.
Analysis method: Use 7 kN load per attachment and the range of angles in T5.5.5, calculate
T5 Driver Restraint System
that the bent shoulder harness bar triangulation stresses are less than as welded yield strength
T3.2.4 for combined bending and shear and does not fail in column buckling. If the team
chooses not to perform the strength analysis T3.2.6 will apply.
T5.5.3 The strength of any shoulder harness bar and bracing tubes must be proven in the relevant
tab of the team’s SES submission.
T5.5.4 The shoulder harness mounting points must be between 180 mm and230 mm apart, measured
center to center.
T5.5.5 From the driver’s shoulders rearwards to the mounting point or structural guide, the shoulder
harness must be between 10◦above the horizontal and 20◦below the horizontal as in
figure 13.
65° max.10° max.
20° max.
45° min.
76mm max.Seat Back80° max.10° max.
20° max.
60° min.
76mm max.Seat Back30°
max.> 30°Upright Driving Position Reclined Driving Position
Figure 13: Lap belt and shoulder harness mounting
T5.6 Anti-Submarine Belt Mounting
T5.6.1 The anti-submarine belts of a 6 point harness must be mounted in one of the following
setups:
-With the belts going vertically down from the groin, or angled up to 20◦rearwards.
The anchorage points must be approximately 100 mm apart.
-With the anchorage points on the primary structure at or near the lap belt anchorages,
the driver sitting on the anti-submarine belts and the belts coming up around the groin
to the release buckle.
T5.7 Head Restraint
T5.7.1 A head restraint must be provided on the vehicle to limit the rearward motion of the driver’s
head.
T5.7.2 The head restraint must:
- Be vertical or near vertical in side view.
-Be padded with an energy absorbing material with a minimum thickness of 40 mm
that meets either the SFI 45.2 standard, or is listed in the FIA technical list n◦17 as a
type B material for single seater cars.
- Have a minimum width and height of 150 mm.
T6 Brake System
- Be located so that for each driver:
–The restraint is no more than 25 mm away from the back of the driver’s helmet,
with the driver in their normal driving position.
–The contact point of the back of the driver’s helmet on the head restraint is no
less than 50 mm from any edge of the head restraint.
T5.7.3 The head restraint and its mounting must withstand a force of 890 N applied in the rearward
direction at any point on its surface.
T5.8 Roll Bar Padding
T5.8.1 Any portion of the roll bar, roll bar bracing or chassis which might be contacted by the
driver’s helmet must be covered with a minimum thickness of 12 mm of padding which
meets SFI spec 45.1 or FIA 8857-2001.
T5.9 Driver’s Leg Protection
T5.9.1 All moving suspension and steering components and other sharp edges inside the cockpit
between the front hoop and a vertical plane 100 mm rearward of the pedals, must be shielded
with solid material.
T5.9.2 Covers over suspension and steering components must be removable to allow inspection of
the mounting points.
T 6 B RAKE SYSTEM
T6.1 Brake System - General
T6.1.1 The vehicle must be equipped with a hydraulic brake system that acts on all four wheels and
is operated by a single control.
T6.1.2 The brake system must have two independent hydraulic circuits such that in the case of a leak
or failure at any point in the system, effective braking power is maintained on at least two
wheels. Each hydraulic circuit must have its own fluid reserve, either by the use of separate
reservoirs or by the use of a dammed reservoir.
T6.1.3 The brake system must be sealed to prevent leakage.
T6.1.4 A single brake acting on a limited-slip differential is acceptable.
T6.1.5 “Brake-by-wire” systems are prohibited in manual mode.
T6.1.6 Unarmored plastic brake lines are prohibited.
T6.1.7 The brake system must be protected from failure of the drivetrain, see T7.3.2, from touching
any movable part and from minor collisions.
T6.1.8 Any part of the brake system must be within the surface envelope, see T1.1.18.
T7 Powertrain
T6.1.9 The brake pedal and its mounting must be designed to withstand a force of 2 kN without any
failure of the brake system or pedal box. This may be tested by pressing the pedal with the
maximum force that can be exerted by any official when seated normally.
T6.1.10 The brake pedal, including pedal face, must be fabricated from steel or aluminium or
machined from steel, aluminium or titanium.
T6.1.11 The first 90 % of the brake pedal travel may be used to regenerate brake energy without
actuating the hydraulic brake system. The remaining brake pedal travel must directly actuate
the hydraulic brake system, but brake energy regeneration may remain active.
T6.2 Brake Over-Travel Switch (BOTS)
T6.2.1 A BOTS must be installed on the vehicle as part of the Shutdown Circuit (SDC), as in EV6
orCV4 .1. This switch must be installed so that in the event of a failure in at least one of the
brake circuits the brake pedal over-travel will result in the SDC being opened. This must
function for all possible brake pedal and brake balance settings without damaging any part
of the vehicle.
T6.2.2 Repeated actuation of the switch must not close the SDC, and it must be designed so that the
driver cannot reset it.
T6.2.3 The BOTS must be a push-pull, push-rotate or flip type mechanical switch. It may consist of
a series connection of switches.
T6.3 Brake Light
T6.3.1 The vehicle must be equipped with one brake light that is illuminated if and only if
- the hydraulic brake system is actuated
- [EV ONLY ] or the electric brake system is actuated, see EV2.2.2
T6.3.2 The brake light must
- be a red light.
- be clearly visible from the rear.
- meet requirements according to T11.10.
T6.3.3 In side view the brake light must be oriented vertically and mounted between the wheel cen-
terline and driver’s shoulder level. Viewed from the back it must be positioned approximately
at the vehicle’s centerline.
T 7 P OWERTRAIN
T7.1 Transmission and Drive
T7.1.1 Movement of the vehicle without a person in the vehicle and with the master switch(es) in
the off position must be possible.
T7 Powertrain
T7.2 Coolant Fluid and System Sealing
T7.2.1 [CV ONLY ]Water-cooled internal combustion engines must only use plain water as the
coolant.
T7.2.2 Other cooling systems may only use plain water, air or oil as the coolant, see T1.2.2.
T7.2.3 Cooling systems using plain water (except outboard wheel motors and their cooling hoses)
must have a heat resistant (Permanently rated for at least 100◦C), rigid and rigidly mounted
cover which covers any part of the tallest driver below a plane 100 mm above the bottom of
the helmet.
T7.2.4 Any cooling or lubrication system must be sealed to prevent leakage.
T7.2.5 Separate catch cans must be employed to retain fluids other than plain water from any vents
of the cooling system or combustion engine lubrication system. Each catch-can must have a
minimum volume of 10 % of the fluid being contained or 900 mL whichever is greater.
T7.2.6 Any vent for systems containing plain water must have a catch-can with a minimum volume
of 10 % of the fluid being contained or 100 mL, whichever is greater.
T7.2.7 All parts of the engine, motor(s) cooling and lubrication system, including their mountings,
must be rated for at least 120◦Cor the temperatures the respective fluid may reach, whichever
is higher.
T7.2.8 Catch cans must be rigidly mounted to the chassis and located rearwards of the firewall
below the driver’s shoulder level.
T7.2.9 Any catch can must vent through a hose with a minimum internal diameter of 3 mm down to
the bottom level of the chassis and must exit outside the bodywork.
T7.3 Drive Train Shields and Guards
T7.3.1 The lowest point of any lubrication system can only be lower than the line between the lowest
point of the main hoop and the lowest chassis member behind the lubrication system if it is
protected from hitting the ground by a structure mounted directly to the chassis.
T7.3.2 Exposed rotating final drivetrain parts, such as gears, clutches, chains and belts must be fitted
with scatter shields. Scatter shields and their mountings must:
- Be constructed of non-perforated 2 mm steel or 3 mm aluminium alloy 6061-T6.
- Be attached with 6 mm metric grade 8 .8 or stronger and must comply with T10.1.
T7.3.3 In addition to T7.3.2, scatter shields must:
-Cover chains and belts from the drive sprocket to the driven sprocket/chain wheel/belt
or pulley.
-Start and end parallel to the lowest point of the driven sprocket/chain wheel/belt or
pulley.
-Be at least three times the width of the chain or belt and be centered at the centerline
of the chain or belt
T8 Aerodynamic Devices
T7.3.4 The tractive electric motor(s) must have a housing or separate scatter shield from non-
perforated 2 mm aluminium alloy 6061-T6 or equivalent. The scatter shield may be split into
two equal sections, each 1 mm thick.
T7.3.5 Finger guards are required to cover any parts that spin while the vehicle is stationary. Finger
guards may be made of lighter material, sufficient to resist finger forces. Mesh or perforated
material may be used but must prevent the passage of a 12 mm diameter object through the
guard.
T 8 A ERODYNAMIC DEVICES
T8.1 Definition Aerodynamic Device
T8.1.1 A specifically designed structure mounted on the vehicle to guide the airflow around the
vehicle, increasing the downforce acting on the vehicle and/or lowering its drag. The
mounting of this structure is not regarded as an aerodynamic device, unless it is intentionally
designed to be one.
T8.2 Restrictions for Aerodynamic Devices
T8.2.1 Height restrictions:
-All aerodynamic devices forward of a vertical plane through the rearmost portion of
the front face of the driver head restraint support, excluding any padding, set to its
most rearward position, must be lower than 500 mm from the ground.
-All aerodynamic devices in front of the front axle and extending further outboard than
the most inboard point of the front tire/wheel must be lower than 250 mm from the
ground.
-All aerodynamic devices rearward of a vertical plane through the rearmost portion of
the front face of the driver head restraint support, excluding any padding, set to its
most rearward position must be lower than 1 .2 m from the ground.
T8.2.2 Width restrictions:
-All aerodynamic devices lower than 500 mm from the ground and further rearward
than the front axle, must not be wider than a vertical plane touching the most outboard
point of the front and rear wheel/tire.
-All aerodynamic devices higher than 500 mm from the ground, must not extend
outboard of the most inboard point of the rear wheel/tire.
T8.2.3 Length restrictions:
-All aerodynamic devices must not extend further rearward than 250 mm from the
rearmost part of the rear tires.
-All aerodynamic devices must not extend further forward than 700 mm from the fronts
of the front tires.
T8.2.4 All restrictions must be fulfilled with the wheels pointing straight and with any suspension
setup with or without a driver seated in the vehicle.
T9 Critical Components
250 mm
min. Ground Clearance 30 mm1200 mm
250 mm
500 mmbelow 500 mm
above 500 mmReference Point
700 mm
Figure 14: Maximum dimensions and positioning of aerodynamic devices. The positioning
space is further restricted, see T2.1.
T8.3 Aerodynamic Devices Stability and Strength
T8.3.1 Any aerodynamic device must be able to withstand a force of 200 N distributed over a
minimum surface of 225 cm2and not deflect more than 10 mm in the load carrying direction.
T8.3.2 Any aerodynamic device must be able to withstand a force of 50 N applied in any direction
at any point and not deflect more than 25 mm.
T 9 C RITICAL COMPONENTS
T9.1 Compressed Gas Systems
T9.1.1 Compressed Gas System (CGS) – any system that uses a compressed gas as an actuating
medium, except for gas springs.
T9.1.2 The working gas of any CGS must be non-flammable.
T9.1.3 The pressure inside any CGS must not exceed 10 bar . Gas cylinders/tanks may exceed the
10 bar limit, if a pressure regulator which limits the output pressure to a maximum of 10 bar
is mounted directly onto them.
T9.1.4 All parts of any CGS must be designed for the maximum possible operating pressure.
T9.1.5 Gas cylinders/tanks and their pressure regulators must be of proprietary manufacture, certified
and labeled as such.
T10 Fasteners
T9.1.6 The pressure in the function critical part of any CGS required to ensure the functionality of
the Autonomous System Brake (ASB), see T15, must be limited by means of an overpressure
protection, if compressed gas cylinders/tanks exceed the pressure threshold as defined in
T9.1.3.
T9.1.7 All parts of any CGS and their mountings must be located within the rollover protection
envelope, see T1.1.16 and must be protected from collision or damage.
T9.1.8 Gas cylinders/tanks must be mounted according to T9.3.1 and their axis must not point at
the driver.
T9.1.9 Gas cylinders/tanks and their pressure regulators must be shielded from the driver. The
shields must be steel or aluminium with a minimum thickness of 1 mm.
T9.1.10 Gas cylinders/tanks must be insulated from any heat sources.
T9.2 High Pressure Hydraulic Pumps and Lines
T9.2.1 The driver and anyone standing outside the vehicle must be shielded from any hydraulic
pumps and lines with line pressures of 2100 kPa or higher. The shields must be steel or
aluminium with a minimum thickness of 1 mm . Brake lines are not considered as high
pressure hydraulic lines.
T9.3 Critical Component Mounting
T9.3.1 Critical components themselves and their mountings must be able to withstand the following
accelerations:
- 40 g in the longitudinal direction (forward/aft)
- 40 g in the lateral direction (left/right)
- 20 g in the vertical direction (up/down)
T 10 F ASTENERS
T10.1 Critical Fasteners
T10.1.1 Critical fasteners are defined as bolts, nuts, and other fasteners utilized in the primary
structure, the steering, braking, driver’s harness, suspension systems and those specifically
designated as critical fasteners in the respective rule.
T10.1.2 All threaded critical fasteners must be at least 4 mm metric grade 8.8(OEM parts 3 mm
metric grade 8.8), equivalent size or of that specified in the referencing rule, whichever is
larger.
T10.1.3 All threaded critical fasteners must be of the type hexagon bolts (ISO 4017, ISO 4014 or
an equivalent standard.) or socket head cap screws (ISO 4762, DIN 7984, ISO 7379 or an
equivalent standard.) including their fine-pitch thread versions.
T10.1.4 Any bolted joint in the primary structure and mounting of the TSAC to the chassis using
either tabs or brackets, must have an edge distance ratio “e/D” of 1.5or greater. “D” equals
T11 Electrical Components
the hole diameter and “e” equals the distance from the hole centerline to the nearest free
edge of the tab or bracket. Any tabs attaching suspension members to the primary structure
are not required to meet this rule.
T10.1.5 For steering and suspension systems, alternative fasteners are allowed if equivalency to
T10.1.2 and T10.1.3 can be shown.
T10.2 Securing Fasteners
T10.2.1 All critical fasteners must be secured from unintentional loosening by the use of positive
locking mechanisms.
T10.2.2 The following methods are accepted as positive locking mechanisms:
- Correctly installed safety wiring.
- Cotter pins.
-Nylon lock nuts (ISO 7040, ISO 10512, EN 1663 or an equivalent standard) for
locations where no temperature rating above 80◦C is required.
-Prevailing torque lock nuts (DIN 980, ISO 7042 or an equivalent standard, and jet nuts
or K-nuts).
- Locking plates.
- Tab washers.
Any locking mechanism based on pre-tensioning or an adhesive is not considered a positive
locking mechanism.
T10.2.3 Snap or retaining rings according to DIN 471, DIN 472, or equivalent standard are allowed
in OEM applications or for securing bearings or springs or brake disc floaters given that
they do not bear any loads under normal driving conditions. The groove must be in pristine
condition and manufactured according to the standard of the snap or retaining ring.
T10.2.4 A minimum of two full threads must project from any lock nut.
T10.2.5 All spherical rod ends and spherical bearings on the steering or suspension must be in double
shear or captured by having a screw/bolt head or washer with an outer diameter that is larger
than the spherical bearing housing inner diameter.
T10.2.6 Adjustable tie-rod ends must be constrained with a jam nut to prevent loosening.
T 11 E LECTRICAL COMPONENTS
T11.1 Low Voltage System
T11.1.1 The Low V oltage System (LVS) is defined as
- [CV ONLY ] all electrical circuits of the vehicle.
- [EV ONLY ] every electrical part that is not part of the TS, see EV1.1.1
T11.1.2 The maximum allowed voltage that may occur between any two electrical connections in the
LVS is 60 VDC or 50 VACRMS.
T11 Electrical Components
T11.1.3 All LVS parts must be adequately insulated.
T11.1.4 [CV ONLY ] The following systems are excluded from the LVS voltage limit, see T11.1.2:
- High voltage systems for ignition
- High voltage systems for injectors
- V oltages internal to OEM charging systems designed for <60 VDC output.
T11.1.5 [CV ONLY ]The maximum allowed voltage for motor controller/inverters internal low power
control signals is 75 VDC
T11.1.6 [EV ONLY ] The LVS must not use orange wiring or conduit.
T11.1.7 [EV ONLY ] The LVS must be grounded to the chassis.
T11.2 Master Switches
T11.2.1 Master switches, see T11.3,EV6 .2, and T14.5, must be a mechanical switch of the rotary
type, with a red, removable handle. The handle must have a width of at least 50 mm and
must only be removable in electrically open position. They must be direct acting, i.e. they
must not act through a relay or logic.
T11.2.2 Master switches must be located on the right side of the vehicle, in proximity to the main
hoop, at the 95thpercentile male driver’s shoulder height, as defined in T4.3, and be easily
actuated from outside the vehicle.
The center of any master switch must not be mounted lower than the vertical distance of the
template’s, see T4.3, middle circle center to the ground surface multiplied by 0 .8.
T11.2.3 The “ON” position of the switch must be in the horizontal position and must be marked
accordingly. The “OFF” position of the master switch must also be clearly marked.
T11.2.4 Master switches must be rigidly mounted to the vehicle and must not be removed during
maintenance.
T11.2.5 Master switches must be mounted next to each other.
T11.3 Low Voltage Master Switch
T11.3.1 An LVMS according to T11.2 must completely disable
- [EV ONLY ] power to the LVS
- [CV ONLY ] power from the Low V oltage (LV) battery and the alternator to the LVS
T11.3.2 The LVMS must be mounted in the middle of a completely red circular area of ≥50 mm
diameter placed on a high contrast background.
T11.3.3 The LVMS must be marked with “LV” and a symbol showing a red spark in a white edged
blue triangle.
T11 Electrical Components
T11.4 Shutdown Buttons
T11.4.1 A system of three shutdown buttons must be installed on the vehicle.
T11.4.2 Each shutdown button must be a push-pull or push-rotate mechanical emergency switch
where pushing the button opens the SDC, see EV6.1 and CV4.1.
T11.4.3 One button must be located on each side of the vehicle behind the driver’s compartment at
approximately the level of the driver’s head. The minimum allowed diameter of the shutdown
buttons on both sides of the vehicle is 40 mm .The buttons must be easy reachable from
outside the vehicle.
T11.4.4 One shutdown button serves as a cockpit-mounted shutdown button and must:
- Have a minimum diameter of 24 mm.
- Be located in easy reach of a belted-in driver.
-Be alongside of the steering wheel and unobstructed by the steering wheel or any other
part of the vehicle.
T11.4.5 The international electrical symbol consisting of a red spark on a white-edged blue triangle
must be affixed in close proximity to each shutdown button.
T11.4.6 Shutdown buttons must be rigidly mounted to the vehicle and must not be removed during
maintenance.
T11.4.7 Shutdown buttons must be red.
T11.5 Inertia Switch
T11.5.1 An inertia switch must be part of the SDC, see CV4 .1 and EV6 .1, such that an impact will
result in the SDC being opened. The inertia switch must latch until manually reset.
T11.5.2 The device must trigger due to an omnidirectional peak acceleration of ≤8 gfor a half sine
test pulse of ≥50 ms length and ≤13 g for a half sine test pulse of ≥20 ms length. The
“Sensata Resettable Crash Sensor” should meet those requirements.
T11.5.3 The device must not include any semiconductor components.
T11.5.4 The device must be rigidly attached and installed according to manufacturer specification to
the vehicle. It must be possible to demount the device so that its functionality may be tested
by shaking it.
T11.6 Brake System Plausibility Device
T11.6.1 A standalone non-programmable circuit, the BSPD, must open the SDC, see EV6 .1 and
CV4.1, when hard braking occurs, whilst
- [EV ONLY ]≥5 kW power is delivered to the motors.
- [CV ONLY ] the throttle position is more than 25 % over idle position.
The SDC must remain open until power cycling the LVMS or the BSPD may reset itself if
the opening condition is no longer present for more than 10 s.
T11 Electrical Components
T11.6.2 The action of opening the SDC must occur if the implausibility is persistent for more than
500 ms.
T11.6.3 The BSPD must be directly supplied, see T1.3.1, from the LVMS, see T11.3.
T11.6.4 Standalone is defined as there is no additional functionality implemented on all required
PCBs. The interfaces must be reduced to the minimum necessary signals, i.e. power supply,
required sensors and the SDC. Supply and sensor signals must not be routed through any
other devices before entering the BSPD.
T11.6.5 To detect hard braking, a brake system pressure sensor must be used. The threshold must be
chosen such that there are no locked wheels and the brake pressure is ≤30 bar.
T11.6.6 [EV ONLY ]To measure power delivery, a DC circuit current sensor only must be used. The
threshold must be chosen to an equivalent of ≤5 kW for maximum TS voltage.
T11.6.7 It must be possible to separately disconnect each sensor signal wire for technical inspection.
T11.6.8 All necessary signals are System Critical Signal (SCS), see T11.9.
T11.6.9 [EV ONLY ]The BSPD including all required sensors must not be installed inside the TSAC.
T11.7 Low Voltage Batteries
T11.7.1 LV batteries are all batteries connected to the LVS.
T11.7.2 LV batteries must be securely attached to the chassis and located within the rollover protection
envelope, see T1.1.16.
T11.7.3 Any wet-cell battery located in the cockpit must be enclosed in a non-conductive, water
proof (according to IPX7 or higher, IEC 60529) and acid resistant container.
T11.7.4 LV batteries must have a rigid and sturdy casing.
T11.7.5 Completely closed LV battery cases must have an overpressure relief. Venting gases must be
separated from the driver by a firewall.
T11.7.6 LV batteries must be protected from short circuits, not more than 100 mm from ungrounded
terminals.
T11.7.7 Battery packs based on lithium chemistry other than lithium iron phosphate (LiFePO 4) and
all hybrid system energy storages regardless of chemistry type:
- Must have a fire retardant casing, see T1.2.1.
-Must include overcurrent protection that trips at or below the maximum specified
discharge current of the cells.
-Must include overtemperature protection of at least 30 % of the cells, meeting EV5 .8.4,
that trips when any cell leaves the allowed temperature range according to the manu-
facturer’s datasheet, but not more than 60◦C, for more than 1 sand disconnects the
battery.
-Must include voltage protection of all cells that trips when any cell leaves the allowed
voltage range according to the manufacturer’s datasheet for more than 500 ms and
disconnects the battery.
T11 Electrical Components
-It must be possible to display all cell voltages and measured temperatures, e.g. by
connecting a laptop.
- Must meet EV5.8.11
- Signals needed to fulfill these requirements are SCS, see T11.9.
T11.8 Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor
T11.8.1 T11.8 only applies for EVs or CVs using ETC.
T11.8.2 The APPS must be actuated by a foot pedal.
T11.8.3 Pedal travel is defined as percentage of travel from fully released position to a fully applied
position where 0 % is fully released and 100 % is fully applied.
T11.8.4 The foot pedal must return to the 0 %position when not actuated. The foot pedal must have
a positive stop preventing the mounted sensors from being damaged or overstressed. Two
springs must be used to return the foot pedal to the 0 %position and each spring must work
when the other is disconnected. Springs in the APPS are not accepted as return springs.
T11.8.5 At least two separate sensors must be used as APPSs. The sensors may share the housing.
T11.8.6 If analog sensors are used, they must have different, non-intersecting transfer functions. A
short circuit between the signal lines must always result in an implausibility according to
T11.8.9.
T11.8.7 The APPS signals are SCSs, see T11.9.
T11.8.8 If an implausibility occurs between the values of the APPSs and persists for more than
100 ms
-[EV ONLY ]The power to the motor(s) must be immediately shut down completely.
It is not necessary to completely deactivate the TS, the motor controller(s) shutting
down the power to the motor(s) is sufficient.
- [CV ONLY ] The power to the electronic throttle must be immediately shut down.
T11.8.9 Implausibility is defined as a deviation of more than ten percentage points pedal travel
between any of the used APPSs or any failure according to T11.9.
T11.8.10 If three sensors are used, then in the case of an APPS implausibility, any two sensors that are
plausible may be used to define the torque target and the 3rd APPS may be ignored.
T11.8.11 It must be possible to separately disconnect each APPS signal wire to check all functionalities.
T11.8.12 A fully released accelerator pedal in manual mode must result in:
- [EV ONLY ] A wheel torque of ≤0 Nm
-[CV ONLY ]An idle position or lower throttle set-point. This may only be exceeded
during a gearshift for a maximum of 500 ms.
T11.9 System Critical Signal
T11.9.1 SCS are defined as all electrical signals which
T11 Electrical Components
- Influence actions on the SDC, see CV4.1 and EV6.1.
- Influence the wheel torque.
- [EV ONLY ] Influence indicators according to EV5.8.9, EV4.10 or EV6.3.8.
T11.9.2 Any of the following SCS single failures must result in a safe state of all connected systems:
(a) Failures of signals transmitted by cable:
- Open circuit
- Short circuit to ground
(b) Failures of analog sensor signals transmitted by cable:
- Short circuit to supply voltage
(c) Failures of sensor signals used in programmable devices:
-Implausibility due to out of range signals, e.g. mechanically impossible angle of
an angle sensor.
(d) Failures of digitally transmitted signals by cable or wireless:
- Data corruption (e.g. checked by a checksum)
- Loss and delay of messages (e.g. checked by transmission time outs)
Signals might be a member of multiple signal classes, e.g. analog signals transmitted by
cable might be a member of T11.9.2.a, T11.9.2.b and T11.9.2.c.
T11.9.3 If a signal failure is correctable, e.g. due to redundancy or worst case values, the safe state
must be entered as soon as an additional non correctable failure occurs.
T11.9.4 The maximum allowed delay of messages according to T11.9.2.d must be chosen depending
on the impact of delayed messages to the connected system, but must not exceed 500 ms.
T11.9.5 Safe state is defined depending on the signals as follows:
-signals only influencing indicators – Indicating a failure of its own function or of the
connected system
-LV battery signals – At least one pole is electrically disconnected from the rest of the
vehicle
- ASSI, see T14.9 – indicating “AS Off”
- [EV ONLY ] For all others signals – opened SDC and opened AIRs
- [CV ONLY ] For all others signals – opened SDC and stopped engine
T11.9.6 Indicators according to T11.9.1 with safe state “illuminated” (e.g. absence of failures is not
actively indicated) must be illuminated for 1 s to 3 s for visible check after power cycling the
LVMS.
T11.10 System status light
T11.10.1 Any system status light(s), see T6.3 and T14.9, must meet the following requirements:
- Black background.
T12 Vehicle Identification
- Rectangular, triangular or near round shape.
- Minimum illuminated surface of 15 cm2with even luminous intensity.
- Clearly visible in very bright sunlight.
- If LED lights are used without a diffuser, they must not be more than 20 mm apart.
- If a single line of LED lights is used, the minimum length is 150 mm.
T11.11 Fans and Turbines
T11.11.1 The maximum total power of any active devices designed to move air is 500 W , this does not
apply to CV1.8.
T11.12 Sensors, Cameras & Electrical Components Mounting
T11.12.1 All sensors, cameras and components must be securely mounted.
T11.12.2 Sensors, cameras and components must not come into contact with the driver’s helmet under
any circumstances.
T11.12.3 All sensors, cameras and components must be positioned within the surface envelope,
see T1.1.18, or within the box defined in T8.2.
T11.12.4 Passive antennas which do not incorporate active electronic parts, e.g. amplifiers with the
longest side < 100 mm may additionally to T11.12.3 protrude from the surface envelope,
see T1.1.18, but not their mounting.
T11.13 Legal & Work Safety
T11.13.1 All sensors must fulfill the local legislative specifications (i.e. eye-protection classification
for laser sensors, power limitation for radar sensors, etc.) in the country of competition.
T 12 V EHICLE IDENTIFICATION
T12.1 Vehicle Number
T12.1.1 Each vehicle will be assigned a number at the time of its entry into a competition.
T12.1.2 Vehicle numbers must appear on the vehicle at the front and both sides as follows:
- Height: At least 150 mm high;
-Font: Roman Sans-Serif characters. Italic, outline, serif, or shadow numbers are
prohibited.
- Stroke width and spacing between numbers: At least 20 mm.
-Color: Either white numbers on a black background or black numbers on a white
background.
T13 Vehicle and Driver Equipment
-Background shape: The number background must be one of the following: round,
oval, square or rectangular. There must be at least 25 mm between the edge of the
numbers and the edge of the background.
- Clear: The numbers must not be obscured by parts of the vehicle.
-Alignment: In front view the number at the front and in side view the numbers on the
sides must be horizontally aligned.
T12.2 Hybrid Vehicle Identification
T12.2.1 Combustion Hybrid Vehicles have to be identified by an additional marking next to all three
vehicle numbers with the capital letters “HY” in Roman Sans-Serif characters at least 75 mm
high in white on a red background.
T12.3 University Name
T12.3.1 The university name must be written fully. Only the following abbreviations in the university
name are allowed, if the city name is written fully:
- University →Uni
- Technical University →TU
- University of Applied Sciences →UAS
- Berufsakademie →BA
-If the university officially uses an abbreviation in their proper name, this abbreviation
is allowed.
T12.3.2 The university name must be displayed and written in Roman Sans-Serif characters of at
least 50 mm high on both sides of the vehicle.
T12.3.3 The characters must be clearly visible at a distance and placed on a high contrast background.
T12.4 Timing Equipment
T12.4.1 All vehicles will get timing equipment provided by the competition organizers.
T 13 V EHICLE AND DRIVER EQUIPMENT
T13.1 Push Bar
T13.1.1 Each team must have a removable device (called the push bar) that attaches to the rear of the
vehicle and allows two people to push and pull the vehicle while standing erect behind the
vehicle.
T13.1.2 The push bar must have a red color.
T13.1.3 The university name must be written on the push bar. The characters must be clearly visible
and placed on a high contrast background.
T13 Vehicle and Driver Equipment
T13.1.4 The push bar must be capable of slowing and stopping the forward motion of the vehicle and
pulling it rearwards.
T13.1.5 [CV ONLY ]An approved fire extinguisher, see T13.4.1, must be mounted to the push bar
such that it is quickly accessible.
T13.1.6 [EV ONLY ]Two pairs of high-voltage insulating gloves and a multimeter with two 4 mm
banana plug test leads rated for 600 V CAT III or better must be attached to the push bar. The
High V oltage (HV) gloves must be protected by a case or similar means from mechanical
damage, humidity and sunlight. It must be possible to open the case without using tools.
T13.2 Jacks
T13.2.1 Each team must have one or two removable devices (jacks) that hold the vehicle, so that all
driven wheels are at least 100 mm off the ground.
T13.2.2 Lifting the vehicle and positioning of the device(s) must be done by the team in a safe way.
T13.2.3 In lifted position:
- The vehicle must be adequately supported and stable.
- It must be safe for a driver to enter and exit the vehicle, without additional devices.
- The device(s) must not extend out of the vehicles projected surface area.
T13.2.4 On both sides of the vehicle the devices pickup points must be indicated by orange triangles.
T13.2.5 The university name must be written on the jacks. The characters must be clearly visible and
placed on a high contrast background.
T13.3 Driver Equipment
T13.3.1 The equipment specified below must be worn by the driver anytime while in the cockpit with
the engine running or with the TS active for electric vehicles and anytime between starting a
dynamic event and either finishing or abandoning a dynamic event. Removal of any driver
equipment during the event will result in disqualified (DQ).
T13.3.2 A well-fitting, closed face helmet that meets one of the following certifications and is labeled
as such:
- Snell SA2020, EA2016, SA2025 or newer
- SFI 31.1/2015, 31.1/2020 or newer
- FIA 8860-2010, FIA 8860-2018, FIA 8859-2015, 8859-2024 or newer
Open faced helmets and off-road helmets (helmets without integrated eye shields) are not
approved. All helmets to be used in the competition must be presented during technical
inspection where approved helmets will be stickered.
T13.3.3 If Frontal Head Restraint systems (FHR, HANS) are used, they must be certified to one of
the following standards and be labeled as such:
- FIA 8858-2010
T13 Vehicle and Driver Equipment
- FIA 8860-2004
- SFI 38.1
T13.3.4 A balaclava which covers the driver’s head, hair and neck, made from acceptable fire resistant
material as defined in T13.3.13, or a full helmet skirt of acceptable fire resistant material.
T13.3.5 A fire resistant one piece suit, made from a minimum of two layers that covers the body from
the neck down to the ankles and the wrists. The suit must be certified to one of the following
standards and be labeled as such:
- SFI 3.2A/5 (or higher)
- SFI 3.4/5 (or higher)
- FIA Standard 8856-2000
- FIA Standard 8856-2018
T13.3.6 Fire resistant underwear (long pants and long sleeve t-shirt). This fire resistant underwear
must be made from acceptable fire resistant material as listed in T13.3.13 and must cover
the driver’s body completely from neck down to ankles and wrists.
T13.3.7 Fire resistant socks made from acceptable fire resistant material as defined in T13.3.13, that
cover the bare skin between the driver’s suit and the boots or shoes.
T13.3.8 Fire resistant shoes made from acceptable fire resistant material as defined in T13.3.13. The
shoes must be certified to the standard and labeled as such:
- SFI Spec 3.3
- FIA Standard 8856-2000
- FIA Standard 8856-2018
T13.3.9 Fire resistant gloves made from acceptable fire resistant material as defined in T13.3.13.
Gloves of all leather construction or fire resistant gloves constructed using leather palms
with no insulating fire resisting material underneath are not allowed.
T13.3.10 Fire resistant clothing must not be older than 10years, recognizable since no FIA hologram
label present.
T13.3.11 Arm restraints are required and must be worn such that the driver can release them and
exit the vehicle unassisted regardless of the vehicle’s position. Arm restraints must be
commercially manufactured according to SFI Standard 3.3 or equivalent.
T13.3.12 All driver equipment covered in T13.3: must be in good condition. Specifically, it must not
have any tears, rips, open seams, areas of significant wear or abrasion or stains which might
compromise fire resistant performance. Teams must be able to show that the clothing still
meets the requirements of T13.3 if driver’s clothing is embroidered. This requires, but is not
limited to, that only the outer shell is perforated. The officials reserve the right to impound
all non-approved driver equipment until the end of the competition.
T13.3.13 For the purpose of this section some, but not all, of the approved fire resistant materials are:
Nomex, Aramid, Belcotex and Indura.
T13.3.14 T-shirts, socks or other undergarments made from nylon or any other synthetic material
which will melt when exposed to high heat are prohibited.
T14 Autonomous System
T13.4 Fire Extinguishers
T13.4.1 Each team must have at least two foam type fire extinguishers with valid inspection tag.
T13.4.2 Fire extinguishers must have a rating of at least:
- USA, Canada and Brazil: 10BC or 1A 10BC
- Europe: 34B or 5A 34B
- Australia: 20BE or 1A 10BE
T13.4.3 Except for the initial inspection, one extinguisher must readily be available in the team’s
paddock area.
T 14 A UTONOMOUS SYSTEM
T14.1 Definitions
T14.1.1 Each vehicle must implement a full AS according to T14, to run in autonomous mode.
T14.1.2 [CV ONLY ] The following definitions apply to maintain the same wording as for EVs:
- Ready-to-drive (R2D) – engine is running and a gear is engaged.
-TS active – engine is running but gearbox is in neutral, also assumed for TS not active.
- TS activation button – the engine start button is the equivalent.
-Accumulator Isolation Relay (AIR) - the fuel pump relay, see figure 19, is the equiva-
lent.
T14.2 Data Logger
T14.2.1 The officials will provide a standardized data logger that must be installed during the
competition. Further specifications for the data logger and required hardware and software
interfaces can be found in the competition handbook.
T14.2.2 The team needs to provide two sets of signals to the data logger:
- Basic set of signals as defined in the competition handbook
-Vehicle-individual set of signals that is monitored by the ASB to ensure redundancy
and fault detection
T14.2.3 [CV ONLY ] The mounting of the data logger must be sealed during technical inspection.
T14.3 Remote Emergency System
T14.3.1 Every vehicle must be equipped with a standard RES specified in the competition handbook.
The system consists of two parts, the remote control and the vehicle module.
T14.3.2 The RES must be purchased by the team.
T14.3.3 The RES has two functions:
T14 Autonomous System
-When the remote emergency stop button is pressed, it must open the SDC defined in
T14.4.
- When the “Go” button is pressed, the preselected autonomous mission is started.
T14.3.4 The RES vehicle module must be directly, see T1.3.1, integrated in the vehicle’s SDC with
one of its relays hard-wired in series to the shutdown buttons.
T14.3.5 The RES relay, which is integrated into the SDC, must be bypassed by a normally closed
relays, when driving manually. The relay must:
- Be directly supplied, see T1.3.1, by the ASMS, see T14.5.
-Have a safety certified forcibly guided or a mirrored normally open contact which is
directly connected, see T1.3.1, in series to the ASMS.
T14.3.6 The antenna of the RES must be mounted unobstructed and without interfering parts in
proximity, e.g. other antennas, etc.
T14.4 Shutdown Circuit
T14.4.1 The SDC may only be closed by the AS, if the following conditions are fulfilled:
-Manual Driving: Manual Mission is selected, the AS has checked that ASB is deacti-
vated,i.e. No autonomous brake actuation possible.
-Autonomous Driving: Autonomous Mission is selected, ASMS is switched on and
sufficient brake pressure is built up,i.e.brakes are closed.
T14.5 Autonomous System Master Switch
T14.5.1 Each vehicle must be equipped with an ASMS, according to T11.2.
T14.5.2 The ASMS must be mounted in the middle of a completely blue circular area of ≥50 mm
diameter placed on a high contrast background.
T14.5.3 The ASMS must be marked with “AS”.
T14.5.4 The power supply of the steering and braking actuators must be switched by
- LVMS
- ASMS
- The normally open contact of the relay according to T14.3.5
Other than stated in T11.2.1, non-programmable logic may be used as part of the ASMS.
T14.5.5 When the ASMS is in “Off” position, the following must be fulfilled:
-No steering, braking and propulsion actuation can be performed by request of the
autonomous system.
- The sensors and the processing units can stay operational.
- The vehicle must be able to be pushed as specified in A6.6.
- It must be possible to operate the vehicle manually as a normal CV or EV.
T14 Autonomous System
T14.5.6 It is strictly forbidden to switch the ASMS to the “On” position if a person is inside the
vehicle.
T14.5.7 After switching the ASMS to the “On” position, the vehicle must not start moving, until
R2D mode is entered, see Figure 15.
T14.5.8 The ASMS must be fitted with a “lockout/tagout” capability to prevent accidental activation
of the AS. The ASR must ensure that the ASMS is locked in the off position whenever the
vehicle is outside the dynamic area or driven in manual mode.
T14.6 Steering Actuation
T14.6.1 Steering system actuation, i.e. movement, must only happen if the vehicle is in R2D mode.
T14.6.2 The steering system may remain active during an emergency brake maneuver while the
vehicle is in movement.
T14.6.3 Manual steering must be possible without manual release steps, e.g. operating manual valves
and/or (dis-) connecting mechanical elements, while the ASMS is switched “Off”.
T14.7 Actuator Decoupling
T14.7.1 It is not allowed to remove any parts of the ASfor dynamic events.
T14.7.2 The actuators may be disconnected for manual driving if:
-no parts including bolts, clips, etc. are removed for disconnection i.e. they must never
loose the physical contact to the disconnection mechanism.
- the disconnection mechanism cannot block manual operation in any position.
- the disconnection mechanism is securely locked in both positions.
T14.8 Autonomous System Status Definitions
T14.8.1 The Emergency Brake System (EBS) is considered to be “activated”, if the power supply
path defined in T15.2.2 is cut after passing the initial checkup sequence, see T15.3.1. Brakes
may only be released by operating the deactivation point(s) defined in T15.1.7.
T14.8.2 The EBS is no longer considered to be activated, if all brakes have been released using the
deactivation point(s) defined in T15.1.7.
T14.8.3 The status of the AS must be determined according to the flowchart in Figure 15.
T14.8.4 R2D mode may only be entered by the “Go” signal from the RES, after the system has
remained in “AS Ready” for at least 5 s.
T14.8.5 Performing manual steps, other than activating the TS, at the vehicle while the ASMS is
switched “On” is prohibited.
T14 Autonomous System
EBS activated?no yes
Mission Selected
andASMS On
andASB checks OK
andTS Active?no yes
AS Off
R2D?no yes
Brakes engaged?no yes
AS Off AS ReadyAS DrivingMission finished
andVehicle
at Standstill?no yes
AS Emergency
SDC open
at RES?no yes
AS Finished AS Emergency
Figure 15: AS Status Flowchart
T14.9 Autonomous System Status Indicators
T14.9.1 The vehicle must include three ASSIs that must indicate the status of the AS, as defined in
T14.8, correlating to illumination as shown:
AS Off AS Ready AS Driving AS Emergency AS Finished
off yellow continuous yellow flashing blue flashing blue continuous
The ASSIs must not perform any other functions.
T14.9.2 One ASSI must be located on each side of the vehicle behind the driver’s compartment, in
a region 160 mm below the top of the main hoop and 600 mm above the ground. The third
ASSI must be located at the rear of the vehicle, on the vehicle centerline, in a region 160 mm
below the top of the main hoop and 100 mm above the brake light.
T14.9.3 At least one ASSI must be visible from any angle of the vehicle from a point 1.60 m vertically
from ground level, within 3 m horizontal radius from the top of the main hoop.
T14.9.4 Each ASSI must meet requirements according to T11.10.
T14.9.5 The status “AS Emergency” has to be indicated by an intermittent sound with the following
parameters:
- on-/off-frequency: 1 Hz to 5 Hz
- duty cycle 50 %
-sound level between 80 dBA and90 dBA , fast weighting in a radius of 2 maround the
vehicle.
- duration between 8 s and 10 s after entering “AS Emergency”
T14.10 Autonomous Missions
T14.10.1 The AS must at least implement the following missions:
- Acceleration
T15 Autonomous System Brake
- Skidpad
- [DC ONLY ] Autocross
- [DC ONLY ] Trackdrive
- EBS test
- Inspection
- Manual driving
T14.10.2 The inspection mission is defined by slowly spinning the drivetrain and actuating the steering
system with a sine wave while the vehicle is jacked up and all wheels are removed. After
25 s to 30 s the AS must transition to “AS Finished”.
T14.10.3 It must be possible to select any mission without the use of an external device.
T14.10.4 The selected mission must be indicated by the Autonomous Mission Indicator (AMI).
T14.10.5 The AMI must be easily readable and can either be part of the dashboard or located next to
the ASMS. If an e-ink display is used, it must be visible that the shown mission is up-to-date.
AMI is considered SCS!
T14.11 Autonomous System Form
T14.11.1 Before the competition, all teams must submit a clearly structured documentation of their
entire AS, including ASB, called ASF.
T 15 A UTONOMOUS SYSTEM BRAKE
T15.1 Technical Requirements
T15.1.1 To run in autonomous mode, the vehicle must be equipped with an ASB that features an EBS
as part of it, see T15.2.
T15.1.2 All parts of the ASB and their mountings must be located within the rollover protection
envelope, see T1.1.16, with the following exceptions:
- brake system according to T6
- deactivation point(s) according to T15.1.8
T15.1.3 The TS is not considered to be a brake system.
T15.1.4 Manual braking must always be possible. In case of manual and autonomous braking
simultaneously, always the highest of both pressures must be applied to the brakes.
T15.1.5 Master brake cylinders must not be connected in series.
T15.1.6 The ASB may be part of the hydraulic brake system. For all components inside the vehicles
brake circuit T6is applied. On all remaining pneumatic and hydraulic components T9
applies.
T15.1.7 The ASB must be designed so that it can be easily deactivated by a maximum of two
deactivation points.
T15 Autonomous System Brake
T15.1.8 All deactivation points of the ASB must:
- work without the aid of electrical power
- be in proximity to each other
- be mounted in the surface envelope, see T1.1.18
-either be mounted in proximity to the ASMS or on the top side of the vehicle between
front bulkhead and front hoop close to the vehicles center line
- be protected against unintended actuation, e.g. by being hit by a cone, while driving
-be operable by maximum two simple push/pull and/or turning actions, the order and
direction of these actions must be shown next to the deactivation points.
- be marked with “Brake release”
- have a red handle
T15.1.9 The use of push-in fittings is prohibited in function critical pneumatic circuits of the ASB
and any other system which uses the same energy storage without proper decoupling.
T15.2 Emergency Brake System
T15.2.1 The EBS must only use passive systems with mechanical energy storage. Electrical power-
loss at EBS must lead to a direct emergency brake maneuver with the performance specified
in T15.4.
T15.2.2 The EBS must be directly supplied, see T1.3.1, by LVMS, ASMS, RES and a relay which is
supplied by the SDC, parallel to the AIRs, but must not be delayed.
T15.3 Functional Safety
T15.3.1 An initial check has to be performed to ensure that ASB is able to build up brake pressure as
expected, before AS transitions to “AS Ready”.
T15.3.2 After the initial check the ASB and its SCS must be continuously monitored for failures.
T15.3.3 The vehicle must automatically transition to the safe state, if:
- the functionality according to T15.2.1 cannot be ensured.
- an (additional) single point of failure would lead to total loss of brake capability.
T15.3.4 The safe state is the vehicle at a standstill, brakes engaged to prevent the vehicle from rolling,
and an open SDC.
T15.3.5 To get to the safe state, the vehicle must perform an autonomous brake maneuver described
in section T15.4 and IN11.2.
T15.4 Emergency Brake System Performance
T15.4.1 The system reaction time, the time between opening of the SDC and the start of the decelera-
tion, must not exceed 200 ms.
T15 Autonomous System Brake
T15.4.2 The average deceleration must be greater than 10m/s2under dry track conditions.
T15.4.3 In case of a single failure the ASB should be designed to achieve at least half of the
performance specified in T15.4.2.
T15.4.4 Whilst decelerating, the vehicle must remain in a stable driving condition.

CV I NTERNAL COMBUSTION ENGINE
VEHICLES
CV 1 I NTERNAL COMBUSTION ENGINE POWERTRAINS
CV1.1 Engine Limitation
CV1.1.1 The engine(s) used to power the vehicle must be piston engine(s) using a four-stroke primary
heat cycle with a displacement not exceeding 710 cm3per cycle. Hybrid powertrains must
use a purely electrical energy storage.
CV1.2 Starter
CV1.2.1 Each vehicle must be equipped with an on-board starter, which must be used to start the
vehicle.
CV1.2.2 For autonomous operation, the vehicle must be equipped with an additional engine start
button next to the LVMS, see T11.3, that can be easily actuated from outside the vehicle.
Using the external engine start button, the engine may only start if
- the ASMS, see T14.5, is switched on and
- the gearbox is in neutral.
CV1.2.3 IfCV1 .2.2 requires an additional engine start button, there must be a green light next to it,
that indicates that the gearbox is in neutral. It must be marked with the letter “N”. This letter
must have a minimum height of 25 mm.
CV1.2.4 The AS must not be able to (re-)start the engine.
CV1.3 Air Intake System
CV1.3.1 All parts of the engine air and fuel control systems (including the throttle and the complete air
intake system, including the air filter and any air boxes) must lie within the surface envelope,
see T1.1.18.
CV1.3.2 Any portion of the air intake system that is less than 350 mm above the ground must be
protected from impacts, see T3.14. Impact protection must follow T3.15 when having bolted
attachments.
CV1.3.3 The intake manifold must be securely attached to the engine block or cylinder head with
brackets and mechanical fasteners. The threaded fasteners used to secure the intake manifold
are considered critical fasteners and must comply with T10. Rubber bushings or hoses are
not considered as securely attached.
CV1 Internal Combustion Engine Powertrains
CV1.3.4 Intake systems with significant mass or cantilever from the cylinder head must be supported
to prevent stress to the intake system resulting from engine movement and chassis torsion.
CV1.4 Throttle
CV1.4.1 The vehicle must be equipped with a throttle body. The throttle body may be of any size or
design.
CV1.4.2 The throttle must be actuated mechanically by a foot pedal, i.e. via a cable or a rod system,
see CV1.5, or by an Electronic Throttle Control (ETC) system, see CV1.6.
CV1.4.3 Throttle position is defined as percentage of travel from fully closed to fully open where
0 %is fully closed and 100 % is fully open. The idle position is the average position of the
throttle body while the engine is idling.
CV1.4.4 The throttle system mechanism must be protected from debris ingress to prevent jamming.
CV1.5 Mechanical Throttle Actuation
CV1.5.1 CV1.5 can only be used if no AS is used.
CV1.5.2 The throttle actuation system must use at least two return springs located at the throttle body,
so that the failure of any one of the two springs will not prevent the throttle returning to the
idle position.
CV1.5.3 Each return spring must be capable of returning the throttle to the idle position with the other
disconnected.
CV1.5.4 Springs in the Throttle Position Sensor (TPS) are not allowed as return springs.
CV1.5.5 Throttle cables must be located at least 50 mm from any exhaust system component and out
of the exhaust stream.
CV1.5.6 Throttle cables or rods must have smooth operation and must not have the possibility of
binding or sticking. They must be protected from being bent or kinked by the driver’s foot
during operation or when entering the vehicle.
CV1.5.7 A positive pedal stop must be incorporated on the accelerator pedal to prevent over-stressing
the throttle cable or actuation system.
CV1.6 Electronic Throttle Control
CV1.6.1 CV1.6 only applies if ETC is used.
CV1.6.2 The team must be able to demonstrate the functionality of all safety features and error
detections of the ETC system at technical inspection, see IN.
CV1.6.3 The ETC system must be equipped with at least the following sensors:
- Accelerator Pedal Position Sensors (APPSs) as defined in T11.8.
- Two Throttle Position Sensors (TPSs) to measure the throttle position.
CV1 Internal Combustion Engine Powertrains
CV1.6.4 All ETC signals are SCS, see T11.9.
CV1.6.5 When power is removed, the electronic throttle must immediately close at least to idle
position ±5 %. An interval of one second is allowed for the throttle to close to idle, failure
to achieve this within the required interval must result in immediate disabling of power to
ignition, fuel injectors and fuel pump. This action must remain active until the TPS signals
indicate the throttle has returned to idle position ±5 % for at least one second.
CV1.6.6 If plausibility does not occur between the values of at least two TPSs and this persists for
more than 100 ms , the power to the electronic throttle must be immediately shut down.
Plausibility is defined as a deviation of less than ten percentage points between the sensor
values as defined in CV1.4.3 and no detected failures as defined in T11.9.
AS must check this signal consistency on a low level itself.
CV1.6.7 The electronic throttle must use at least two sources of energy capable of returning the
throttle to the closed position. One of the sources may be the device that normally actuates
the throttle, e.g. a DCmotor, but the other device(s) must be a return spring that can return
the throttle to the idle position in the event of a loss of actuator power.
CV1.6.8 Springs in the TPSs are not acceptable as return springs.
CV1.6.9 The power to the electronic throttle must be immediately shut down, as defined in CV1 .6.5,
if the throttle position differs by more than 10 % from the expected target TPS position for
more than 500 ms.
CV1.7 Intake System Restrictor
CV1.7.1 In order to limit the power capability from the engine(s), a single circular restrictor must be
placed in the intake system and all engine(s) airflow must pass through this restrictor. The
only allowed sequence of components are the following:
-For naturally aspirated engines, the sequence must be: throttle body, restrictor, and
engine, see figure 16
-For turbocharged or supercharged engines, the sequence must be: restrictor, compres-
sor, throttle body, engine, see figure 17
CV1.7.2 The maximum restrictor diameters which must be respected at all times during the competi-
tion are:
- Gasoline fueled vehicles - 20 mm
- E 85 fueled vehicles - 19 mm
CV1.7.3 The restrictor must be located to facilitate measurement during the inspection process.
CV1.7.4 The circular restricting cross section must not be movable or flexible in any way, e.g. the
restrictor must not be part of the movable portion of a barrel throttle body.
CV2 Fuel and Fuel System
Throttle Body Restrictor Engine
Figure 16: Intake configuration for naturally aspirated engines.
Restrictor Compressor
Recirculation
ValvePop-oﬀ Valve
Throttle Body Charge Air Cooler
(optional)Engine
Figure 17: Intake configuration for turbocharged or supercharged engines.
CV1.8 Turbochargers and Superchargers
CV1.8.1 The intake air may be cooled with an intercooler. Only ambient air may be used to remove
heat from the intercooler system. Air-to-air and water-to air intercoolers are allowed. The
coolant of a water-to-air intercooler system must be plain water without any additives.
CV1.8.2 If pop-off valves, recirculation valves, or heat exchangers (intercoolers) are used, they may
only be positioned in the intake system as shown in Figure 17.
CV1.8.3 Plenums anywhere upstream of the throttle body are prohibited. A “plenum” is any tank or
volume that is a significant enlargement of the normal intake runner system.
CV1.8.4 The maximum allowable internal diameter of the intake runner system between the restrictor
and throttle body is 60 mm diameter, or the equivalent area of 2827 mm2if non-circular.
CV1.9 Crankcase / Engine Lubrication Venting
CV1.9.1 Any crankcase or engine lubrication vent lines routed to the intake system must be connected
upstream of the intake system restrictor.
CV1.9.2 Crankcase breathers that pass through the oil catch tank(s) to exhaust systems, or vacuum
devices that connect directly to the exhaust system, are prohibited.
CV 2 F UEL AND FUEL SYSTEM
CV2.1 Fuel
CV2.1.1 The available fuel types will be unleaded gasoline 98RON and E 85.
CV2 Fuel and Fuel System
CV2.1.2 The vehicles must be operated with the fuel provided at the competition.
CV2.1.3 No agents other than fuel and air may be induced into the combustion chamber.
CV2.1.4 The temperature of fuel introduced into the fuel system must not be changed with the intent
to improve calculated efficiency.
CV2.2 Fuel System Location Requirements
CV2.2.1 The fuel tank must be located within the rollover protection envelope, see T1.1.16, except
the fuel filler neck if it is 350mm above the ground.
CV2.2.2 All parts of the fuel storage and supply system must lie within the surface envelope,
see T1.1.18.
CV2.2.3 All parts of the fuel storage and supply system must be adequately protected against any heat
sources and located at least 50 mm from any exhaust system component.
CV2.2.4 All parts of the fuel system which can come in contact with the fuel must be rated for
permanent contact with fuel.
CV2.3 Fuel Tank
CV2.3.1 The fuel tank is defined as the part of the fuel containment device that is in contact with the
fuel. It may be made of a rigid material or a flexible material.
CV2.3.2 The fuel tank must be securely attached to the vehicle structure with mountings that allow
some flexibility such that chassis flex cannot unintentionally load the fuel tank.
CV2.3.3 The fuel tank must not touch any part of the vehicle other than its mounting and parts of the
fuel system at any time.
CV2.3.4 Any fuel tank that is made from a flexible material, for example a bladder fuel cell or a bag
tank, must be enclosed within a rigid fuel tank container which is securely attached to the
vehicle structure. Fuel tank containers (containing a bladder fuel cell or bag tank) may be
load carrying.
CV2.3.5 The fuel system must have a provision for emptying the fuel tank if required.
CV2.3.6 The fuel tank, by design, must not have a variable capacity.
CV2.4 Fuel Lines for Low Pressure Systems
CV2.4.1 Fuel lines between fuel tank and fuel rail and return lines must:
-have reinforced rubber fuel lines with an abrasion protection with a fuel hose clamp
which has a full 360◦wrap, a nut and bolt system for tightening and rolled edges to
prevent the clamp cutting into the hose, or
- have metal braided hoses with crimped-on or reusable, threaded fittings.
- be rated for temperatures of at least 120◦C.
CV2 Fuel and Fuel System
CV2.4.2 The use of unmodified OEM fuel lines and connectors, including those manufactured from
plastic, is acceptable.
CV2.4.3 For reinforced rubber fuel lines with hose & clamp style connections beaded or barbed hose
fittings must be used.
CV2.4.4 Fuel lines must be securely attached to the vehicle and/or engine.
CV2.4.5 All fuel lines must be shielded from possible rotating equipment failure or collision damage.
CV2.4.6 All fuel lines must be fitted in such a way that any leakage cannot result in the accumulation
of fuel in the cockpit.
CV2.5 Fuel Injection System Requirements
Low Pressure Injection (LPI) fuel systems are those functioning at a pressure below 10 bar
and High Pressure Injection (HPI) fuel systems are those functioning at 10 bar pressure or
above. Direct Injection (DI) fuel systems are those where the injection occurs directly into
the combustion chamber.
CV2.5.1 The following requirements apply to LPI fuel systems:
- The fuel lines must comply with CV2.4.
-The fuel rail must be securely attached to the engine cylinder block, cylinder head, or
intake manifold with mechanical fasteners. The threaded fasteners used to secure the
fuel rail are considered critical fasteners and must comply with T10.
-The use of fuel rails made from plastic, carbon fiber or rapid prototyping flammable
materials is prohibited. However, the use of unmodified OEM Fuel Rails manufactured
from these materials is acceptable.
CV2.5.2 The following requirements apply to HPI and DI fuel systems:
-All high pressure fuel lines must be stainless steel rigid line or Aeroquip FC807 smooth
bore PTFE hose with stainless steel reinforcement and visible Nomex tracer yarn. Use
of elastomeric seals is prohibited. Lines must be rigidly connected every 100 mm by
mechanical fasteners to structural engine components.
-The fuel rail must be securely attached to the engine cylinder head with mechanical
fasteners. The fastening method must be sufficient to hold the fuel rail in place with
the maximum regulated pressure acting on the injector internals and neglecting any
assistance from in-cylinder pressure acting on the injector tip. The threaded fasteners
used to secure the fuel rail are considered critical fasteners and must comply with T10.
- The fuel pump must be rigidly mounted to structural engine components.
-A fuel pressure regulator must be fitted between the high and low pressure sides of the
fuel system in parallel with the DI boost pump. The external regulator must be used
even if the DI boost pump comes equipped with an internal regulator.
-Before the tilt test specified in IN7, engines fitted with mechanically actuated fuel
pumps must be run to fill and pressure the system downstream of the high pressure
pump.
CV2 Fuel and Fuel System
CV2.6 Fuel Tank Filler Neck and Sight Tube
CV2.6.1 The fuel tank must have a filler neck which:
-has at least an inner diameter of 35 mm at any point between the fuel tank and the top
of the fuel filler cap.
-is accompanied by a clear fuel resistant sight tube above the top of the fuel tank with a
length of at least 125 mm vertical height for reading the fuel level, see figure 18.
- is made of material that is permanently rated for temperatures of at least 120◦C.
ø35 mm min. clear Dia.
125 mm min.
125 mm min.30° max.
Sight Tube
Top of Tank
ø35 mm min. clear Dia.
Figure 18: Minimum requirements fuel tank filler neck.
CV2.6.2 A clear filler neck tube may be used as a sight tube.
CV2.6.3 Above the lowest point of the sight tube, the filler neck must not be angled more than 30◦
from the vertical.
CV2.6.4 A permanent, non-movable, clear and easily visible fuel level line must be located between
12 mm and25 mm below the top of the visible portion of the sight tube. This line will be
used as the fill line for the tilt test, see IN7.1, and before and after the endurance test to
measure the amount of fuel used during the endurance event.
CV2.6.5 The filler neck opening must be directly accessible without removing any parts of the vehicle
except for the fuel filler cap.
CV2.6.6 The filler neck must have a fuel filler cap that can withstand severe vibrations or high
pressures such as could occur during a vehicle rollover event.
CV2.7 Tank Filling Requirement
CV2.7.1 The fuel tank must be capable of being filled to capacity without manipulating the tank or
the vehicle in any manner. The fuel system must be designed in a way that during refueling
of the vehicle on a level surface, the formation of air cavities or other effects that cause the
fuel level observed at the sight tube to drop after movement or operation of the vehicle (other
than due to consumption) is prevented.
CV3 Exhaust System and Noise Control
CV2.7.2 The fuel system must be designed such that the spillage during refueling cannot contact the
driver position, exhaust system, hot engine parts, or the ignition system.
CV2.8 Venting Systems
CV2.8.1 The fuel tank venting systems must be designed such that fuel cannot spill during hard
cornering or acceleration.
CV2.8.2 All fuel vent lines must be equipped with a check valve to prevent fuel leakage when the
tank is inverted. All fuel vent lines must exit outside the bodywork.
CV 3 E XHAUST SYSTEM AND NOISE CONTROL
CV3.1 Exhaust System General
CV3.1.1 The exhaust outlet must be routed to the side or rear of the vehicle and so that the driver is
not subjected to fumes at any speed considering the draft of the vehicle.
CV3.1.2 The exhaust outlet(s) must not extend more than 450 mm behind the centerline of the rear
axle and must be no more than 600 mm above the ground.
CV3.1.3 Any exhaust components (headers, mufflers, etc.) that protrude from the side of the chassis
in front of the rear axle must be shielded to prevent contact by persons approaching the
vehicle or a driver exiting the vehicle. The temperature of the outer surface must not be
harmful to a person touching it.
CV3.1.4 The application of fibrous/absorbent material, e.g. “headerwrap”, to the outside of an exhaust
manifold or exhaust system is prohibited.
CV3.2 Maximum Sound Level
CV3.2.1 The maximum sound level test speed for a given engine will be the engine speed that
corresponds to an average piston speed of 15.25m/s. The calculated speed will be rounded
to the nearest 500 rpm . The maximum allowed sound level up to this calculated speed is
110 dB (C), fast weighting.
CV3.2.2 The idle test speed for a given engine will be up to the team and determined by their calibrated
idle speed. If the idle speed varies then the vehicle will be tested across the range of idle
speeds determined by the team. At idle the maximum allowed sound level is 103 dB (C), fast
weighting.
CV 4 S HUTDOWN SYSTEM
CV4.1 Shutdown Circuit
CV4.1.1 The Shutdown Circuit (SDC) directly controls all electric power to the ignition, fuel injectors
and all fuel pumps. It must act through a minimum of two mechanical relays. One relay for
the fuel pump and at least one relay for injection and ignition.
CV5 Hybrid System
BSPD Left Cockpit LVMS
LV SupplyRight Inertia Switch BOTS
normally closed
Element
normally open
ElementLV
BatteryShutdown Buttons
Fuel Pump Ignition / InjectionHSC (optional)100 mm max.Overcurrent
ProtectionAS
RES
EBS CircuitHybrid System
Hybrid Control
Figure 19: Explanatory example schematic of the required Shutdown Circuit (SDC)
An explanatory schematic of the required SDC, is shown in Figure 19.
CV4.1.2 The SDC is defined as a series connection of at least the LVMS, see T11.3, the BSPD, see
T11.6, three shutdown buttons, see T11.4, the BOTS, see T6.2 and the inertia switch, see
T11.5.
CV4.1.3 All circuits that are part of the SDC must be designed in a way, that in the de-energized/disconnected
state they open the SDC.
CV4.1.4 [HY ONLY ]The HSC AIR as per CV5 .2.2 must be part of the SDC in such a way that one
side of the relay coil is directly incorporated into the SDC and the other side is controlled by
the hybrid control system.
CV 5 H YBRID SYSTEM
CV5.1 Hybrid System General
CV5.1.1 Hybrid System – the hybrid storage container, motors and every part that is electrically
connected to them.
CV5.1.2 The hybrid system must be a LVS, T11.1 and T11.7 are applied for all hybrid system
components.
CV5.1.3 All electrical parts of the hybrid system except for ground terminals must be covered at least
according to IPxxB when energized.
CV5.1.4 Hybrid Storage Container (HSC) – the electric energy storage system, including the AIR and
overcurrent protection, that is used in the hybrid system.
CV5.1.5 Moving energy into the Hybrid Storage Container (HSC) from a different electric storage
system is prohibited during any dynamic event.
CV5.1.6 A firewall, see T4.8, must be present between the HSC and the fuel tank.
CV5 Hybrid System
CV5.1.7 The HSC must be positioned according to T11.7.2, all other hybrid system components must
be positioned within the surface envelope, see T1.1.18.
CV5.1.8 The high current path, see EV1.2.2, of the hybrid system must meet EV4.5.15.
CV5.1.9 Motors must meet EV2.1.
CV5.1.10 The hybrid system may only be activated when the combustion engine is running or during
engine start.
CV5.2 Hybrid Storage Container
CV5.2.1 The HSC must be attached to the primary structure, see T1.1.12, according to T9.3.1.
CV5.2.2 A disconnection mechanism, designed as an AIR must be integrated inside of the HSC,
disconnecting the positive pole of the HSC. The AIR must be compliant with EV5.6.3.
CV5.2.3 The maximum total weight of all elements in the hybrid system that store the electric energy,
e.g. battery cells or supercapacitors, including all casings and tabs that are integral to them,
is 3 kg.
CV5.2.4 Holes, both internal and external, in the HSC, are only allowed for the wiring harness,
ventilation, cooling, or fasteners. The total cutout area must be below 25 % of the area of the
respective single wall.
CV5.2.5 The HSC must be removable to be inspected at the mechanical inspection and it must be
possible to easily check the weight limit.
CV5.3 Hybrid System Form
CV5.3.1 A Hybrid System Form (HSF) has to be submitted using the HSF template.
CV5.3.2 The HSF template will be available on the competition website.
CV5.3.3 If no HSF is submitted, the team must not use the hybrid system at the competition. A5.4.2
will not be applied for the HSF.

EV E LECTRIC VEHICLES
EV 1 D EFINITIONS
EV1.1 Tractive System
EV1.1.1 Tractive System (TS) – every part that is electrically connected to the motors and TS
accumulators. The LVS may be supplied by the TS if a galvanic isolation between both
systems is ensured.
EV1.1.2 TS enclosures – every housing or enclosure that contains parts of the TS.
EV1.2 Electrical
EV1.2.1 Galvanic Isolation – two electric circuits are defined as galvanically isolated if all of the
following conditions are true:
-The resistance between both circuits is ≥500Ω/V, related to the maximum TS voltage
of the vehicle, at a test voltage of maximum TS voltage or 250 V , whichever is higher.
-The isolation test voltage RMS, AC for 1 min , between both circuits is higher than
three times the maximum TS voltage or 750 V, whichever is higher.
-The working voltage of the isolation barrier, if specified in the datasheet, is higher than
the maximum TS voltage.
Capacitors that bridge galvanic isolation must be class-Y capacitors.
EV1.2.2 High Current Path – any path of a circuitry that, during normal operation, carries more than
1 A.
EV 2 E LECTRIC POWERTRAIN
EV2.1 Motors
EV2.1.1 Only electric motors are allowed.
EV2.1.2 Motor attachments must follow T10.
EV2.1.3 Motor casings must follow T7.3.
EV2.1.4 The motor(s) must be connected to the TS accumulator through a motor controller.
EV2.2 Power Limitation
EV2.2.1 The TS power at the outlet of the TSAC must not exceed 80 kW.
EV3 General Requirements
EV2.2.2 Regenerating energy is allowed and unrestricted.
EV2.2.3 Wheels must not be spun in reverse.
EV 3 G ENERAL REQUIREMENTS
EV3.1 Grounding
EV3.1.1 TS enclosures, see EV1.1.2, must consist of either
-a grounded solid layer made of at least 0.5 mm thick electrically conductive material,
aluminium or better, see EV3.1.3 or
-be fully made out of electrically insulating materials having an isolation resistance
of at least 2 MΩ, measured with a voltage of 500 V . The TS enclosure must be rigid
and must prevent possible mechanical penetrations. Protruding electrically conductive
parts, such as fasteners or connectors, must follow EV3.1.2
The TSAC might use at least 0 .9 mm thick steel layer as the grounded layer.
EV3.1.2 Electrically conductive seat, driver harness, and firewall mounting points as well as the
aluminium layer of the TS firewall, see T4.8, and the LVS ground measuring point, see
EV4.7.8, must be grounded, see EV3.1.3.
EV3.1.3 An electrically conductive part is grounded if its resistance to LVS ground is below 100 mΩ,
measured with a current of 1 A, and the grounding wire is able to continuously carry at least
10 % of the TS accumulator main fuse current rating.
EV3.1.4 Parts of the vehicle which are or may become electrically conductive within 100 mm of any
TS component must have a resistance below 100 Ωto LVS ground.
EV3.1.5 The rotating part of the wheels does not need to be grounded.
EV3.2 Overcurrent Protection
EV3.2.1 All electric systems must have appropriate overcurrent protection.
EV3.2.2 The continuous current rating of the overcurrent protection must not be greater than the
continuous current rating of any electric component, for example, wire, busbar, or other
conductors that it protects. I.e. if multiple pins of a connector are used to carry currents in
parallel, each pin must be appropriately protected.
EV3.2.3 All used fuses must have an interrupt current rating that is higher than the theoretical short
circuit current of the system that it protects.
EV3.2.4 All overcurrent protection devices must be rated for the highest voltage in the systems they
protect. All devices used must be rated for DC.
EV3.2.5 All overcurrent protection devices that are part of the TS must not rely on programmable
logic. The overcurrent protection function of motor controllers/inverters for the motor outputs
may rely on programmable logic.
EV3.2.6 The overcurrent protection must be designed for the expected surrounding temperature range
but at least for 0◦C to 85◦C
EV4 Tractive System
EV3.2.7 The TS high current path, see EV1.2.2, through the TS accumulator(s) must be fused.
EV 4 T RACTIVE SYSTEM
EV4.1 General Requirements
EV4.1.1 The maximum allowed voltage that may occur between any two electric connections is
600 VDC and for motor controller and Accumulator Management System (AMS) internal
low power control signals 630 VDC.
EV4.1.2 All components in the TS must be rated for the maximum TS voltage.
The TS area of a PCB, see EV4 .3.6, is considered as one component. Every input connected
to the TS must be rated to the maximum TS voltage.
EV4.1.3 All components must be rated for the maximum possible temperature that may occur during
usage.
EV4.2 Tractive System Enclosures
EV4.2.1 TS enclosures, see EV1 .1.2, must be labeled with reasonably sized stickers according to “ISO
7010-W012” (triangle with a black lightning bolt on a yellow background). The sticker must
also contain the text “High V oltage” if the voltage is more than 60 VDC or 50 VACRMS.
EV4.3 Separation of Traction System and Grounded Low Voltage System
EV4.3.1 The entire TS and LVS must be galvanically isolated, see EV1.2.1 and IN4.1.1.
EV4.3.2 All connections from a TS component to external devices, such as laptops must include
galvanic isolation, see EV1.2.1.
EV4.3.3 TS and LVS circuits must be physically segregated such that they are not running through
the same conduit or connector, except for interlock circuit connections.
EV4.3.4 Where both TS and LVS are present within an TS enclosure, they must be separated by
barriers made of moisture-resistant insulating materials or maintain 20 mm spacing through
air, or over a surface.
EV4.3.5 Components and cables capable of movement must be positively restrained to maintain
spacing.
EV4.3.6 If TS and LVS are on the same PCB, they must be on separate well-defined areas of the
board, meeting the spacing requirements in table 5, each area clearly marked with “TS” or
“LV”. The outline of the area required for spacing must be marked.
Groves and cut-outs must have a minimum width of 1.5 mm to influence the creepage path.
“Conformal coating” refers to a coating insulator on a PCB. Solder resist is not a coating.
EV4.3.7 Teams must be prepared to demonstrate spacing on team-built equipment. For inaccessible
circuitry, fully assembled spare boards must be available.
EV4 Tractive System
V oltage Clearance Distance Creepage Distance
General conformal coating
0 VDC to 50 VDC 1 .0 mm 4 mm 1 .0 mm
50 VDC to 150 VDC 1 .0 mm 5 mm 1 .0 mm
150 VDC to 300 VDC 1 .5 mm 10 mm 2 .0 mm
300 VDC to 600 VDC 3 .0 mm 20 mm 4 .0 mm
Table 5: Spacing required between TS and LV.
EV4.4 Positioning of Tractive System Parts
EV4.4.1 Except what is allowed according to EV4 .4.3, all parts belonging to the TS including cables
and wiring must be located within the rollover protection envelope, see T1.1.16. “Part” is
the whole device such as the complete HVD.
EV4.4.2 Any part of the TS that is less than 350 mm above the ground, except what is allowed
according to EV4 .4.3, must be protected from impacts, see T3.14. Impact protection must
follow T3.15 when having bolted attachments. TS wiring in front of the front hoop may
alternatively be shielded by the front bulkhead support structure according to T3.13.
EV4.4.3 Outboard wheel motors are allowed only if
-an interlock is routed along the TS wiring such that the SDC, see EV6 , is opened
before the TS wiring or its clamping fails
-an interlock is routed along a suspension member such that the SDC, see EV6 , is
opened if the suspension fails
-TS wiring is not able to reach the cockpit opening or the driver regardless of where it
breaks
- wiring outside of the rollover protection envelope, see T1.1.16 is minimum length
-wiring outside of an impact structure or front bulkhead support structure, see EV4 .4.2,
is minimum length
- Minimum length is the shortest distance plus extra wiring caused by bending radius.
EV4.5 Tractive System Insulation, Wiring, and Conduit
EV4.5.1 All live parts of the TS must be protected from being touched. This must include team
members working on or inside the vehicle. This is tested with a 100 mm long, 6 mm diameter
insulated test probe when the TS enclosures are in place.
EV4.5.2 Insulation material that is rated for the maximum TS voltage must be used. Using only
insulating tape or rubber-like paint for insulation is prohibited.
EV4.5.3 The temperature rating for TS wiring, connections, and insulation must be appropriate for
the expected surrounding temperatures but at least 85◦C.
EV4.5.4 TS components and TS enclosures must be protected from moisture in the form of rain or
puddles, see IN9.
EV4 Tractive System
EV4.5.5 It must be possible to clearly assign and prove the wire gauge, temperature rating, and
insulation voltage to each used TS wire.
EV4.5.6 All TS wiring must be completed to professional standards with appropriately sized con-
ductors and terminals and with adequate strain relief and protection from loosening due to
vibration etc.
EV4.5.7 TS wiring must be located out of the way of possible snagging or damage.
EV4.5.8 All TS wiring that runs outside of TS enclosures must:
-Be enclosed in separate orange non-conductive conduit or use an orange shielded
cable. The conduit must be securely anchored to the vehicle, but not to the wire, at
least at each end.
-Be securely anchored at least at each end so that it can withstand a force of 200 N
without straining the cable end crimp.
Bodywork is not sufficient to meet this enclosure requirement.
EV4.5.9 Any shielded TS cable must have the shield grounded.
EV4.5.10 Every TS connector outside TS enclosures must include a pilot contact/interlock line which
is part of the SDC. TS enclosures only used to avoid interlocks are prohibited.
EV4.5.11 All TS connections must be designed so that they use intentional current paths through
conductors such as copper or aluminium and must not rely on steel bolts to be the primary
conductor.
EV4.5.12 All TS connections must not include compressible material such as plastic in the stack-up or
as a fastener.
EV4.5.13 All electric connections, including bolts, nuts, and other fasteners, in the high current path,
seeEV1 .2.2, of the TS must be secured from unintentional loosening. Fasteners must
use positive locking mechanisms, see T10.2, that are suitable for high temperatures, see
EV4.5.3.
Components, e.g. inverters, certified for automotive use might be allowed without a posi-
tive locking feature if connections are completed as recommended by the manufacturers’
datasheet and no positive locking is possible.
EV4.5.14 Teams must be prepared to demonstrate positive locking. For inaccessible connections,
appropriate photographs must be available.
EV4.5.15 Soldered connections in the TS high current path, see EV1 .2.2, are only allowed if all of the
following are true:
- connections on PCBs
- the connected devices are not cells or wires
- the devices are additionally mechanically secured against loosening
EV4.6 Data Logger
EV4.6.1 A data logger will be provided by the officials and must be inserted during the competition.
The data logger measures TS voltage and TS current.
EV4 Tractive System
EV4.6.2 The data logger must be in an easily accessible location so that it is possible to insert, remove,
or replace it within 15 min in ready-to-race condition.
EV4.6.3 The data logger must not be placed within the TSAC.
EV4.6.4 All current supplying the TS must run through the data logger. The data logger must be
inserted in the negative TS supply between the most negative AIR and the inverters.
EV4.6.5 The TS voltage sense connection of the data logger must be directly connected, see T1.3.1,
to the most positive AIR on the vehicle side.
EV4.6.6 The specification of the data logger will be available in the competition handbook.
EV4.7 Tractive System Measuring Point
EV4.7.1 Two TSMPs must be installed directly next to the master switches, see T11.2.
EV4.7.2 The TSMPs must be directly connected, see T1.3.1, to the intermediate circuit capacitors
even if the HVD has been removed or the TS accumulator is disconnected.
EV4.7.3 4 mm shrouded banana jacks rated for 600 V CAT III or better must be used.
EV4.7.4 The TSMPs must be marked “TS+” and “TS-” and exclusively mounted on an orange
background.
EV4.7.5 The TSMPs must be protected by a non-conductive cover that can be opened without tools.
The cover must always be mechanically linked to the vehicle.
EV4.7.6 Each TSMP must be secured with a current limiting resistor according to the following table.
Fusing the TSMPs is prohibited. The resistor’s power rating must be chosen such that they
can continuously carry the current if both TSMPs are short-circuited.
Maximum TS V oltage Resistor Value
Umax <200 VDC 5 k Ω
200 VDC <Umax ≤400 VDC 10 k Ω
400 VDC <Umax ≤600 VDC 15 k Ω
EV4.7.7 All electric connections needed to connect the TSMP to the intermediate circuit capacitors,
including bolts, nuts, and other fasteners, must be secured from unintentional loosening by
the use of positive locking mechanisms. Bolted connections must follow T10.2, soldered
connections EV4.5.15.
EV4.7.8 Next to the TSMPs an LVS ground measuring point must be installed. A 4 mm black
shrouded banana jack must be connected to LVS ground and must be marked “GND”.
EV4.8 High Voltage Disconnect
EV4.8.1 It must be possible to disconnect at least one pole of the TS accumulator by quickly removing
an unobstructed and directly accessible element, fuse, or connector. It must be possible
to remove the HVD without removing any bodywork. The HVD must be above 350 mm
from the ground. Remote actuation of the HVD through a long handle, rope, or wire is not
allowed.
EV4 Tractive System
EV4.8.2 Any ESO must be able to remove the HVD within 10 swhen the vehicle is in ready-to-race
condition.
EV4.8.3 A dummy connector or similar may be required to restore the system’s isolation, see EV4 .5.
The dummy connector must be attached to the push bar, see T13.1, if not in use.
EV4.8.4 The HVD must be clearly marked with “HVD”.
EV4.8.5 No tools must be necessary to remove the HVD. An interlock is required, see EV4.5.10.
EV4.9 Discharge Circuit
EV4.9.1 If a discharge circuit is required to meet EV6 .1.5, it must be designed to handle the maximum
TS voltage permanently. After three subsequent discharges within 15 sin total, the discharge
time specified in EV6 .1.5 may be exceeded. Full discharging functionality must be given
after a reasonable time with a deactivated discharge circuit.
EV4.9.2 The discharge circuit must be wired in a way that it is always active whenever the SDC
is open. Furthermore, the discharge circuit must be fail-safe such that it still discharges
the intermediate circuit capacitors if the HVD has been removed or the TS accumulator is
disconnected.
EV4.9.3 Fusing of the discharge main current path is prohibited.
EV4.10 Tractive System Active Light
EV4.10.1 The vehicles must include a single TSAL that must indicate the TS status. The TSAL must
not perform any other functions. A TSAL with multiple LEDs in one housing is allowed.
EV4.10.2 The TSAL itself must have a red light, flashing continuously with a frequency between 2 Hz
and5 Hz and a duty cycle of 50 % , active if and only if the LVS is active and the voltage
across any DC-link capacitor exceeds
- 60 VDC or 50 VACRMS
- Half the nominal TS voltage
whichever is lower.
EV4.10.3 The TSAL itself must have a green light, continuously on, active if and only if the LVS is
active and ALL of the following conditions are true:
- All AIRs are opened.
- The pre-charge relay, see EV5.7.2, is opened.
-The voltage at the vehicle side of the AIRs inside the TSAC does not exceed 60 VDC
or 50 VACRMS.
EV4.10.4 The mentioned voltage detection must be performed inside the respective TS enclosure.
EV4.10.5 The mentioned states of the relays (opened/closed) are the actual mechanical states. The
mechanical state can differ from the intentional state, i.e. if a relay is stuck. Any circuitry
detecting the mechanical state must meet EV5.6.2.
EV4 Tractive System
EV4.10.6 The voltage detection circuit of the red light and the relay state and voltage detection circuit
of the green light must be independent. Any plausibility check between both lights is not
allowed. A TSAL state with both lights simultaneously active might occur and must not be
prevented.
EV4.10.7 The TSAL must:
-Be located lower than the highest point of the main hoop and including the mounting
within the rollover protection envelope, see T1.1.16.
- Be no lower than 75 mm from the highest point of the main hoop.
- Not be able to contact the driver’s helmet in any circumstances.
EV4.10.8 The entire illuminated surface of the TSAL must be clearly visible:
- Except for angles less than 10◦on each side which are blocked by the main hoop.
-From a point 1.60 m vertically from ground level, within 3 mhorizontal radius from
the TSAL.
- In direct sunlight.
EV4.10.9 The TSAL and all needed circuitry must be hard-wired electronics. Software control is not
allowed.
EV4.10.10 A green indicator light in the cockpit that is easily visible even in bright sunlight and clearly
marked with “TS off” must light up if TSAL green light is on, see EV4.10.3.
EV4.10.11 Signals influencing the TSAL and the indicator according to EV4 .10.10 are SCS, see T11.9.
The individual safe state of each of the TSAL lights is off. The TSAL’s red light must not be
illuminated for a visible check, see T11.9.6.
EV4.10.12 The TSAL’s red light voltage detection circuit, see EV4 .10.2, does not need to detect an
open circuit, as required by T11.9. A plausibility check must not be implemented.
EV4.10.13 The TSAL’s green light relay state detection circuit, see EV4 .10.3, does not need to detect an
open circuit, as required by T11.9, when the intentional state of the used (auxiliary) contact
is opened. A plausibility check against the intentional relay state must be implemented in a
way that the TSAL’s green light stays off after the open circuit is detectable.
EV4.10.14 The TSAL’s green light voltage detection circuit, see EV4 .10.3, does not need to detect an
open circuit, as required by T11.9, when no voltage is present. A plausibility check against
the intentional relay states must be implemented in a way that the TSAL’s green light stays
off after the open circuit of the TS accumulator voltage detection circuit is detectable.
EV4.10.15 The latching required by EV4 .10.13 and EV4 .10.14 must not be triggered during normal
operation conditions and must only be reset by power cycling the LVS.
EV4.11 Activating the Tractive System
EV4.11.1 The TS is active if any of the AIRs or the pre-charge relay is closed.
EV4.11.2 The driver must be able to activate and deactivate the TS from within the cockpit without the
assistance of any other person.
EV5 Tractive System Energy Storage
EV4.11.3 The ASR must be able to activate the TS from outside the vehicle with an external TS
activation button in proximity to the TSMS if and only if the ASMS is in “On” position.
EV4.11.4 Closing the SDC by any part defined in EV6 .1.2 must not (re-)activate the TS. Additional
action must be required.
EV4.11.5 The AS must not be able to (re-)activate the TS.
EV4.11.6 The vehicle is in Ready-to-drive (R2D) mode as soon as the motors will respond to the input
of the APPS.
EV4.11.7 After the TS has been activated, additional actions must be required by the driver to set the
vehicle to R2D mode, e.g. pressing a dedicated start button. The transition to R2D mode
must only be possible during the actuation of the mechanical brakes and a simultaneous
dedicated additional action.
EV4.11.8 The R2D mode must be left immediately when the SDC is opened.
EV4.12 Ready-To-Drive Sound
EV4.12.1 The vehicle must make a characteristic sound, continuously for at least 1 sand a maximum
of 3 s while entering R2D mode.
EV4.12.2 The sound level must be a minimum of 80 dBA and a maximum of 90 dBA , fast weighting
in a radius of 2 m around the vehicle.
EV4.12.3 The used sound must be easily recognizable. No animal voices, song parts, or sounds that
could be interpreted as offensive are allowed.
EV4.12.4 The vehicle must not make any other sounds similar to the R2D sound.
EV 5 T RACTIVE SYSTEM ENERGY STORAGE
EV5.1 Definitions
EV5.1.1 Cell – a battery cell or super-capacitor.
EV5.1.2 Cell Energy – the maximum cell voltage times the nominal capacity of the used cell.
EV5.1.3 TS Accumulator – all cells that store the electric energy to be used by the TS as a whole.
EV5.1.4 Tractive System Accumulator Container (TSAC) – the container itself, which contains the
TS accumulator.
EV5.1.5 TS Accumulator Segments – sub-divisions of the TS accumulator.
EV5.2 Allowed Tractive System Cells
EV5.2.1 Molten salt and thermal batteries are prohibited.
EV5.2.2 Fuel cells are prohibited.
EV5 Tractive System Energy Storage
EV5.3 Tractive System Energy Storage – General Requirements
EV5.3.1 All cells that store the TS energy must be enclosed in TSACs.
EV5.3.2 Each TS accumulator segment must not exceed a maximum static voltage of 120 VDC , a
maximum energy of 6 MJ, see EV5.1.2, and a maximum mass of 12 kg.
EV5.3.3 Spare cells must be stored in an electrically insulated container made of fire retardant material,
see T1.2.1. The container must be labeled according to EV5.3.7.
EV5.3.4 Spare accumulators and spare cells must be presented at technical inspection.
EV5.3.5 It must be possible to open the TSAC for technical inspection.
EV5.3.6 Each TSAC must be removable from the vehicle while still remaining rules compliant without
the need to install extra components. A dummy connector or similar may be used to restore
the system’s isolation, see EV4.5.
EV5.3.7 The vehicle number, the university name, and the ESO phone numbers must be displayed
and written in Roman Sans-Serif characters of at least 20 mm high on the lid of each TSAC.
The characters must be clearly visible and placed on a high-contrast background.
EV5.4 Tractive System Energy Storage – Electrical Configuration
EV5.4.1 If the TSAC is made from an electrically conductive material, the insulation barrier must be
adequately protected against conductive penetrations.
EV5.4.2 Every TSAC must contain at least one fuse and at least two AIRs, see EV5.6 and EV3.2.7.
EV5.4.3 LVS must not be included in the TSAC except where inherently required. Exceptions include
the AIRs, TS DC/DC converters, the AMS, the Insulation Monitoring Device (IMD), the
TSAL’s green light circuitry, and cooling fans.
EV5.4.4 Maintenance plugs must allow electrical separation of all TS accumulator segments, see
EV5 .3.2. The separation must affect both poles of all segments including the first and last
segment.
EV5.4.5 Maintenance plugs must:
- Not require tools to separate the TS accumulator segments.
- Be non-conductive on surfaces that do not provide any electric connection.
-Be designed in a way, that it is physically impossible to electrically connect them in
any way other than the design intent configuration.
- Be protected against accidental reconnection.
-Be designed such that it is clearly visible whether the connection is open or closed.
Electrically controlled switches must not be used.
EV5.4.6 Each TS accumulator segment must be electrically insulated by the use of suitable rigid and
fire retardant material, see T1.2.1, on top of the segment to prevent arc flashes caused by inter-
segment contact or by parts/tools accidentally falling into the TSAC during maintenance.
EV5.4.7 Every wire used in a TSAC, regardless of whether it is part of the LVS or TS, must follow
EV4.5.2, EV4.5.3, and EV4.5.5.
EV5 Tractive System Energy Storage
EV5.4.8 Each TSAC must have a prominent indicator, a voltmeter, or a red LED visible even in bright
sunlight that will continuously illuminate whenever a voltage greater than 60 VDC or half
the maximum TS voltage, whichever is lower, is present at the vehicle side of the AIRs.
EV5.4.9 The indicator must be clearly visible while disconnecting the TSAC from the vehicles. The
indicator must be clearly marked with “V oltage Indicator”
EV5.4.10 The indicator must be hard-wired electronics without software control, directly and only
supplied by the TS from the vehicle side of the AIRs, and always working, even if the TS
accumulator is disconnected from the LVS or removed from the vehicle.
EV5.5 Tractive System Energy Storage – Mechanical Configuration
EV5.5.1 All TSACs must lie within and be attached to the primary structure or any additional
structures fixed to the primary structure that meet the minimum specification for impact
structures, see T3.2, no higher than the top of the impact structure, see T3.14.
EV5.5.2 TSACs must be protected from impacts, see T3.14. Impact protection must follow T3.15
when having bolted attachments. The TSAC must not be part of this structure.
EV5.5.3 All TSAC materials as well as all structural parts used to comply with EV5 .5.8 must be fire
retardant, see T1.2.1. All calculations must be conducted for an ambient temperature of
60◦C except for metallic materials and continuous fiber-reinforced laminates.
EV5.5.4 The design of the TSAC and its contents, calculations and/or tests must be documented in the
ASES. This includes materials used, drawings, images, fastener locations, segment weight,
cell, and segment position.
EV5.5.5 TSACs must be constructed of steel or aluminium. With the following requirements:
-The bottom of the TSAC must be at least 1.25 mm thick if made from steel or 3.2 mm
if made from aluminium.
-The internal and external vertical walls, covers, and lids must be at least 0.9 mm thick
if made from steel or 2 .3 mm if made from aluminium.
Alternative materials are allowed with proof of equivalency per T3.3 or for composite
materials per EV5 .5.6. When alternative materials are used, test samples must be presented
at technical inspection.
EV5.5.6 Composite TSACs must satisfy the following requirements:
-Data obtained from the laminate perimeter shear strength test and three-point bending
test, see T3.5, should be used to prove adequate strength is provided.
-Each attachment point requires steel backing plates with a minimum thickness of
2 mm . Alternate materials may be used for backing plates if equivalency is approved.
- The calculations and physical test results must be included in the ASES.
EV5.5.7 TS accumulator segments, see EV5 .3.2, must be separated by internal vertical walls which
extend upwards until the lid. Openings must follow EV5.5.14.
EV5.5.8 The TSAC itself, the mounting of the TSAC to the chassis, and the mounting of each cell
to the TSAC must be designed to withstand the accelerations according to T9.3.1. All
EV5 Tractive System Energy Storage
considered TSAC attachment points must follow EV5 .5.13. TSACs made of materials as
stated in EV5.5.5 or EV5.5.6 may need further reinforcement to comply with this rule.
EV5.5.9 Pouch cells must be fixed using one or both of the large surfaces only. Each used surface
must be fixed on at least 80 % . Tabs of pouch cells must not carry mechanical loads and
must not press into the pouch.
EV5.5.10 Friction-based cell mounting requires physical testing. Mechanically representative test cells
or cell mockups can be used for testing.
EV5.5.11 All fasteners used within or to mount the TSAC must comply with T10. Fasteners within
the TSAC used for non-structural parts, e.g. PCBs, do not have to follow T10.1.2. Fasteners
made of electrically non-conductive material within the TSAC used for non-structural parts
do not have to follow T10.
EV5.5.12 The AIRs and the main fuse, see EV3 .2.7, must be separated with an electrically insulated
and fire retardant material, see T1.2.1, from the TS accumulator, see EV5 .1.3. Air is not
considered to be a suitable insulation material in this case.
EV5.5.13 The mounting of the TSAC requires a minimum of 2attachment points. Any brackets used
to mount the TSAC must be made of steel 1.6 mm thick or aluminium 4 mm thick and must
have gussets to carry bending loads.
EV5.5.14 Holes, both internal and external, in the TSAC, are only allowed for the wiring harness,
ventilation, cooling, or fasteners. The TSAC must still be compliant with all other rules,
especially the ones concerning its structural requirements. The total cutout area must be
below 25 % of the area of the respective single wall. External holes must be sealed according
to EV4.5.
EV5.5.15 External openings in the TSAC or mounted ducts must not point toward the driver or the
operator of the TS accumulator hand cart even though there is a firewall, see T4.8, in between.
Ducts and their mounting must be fire retardant, see T1.2.1, and properly sealed.
EV5.5.16 A sticker according to “ISO 7010-W012” (triangle with a black lightning bolt on a yellow
background) with the triangle side length of at least 100 mm and the text “Always Energized”
must be applied on every TSAC. The sticker must also contain the text “High V oltage” if the
voltage is more than 60 VDC or 50 VACRMS.
EV5.5.17 Any TS accumulators that may vent an explosive gas must have a ventilation system to
prevent the vented gas from reaching an explosive concentration.
EV5.5.18 Every TSAC which is completely sealed must also have a pressure relief valve to prevent
high pressure in the TSAC.
EV5.6 Accumulator Isolation Relays
EV5.6.1 At least two AIRs must be fitted inside each TSAC.
EV5.6.2 The AIRs must open both poles of the TS accumulator. If the AIRs are open, no TS voltage
may be present outside of the TSAC and the vehicle side of the AIRs must be galvanically
isolated from the TS accumulator side, see EV1.2.1.
EV5.6.3 The AIRs must be mechanical relays of a “normally open” type.
EV5 Tractive System Energy Storage
EV5.7 Pre-Charge Circuit
EV5.7.1 A circuit that ensures that the voltage at the vehicle side of the AIRs is pre-charged to at
least 95 % of the actual TS accumulator voltage before closing the second AIR must be
implemented.
EV5.7.2 The pre-charge circuit must use a mechanical, normally open relay. All pre-charge current
must pass through this relay.
EV5.8 Accumulator Management System
EV5.8.1 Each TS accumulator must be monitored by an AMS whenever the LVS is active or the TS
accumulator is connected to a charger.
EV5.8.2 Every TSAC must contain its full AMS including its own and AMS exclusive SDC power
stage, see EV6.1
EV5.8.3 The AMS must continuously measure
- all cell voltages
- the TS current
- the temperature of thermally critical cells
-for lithium-based cells: the temperature of at least 30 % of the cells equally distributed
within the TSAC
EV5.8.4 Cell temperature must be measured at the negative terminal of the respective cell. The sensor
used must be in direct contact with the electrically exposed negative terminal or less than
10 mm along the high current path, see EV1 .2.2, away from the terminal in direct contact
with the respective busbar. It is acceptable to monitor multiple cells with one sensor if this
requirement is met for all cells sensed by the sensor.
EV5.8.5 The maximum cell temperature is 60◦Cor the limit stated in the cell data sheet, whichever
is lower.
EV5.8.6 An independent cell temperature monitoring device may be provided by the officials during
accumulator inspection and must be installed, see IN3.
The device must be placed on the warmest negative cell terminal of the TSAC and in direct
contact with the terminal or less than 30 mm away from it on the busbar.
EV5.8.7 The AMS must open the SDC, if a critical voltage, temperature, or current value according
to the cell manufacturer’s datasheet or these rules persistently occurs for more than:
- 500 ms for voltage and current values
- 1 s for temperature values
The accuracy, noise, and sample rate of the measurement must be taken into account.
EV5.8.8 AMS cell voltage measurement inputs, temperature measurement inputs, and supply voltage
of decentralized AMS slaves may be rated below the maximum TS voltage.
EV5.8.9 A red indicator light in the cockpit that is easily visible from inside and outside the cockpit
even in bright sunlight and clearly marked with the lettering “AMS” must light up if and only
EV6 Shutdown Circuit and Systems
if the AMS opens the SDC. It must stay illuminated until the error state has been manually
reset, see EV6.1.6. Signals controlling this indicator are SCS, see T11.9.
EV5.8.10 AMS signals are System Critical Signals, see T11.9. The loss of any measurement connec-
tion, see EV5.8.3, must result in an open SDC.
EV5.8.11 It must be possible to individually disconnect the current sensor, one temperature sensor, and
one cell voltage measurement wire during technical inspection if any wire is used.
EV5.8.12 The AMS must be able to read and display all measured values according to EV5 .8.3 in a
single overview e.g. by connecting a laptop to the AMS at any place and any time e.g. inside
the dynamic area.
EV 6 S HUTDOWN CIRCUIT AND SYSTEMS
EV6.1 Shutdown Circuit
BSPD IMD AMS Left Right Cockpit
Inertia Switch BOTSHVD
InterlockTSMSLVMS
LV Supply
(optional)
Interlocks(optional)
Pre-charge Circuitry
normally closed
Element
normally open
ElementLV
BatteryShutdown Buttons100 mm max.Overcurrent
ProtectionRES AS
EBS Relay CoilAIR Coils
Activation Logic
Figure 20: Explanatory example schematic of the required Shutdown Circuit (SDC)
EV6.1.1 The Shutdown Circuit (SDC) directly carries the power driving the AIRs, see EV5 .6, and
the pre-charge circuitry, see EV5.7.
EV6.1.2 The SDC is defined as a series connection of at least two master switches, three shutdown
buttons, the BOTS, see T6.2, the IMD, the inertia switch, see T11.5, the BSPD, see T11.6,
all required interlocks, and the AMS.
An explanatory schematic of the required SDC, excluding any possible interlock circuitry, is
shown in Figure 20.
EV6.1.3 All parts of the SDC defined in EV6 .1.2 must be on the high-side connection of the AIR
coils and the pre-charge circuitry.
EV6.1.4 The Tractive System Master Switch (TSMS), see EV6 .2, must be the last switch before the
AIRs except for pre-charge circuitry and hardwired interlocks.
EV6 Shutdown Circuit and Systems
EV6.1.5 If the SDC is opened the TS must be shut down by opening all AIRs as well as the pre-charge
relay and the voltage in the TS must drop to below 60 VDC and50 VACRMS in less than
5 s. All TS accumulator current flow must stop immediately.
The action of opening the AIRs may be delayed by ≤250 ms to signal the action to the motor
controllers and reduce the TS current before the AIRs are opened. The AIR supply must be
abruptly switched off before reaching the minimum AIR supply voltage.
EV6.1.6 If the SDC is opened by the AMS or the IMD, it has to be latched open by a non-
programmable logic that can only be manually reset by a person at the vehicle who is
not the driver.
EV6.1.7 All circuits that are part of the SDC must be designed in a way, that in the de-energized/disconnected
state, they open the SDC.
EV6.1.8 It must be possible to demonstrate that all features of the SDC function correctly. This
includes all interlocks.
EV6.1.9 Every system that is required to or can open the SDC must have its own, non-programmable,
power stage to achieve this. The respective power stages must be designed to be able to carry
the SDC current, e.g. AIR inrush currents, and such that a failure cannot result in electric
power being fed back into the electric SDC.
EV6.1.10 The shutdown buttons, the BOTS, the TSMS, and all interlocks must not act through any
power stage.
EV6.1.11 All signals influencing the SDC are SCSs, see T11.9.
EV6.2 Tractive System Master Switch
EV6.2.1 An TSMS according to T11.2 must be part of the SDC, see EV6.1.2.
EV6.2.2 The TSMS must be fitted with a “lockout/tagout” capability to prevent accidental activation
of the TS. The ESO must ensure that it is locked in the off position whenever work is done
on the vehicle or no ESO is present.
EV6.2.3 The TSMS must be mounted in the middle of a completely orange circular area of ≥50 mm
diameter placed on a high contrast background.
EV6.2.4 The TSMS must be marked with “TS” and a symbol according to “ISO 7010-W012” (triangle
with a black lightning bolt on a yellow background).
EV6.3 Insulation Monitoring Device
EV6.3.1 Every vehicle must have an IMD installed in the TS system.
EV6.3.2 The IMD must be a Bender A-ISOMETER®iso-F1 IR155-3203, -3204, -4203, or -4204, or
a Bender ISOMETER®iso165C-1, iso175, or equivalent IMD approved for automotive use.
Equivalency may be approved by the officials based on the following criteria: robustness to
vibration, operating temperature range, IP rating, availability of a direct output, a self-test
facility, and must not be powered by the system that is monitored.
EV6.3.3 The response value of the IMD must be set to ≥500Ω/V, related to the maximum TS voltage.
EV7 Chargers
EV6.3.4 The response value must not be changed after electrical inspection.
EV6.3.5 The IMD must be connected on the vehicle side of the AIRs.
EV6.3.6 One IMD chassis ground measurement line must be connected to the grounded TSAC or
the respective grounded TS enclosure of the IMD. The other chassis ground measurement
line must be connected to the main hoop. Each connection must use a separate conductor,
rated for at least maximum TS voltage. An open circuit in any of these ground measurement
connections must result in an opened SDC.
EV6.3.7 In case of an insulation failure or an IMD failure, the IMD must open the SDC. This must
be done without the influence of any programmable logic. See also EV6 .1.6 regarding the
re-activation of the TS after an insulation fault.
EV6.3.8 A red indicator light in the cockpit that is easily visible from inside and outside the cockpit
even in bright sunlight and clearly marked with the lettering “IMD” must light up if and only
if the IMD opens the SDC. It must stay illuminated until the error state has been manually
reset, see EV6.1.6. Signals controlling this indicator are SCS, see T11.9.
EV 7 C HARGERS
EV7.1 Chargers General Requirements
EV7.1.1 Only chargers presented at technical inspection are allowed. All connections of the chargers
must be insulated and covered. No open connections are allowed.
EV7.1.2 Exposed conductive parts and the TSAC must be connected to protective earth (PE).
EV7.1.3 All components interfacing with mains must be accredited to a recognized standard e.g. CE.
All remaining parts must comply with all electrical requirements for the vehicle TS, e.g.
EV4.3, EV3.1, and EV4.2.
EV7.1.4 TS charging leads must be orange.
EV7.1.5 When charging, the AMS must be active and must be able to open the SDC, see EV7.2.
EV7.1.6 The charger must include a push-type emergency stop button which has a minimum diameter
of 24 mm.
EV7.1.7 When charging, an IMD as described in EV6 .3 must be active and must be able to open the
SDC, see EV7 .2, The second chassis ground measurement line must be connected to the
casing of the charger.
EV7.1.8 An IMD indicator light as defined in EV6.3.8 must be available.
EV7.1.9 TSAL’s green light, see EV4.10.3, must be available as an easily visible green indicator.
EV7.1.10 The charger must include TSMPs as described in EV4 .7. The TSMPs must be connected to
the TS output of the charger.
EV7.1.11 All indicators, switches, buttons, and connectors of the charger must be labeled.
EV8 Tractive System Accumulator Container Hand Cart
EV7.2 Charging Shutdown Circuit
EV7.2.1 The charging Shutdown Circuit (SDC) consists of at least the charger shutdown button, see
EV7.1.6, the IMD, the AMS, and the charging leads’ interlocks.
EV7.2.2 If the SDC is opened the charging system must remain disabled and the SDC opened until it
is manually reset. Closing the SDC by any part defined in EV7 .2.1 must not (re-)activate
charging.
EV7.2.3 The charging shutdown systems must comply with EV6 .1.1, EV6 .1.5, EV6 .1.7, EV6 .1.8
and EV6.1.9.
EV7.2.4 All signals influencing the charger SDC are SCS, see T11.9.
EV 8 T RACTIVE SYSTEM ACCUMULATOR CONTAINER HAND CART
EV8.1 Tractive System Accumulator Container Hand Cart
EV8.1.1 A hand cart must be used for transporting the TSACs around the competition site.
EV8.1.2 The hand cart must have at least four wheels.
EV8.1.3 The hand cart must have a brake that is always on and only released if someone pushes the
handle, or similar.
EV8.1.4 The brake must be capable of safely stopping the fully loaded hand cart.
EV8.1.5 The hand cart must be easily moved when the brake is released.
EV8.1.6 The hand cart must be able to carry the load of the TSACs.
EV8.1.7 The hand cart must provide a firewall to protect the person while moving the hand cart. The
firewall must have the same width as the hand cart, appropriately protect the legs and body,
and be at least 30 cm higher than the hand cart handle and the TSAC. The firewall must be
made from a rigid, fire retardant material, see T1.2.1, and be transparent from 1.3 mabove
the ground.
EV8.1.8 The TSACs must be mechanically fixed to the hand cart to enable safe transportation.
EV8.1.9 The TSACs must not protrude the hand cart.
EV8.1.10 The TSACs must be protected from vibrations and shocks during normal operation of the
cart, e.g. by the use of air tires.
EV8.1.11 The hand cart itself must have a label according to EV5 .3.7 on its firewall maximum 1.3 m
above the ground.
EV8.1.12 The overall floor space used by the fully loaded hand cart must not exceed 1200 mm x
800 mm . If the TSAC is larger than the allowed floor space, exceptions may be approved by
the officials before the competition.
EV9 Electrical System Form
EV 9 E LECTRICAL SYSTEM FORM
EV9.1 Electrical System Form
EV9.1.1 Before the competition, all teams must submit structured documentation of their entire
electrical system (including control and TS) called the ESF.

IN T ECHNICAL INSPECTIONS
IN 1 G ENERAL
IN1.1 Technical Inspection Process
IN1.1.1 The technical inspection is divided into the following parts:
- Pre-Inspection
- [EV ONLY ] Accumulator Inspection
- [EV ONLY ] Electrical Inspection
- Mechanical Inspection
- Autonomous System Inspection
- Tilt Test
- Vehicle Weighing
- [CV ONLY ] Noise Test
- [EV ONLY ] Rain Test
- Brake Test
- EBS Test
IN1.2 General Rules
IN1.2.1 Each vehicle must pass all parts of technical inspection except Autonomous System Inspec-
tion and EBS Test before it may participate in any dynamic event.
IN1.2.2 Each vehicle must pass Autonomous System Inspection and EBS Test before it may partici-
pate in any Driverless (DV) dynamic event.
IN1.2.3 Passing the technical inspections is not a certification of complete rules compliance of the
vehicle.
IN1.2.4 The technical inspection sheet includes several inspection points and will be provided on the
competition website before the competition. It must always stay with the push bar.
IN1.2.5 The officials may inspect other points not mentioned on the technical inspection sheet to
ensure compliance with the rules.
IN1.2.6 Teams are responsible for confirming that their vehicle and the required equipment satisfies
the requirements and restrictions of the rules before presenting it for technical inspection.
IN1.2.7 Vehicles must be presented for technical inspection in ready-to-race condition.
IN1 General
IN1.2.8 Safety uncritical rule violations without a benefit to the team that cannot be changed at
the event may result in at least 20 penalty points for the teams, depending on officials’
decision. Safety uncritical violations with a minor benefit to the team that cannot be changed
at the event may result in at least 40 penalty points for the team. The penalty points will be
deducted from the team’s overall score.
IN1.2.9 All items on the inspection sheet must be clearly visible for the officials without using
instruments such as endoscopes or mirrors. Visible access may be provided by removing
body panels or by providing removable access panels.
IN1.2.10 The vehicle must maintain all required specifications throughout the competition.
IN1.2.11 Officials reserve the right to ask the team for drilling of additional inspection holes to check
the chassis for compliance with the rules.
IN1.2.12 Officials will mark or seal various different approved parts. Removal of or damage to the
seals will void the inspection approval.
IN1.2.13 Once the vehicle is approved for competition, any damage to the vehicle that requires repair(s)
will void the inspection approval. After completion of the repair(s), the vehicle must be
re-submitted to technical inspection for re-approval.
IN1.2.14 The officials reserve the right to prohibit the use of parts that could pose a safety risk to
drivers, track marshals or the environment.
IN1.3 Technical Inspection Sticker
IN1.3.1 The competition technical inspection stickers will be placed on the nose of the vehicle.
IN1.3.2 If a vehicle is no longer in compliance with the rules, the officials will set the vehicle’s
technical inspection status to fail, remove the respective inspection sticker(s) from the vehicle
and note the reason for revoking the technical inspection approval in the technical inspection
sheet.
IN1.4 Inspection Responsible Person
IN1.4.1 To accelerate the technical inspection process, the team must appoint one team member
as inspection responsible person. For vehicles that have an autonomous system, see T14,
implemented, this has to be an ASR. [EV ONLY ]For electrical inspection and accumulator
inspection this has to be an ESO.
IN1.4.2 This inspection responsible person must be:
- Familiar with the vehicle.
-Able to show compliance of the vehicle with all points mentioned on the technical
inspection sheet.
-Able to perform the technical inspection autonomously observed by the officials, when
asked.
IN2 Pre-Inspection
IN1.4.3 Should the inspection responsible person be unable to perform one of these requirements, or
the vehicle and all necessary items are not ready, the technical inspection will be aborted and
the team will be asked to leave the technical inspection area.
IN1.5 Modifications and Repairs
IN1.5.1 After technical inspection, the only modifications allowed to the vehicle are:
- Adjustment of belts, chains and clutches
- Adjustment of the brake bias
- Adjustment of the driver restraint system, head restraint, seat and pedal assembly
- Substitution of the head restraint or seat insert for different drivers
- Adjustment to engine operating parameters, e.g. fuel mixture and ignition timing
- Adjustment of mirrors
-Adjustment of the suspension where no part substitution, other than springs, sway bars
and shims, is required
- Adjustment of tire pressure
-Adjustment of winglet angles, but not the position of the complete aerodynamic device
in relation to the vehicle
- Replenishment of fluids
-Replacement of defective tires or brake pads. Replacement tires and brake pads must
be identical in material/composition/size to those presented and approved at technical
inspection.
-Changing wheels and tires for “wet” or “damp” conditions as allowed in D3.2 and
D7.6
- Software calibration changes
- Recharging LV batteries
- Recharging TS accumulators
- Adjustments of AS sensors
- (De-)Coupling of actuators as allowed in T14.7
-Installing and removing protective sensor covers, if approved during technical inspec-
tion
IN 2 P RE-INSPECTION
IN2.1 Pre-Inspection Required Items
IN2.1.1 The following items must be presented for pre-inspection:
- All helmets
- All driver’s equipment and other safety gear
IN3 [EV ONLY ] Accumulator Inspection
- Two unused and in date fire extinguishers
- One set of four tires on rims for wet conditions
- One set of four tires on rims for dry conditions
The tire type/rim type combination presented during pre-inspection must be the same during
the whole competition. The rims for dry tires and wet tires may be different, but for all dry
tire sets and all wet tire sets the same.
IN 3 [EV ONLY ] ACCUMULATOR INSPECTION
IN3.1 Accumulator Inspection General Definitions
IN3.1.1 Cell modules or stacks do not need to be disassembled when AIRs, fuses, pre- and discharge
circuit and positive locking mechanism of the maintenance plugs are reachable and visible
for the officials.
IN3.1.2 An official temperature logging device must be installed if used by the competition, see
EV5.8.6.
IN3.1.3 The accumulator charger will be inspected and sealed.
IN3.1.4 The set of basic tools will be checked.
IN3.2 Accumulator Inspection Required Items
IN3.2.1 The following items must be presented at accumulator inspection:
- All TS accumulators
- Accumulator hand cart
- Accumulator charger
- Basic Tools, see IN3.2.2
- Tools needed for the (dis)assembly of parts
-Samples of self designed PCBs that are part of the TS and inside the TSAC, see
EV4.3.7
- Data sheets for all parts used in the accumulator
-Original delivery notes for material without serial number printed on according to
T1.2.1
- Print-outs of rule questions (if applicable)
- Print-out or digital version of ASES
IN3.2.2 The following basic tools in good condition must be presented:
- Insulated cable shears
- Insulated screw drivers
-Multimeter with protected probe tips and two 4 mm banana plug test leads rated for
600 V CAT III or better
IN4 [EV ONLY ] Electrical Inspection
- Insulated tools, if bolted connections are used in the TS
- Face shield
- at least two pairs of HV insulating gloves (not expired)
- Two HV insulating blankets of at least 1 .0 m2each
-Safety glasses with side shields for all team members that might work on the TS or
accumulator
All electrical safety items must be rated for at least the maximum TS voltage.
IN 4 [EV ONLY ] ELECTRICAL INSPECTION
IN4.1 Electrical Inspection General Definitions
IN4.1.1 The insulation resistance between the TS and LVS ground will be measured. Vehicles with
a maximum TS voltage less than or equal to 250 V will be probed with 250 V and vehicles
with a maximum TS voltage greater than 250 V with 500 V.
To pass this test, the measured insulation resistance must be at least 500Ω/Vrelated to the
maximum TS voltage of the vehicle.
IN4.1.2 The IMD will be tested by connecting a resistor between the TSMP, see EV4 .7 and LVS
ground connector, see EV4.7.8.
The test is passed if the IMD shuts down the TS within 30 sat a fault resistance of 50 %
below the response value which corresponds to 250Ω/V.
IN4.1.3 The BSPD will be tested by sending an appropriate signal that represents the current, to
achieve ≤5 kW whilst pressing the brake pedal. This test must prove the functionality of the
complete BSPD except for any commercially available current sensors. Ends of a current
transducer’s auxiliary winding must be insulated.
IN4.2 Electrical Inspection Required Items
IN4.2.1 The following items must be presented at electrical inspection:
- Vehicle with mounted TS accumulator
- Jacks and push bar
-Samples of self designed PCBs that are part of the TS and are outside of the TSAC,
see EV4.3.7
- Tools needed for the BSPD check, see IN4.1.3
- Data sheets for all parts used in the TS
-Original delivery notes for material without serial number printed on according to
T1.2.1
- Tools needed for the (dis)assembly of parts for electrical inspection
- Print-outs of rule questions (if applicable)
- The connectors needed
IN5 Mechanical Inspection
–to safely close the SDC while the HVD is removed and
–to safely supply the TS using the same shrouded receptacles as used for TSMP
when the TS accumulator is unconnected
IN 5 M ECHANICAL INSPECTION
IN5.1 Mechanical Inspection Required Items
IN5.1.1 The following items must be presented at mechanical inspection:
- Jacks and push bar
- The tallest driver of the team
- Copies of any safety structure equivalency forms
- Copies of any impact attenuator data requirement
- Print-outs of rule questions (if applicable)
- Physically tested IA assembly, including (representative) test fixture (if applicable)
- Teams with a monocoque: laminate test specimen(s)
- Teams using alloyed steel: test specimen(s)
- Only tools needed for the (dis)assembly of parts for mechanical inspection
- [HY ONLY ] Copies of the HSF
-[HY ONLY ]HSC and any tools and/or materials needed to determine the weight limit
as per CV5.2.3
IN 6 A UTONOMOUS SYSTEM INSPECTION
IN6.1 Autonomous System Inspection Required Items
IN6.1.1 The following items are required:
- Data sheets for all perception sensors
- Documents which proof that all perception sensors meet local legislation
- RES remote control
- ASF
- Tools needed for the (dis)assembly of parts for autonomous system inspection
- Print-outs of rule questions (if applicable)
IN 7 T ILTTEST
IN7.1 Tilt Test Procedure
IN7.1.1 The tilt test will be conducted with the tallest driver fully strapped in normal driving position.
IN8 Vehicle Weighing
IN7.1.2 The tilt test will be conducted with all vehicle fluids at their maximum fill level.
IN7.1.3 The vehicle will be placed upon the tilt table and to an angle of 60◦. There must be no fluid
leaks and all wheels must remain in contact with the tilt table surface.
IN 8 V EHICLE WEIGHING
IN8.1 Vehicle Weighing Procedure
IN8.1.1 All vehicles must be weighed in ready-to-race condition.
IN8.1.2 All fluids must be at their maximum fill level for weighing.
IN 9 [EV ONLY ] RAINTEST
IN9.1 Rain Test General Definitions
IN9.1.1 Vehicles must have passed electrical inspection, see IN4, to attempt the rain test.
IN9.2 Rain Test Procedure
IN9.2.1 The vehicle must be in ready-to-race condition. All components and constructions used to
protect the vehicle from water during the rain test must be used during the entire competition.
IN9.2.2 The TS must be active during the rain test.
IN9.2.3 The vehicle must be jacked up using the jacks, see T13.2, and all driven wheels must be
removed.
IN9.2.4 The vehicle must not be in R2D mode, see EV4.11.
IN9.2.5 The test will be conducted without a driver.
IN9.2.6 Water will be sprayed at the vehicle from any possible direction. The water spray is similar
to a vehicle driving in rain and not a direct high-pressure stream of water.
IN9.2.7 The test is passed if the IMD is not triggered while water is sprayed at the vehicle for 120 s
and 120 s after the water spray has stopped.
IN 10 [CV ONLY ] NOISE TEST
IN10.1 Noise Test Procedure
IN10.1.1 The sound level will be measured during a static test.
IN10.1.2 The vehicle must be compliant at all engine speeds up to the maximum test speed, see
CV3.2.1.
IN10.1.3 Teams must bring a laptop to indicate the engine speed measured by the engine control unit.
IN11 Brake Test
IN10.1.4 Measurements will be made with a free-field microphone placed free from obstructions at
the exhaust outlet level, 0.5 mfrom the end of the exhaust outlet, at an angle of 45◦with the
outlet in the horizontal plane.
IN10.1.5 Where more than one exhaust outlet is present, the test will be repeated for each exhaust and
the highest reading will be used.
IN10.1.6 If the exhaust has any form of active tuning or throttling device or system, it must be
compliant with the rules in all positions. Manually adjustable tuning devices must require
tools to change them and must not be moved or modified after the noise test is passed. The
position of the device must be visible to the officials and manually operable by the officials
during the noise test.
IN10.1.7 The test will be run with the gearbox in neutral. During this test the vehicle must be jacked
up using the jacks, see T13.2.
IN10.1.8 After passing the noise test the function of the master switch, the cockpit-mounted shutdown
button and the inertia switch will be tested.
IN10.1.9 After passing IN10 .1.8 the air tightness of the intake system will be tested by closing off the
inlet after which the engine must stall.
IN 11 B RAKE TEST
IN11.1 Brake Test Procedure
IN11.1.1 Lock all four wheels and stop the vehicle in a straight line at the end of an acceleration run
specified by the officials.
IN11.1.2 [CV ONLY ] The vehicle must come to standstill without stalling the engine.
IN11.1.3 [EV ONLY ]After accelerating, the TS must be switched off by the driver, using the cockpit-
mounted shutdown button, and the driver must brake using only the mechanical brakes.
IN11.1.4 After the brake test, the vehicle must be able to continue driving under its own power without
external assistance.
IN11.1.5 The brake light, [EV ONLY ]and TSAL, illumination will be checked and the officials will
verify if the illumination is satisfactory for external observation.
IN11.1.6 [EV ONLY ]The R2D sound will be checked and the officials will verify if the sound level is
satisfactory.
IN11.2 EBS Test
IN11.2.1 The EBS performance will be tested dynamically and must demonstrate the performance
described in T15.4.
IN11.2.2 The test will be performed in a straight line marked with cones similar to acceleration.
IN12 Post Inspection
IN11.2.3 During the brake test, the vehicle must accelerate in autonomous mode up to at least 40km/h
within 20 m . From the point where the RES is triggered, the vehicle must come to a safe stop
within a maximum distance of 8 .5 m.
IN11.2.4 In case of wet track conditions, the stopping distance will be scaled by the officials dependent
on the friction level of the track.
IN11.2.5 The EBS test is conducted after all other elements of IN11 have been passed.
IN 12 P OST INSPECTION
IN12.1 Post Inspection Procedure
IN12.1.1 The officials reserve the right to impound any vehicle at any time during or after any of the
dynamic events to check for compliance with the rules. If necessary, the vehicle will remain
with the officials until the violation of the rule was discussed with the team.
IN12.1.2 After the endurance and trackdrive event, the vehicle must be placed in parc fermé where no
team member may access the vehicle.
IN12.1.3 During and after any dynamic event, the vehicle must be in compliance with the rules.
IN12.1.4 For each violation of the rules, the team receives a separate penalty as follows:
- Group A: Violation of the rules without advantage for the team
- Group B: Violation of the rules with advantage for the team (e.g. aerodynamics)
Acceleration Skidpad Autocross Endurance Trackdrive
Group A 0.3 s 0 .2 s 2 s 30 s 30 s
Group B 1 s 0 .6 s 5 s 2 min 2 min
The penalty applies to all runs since the vehicle entered the dynamic area the last time.
IN12.1.5 Violation of the rules concerning safety or the environment (e.g. BOTS, safety harness issues,
ground clearance, fluid leaks other than plain water, noise) results in DQ since entering the
dynamic area.
IN12.1.6 Losing a part of the vehicle on the track will result in DQ for that particular run.
IN12.1.7 Changes in vehicle weight of more than ±5 kg compared to the official technical inspection
weight, see IN8, results in a 20point penalty for each kgthe tolerance is exceeded by. E.g. a
weight difference of ±6.2 kg results in in a 40 point penalty.
IN12.1.8 [EV ONLY ]The vehicle must be able to enter R2D mode, see EV4 .11, during post inspection
process for all tests requiring this mode. Violation will result in DQ.
IN12.1.9 [EV ONLY ]Directly after endurance and leaving parc fermé, every team must come back to
the charging area to disassemble the temperature logging device (if used by the competition)
from the TS accumulator, see EV5.8.6.
IN12.1.10 Directly after the last dynamic discipline and leaving parc fermé, the data logger (if installed),
see EV4.6 or T14.2, will be disassembled from the vehicle.

S S TATIC EVENTS
S 1 G ENERAL RULES
S1.1 Vehicle Condition
S1.1.1 Vehicles must be presented for judging in finished condition, fully assembled, complete and
ready-to-race.
S1.1.2 The judges will not evaluate any vehicle that is presented in what they consider to be an
unfinished state.
S1.1.3 Vehicles may be presented for judging without having passed technical inspection, even if
final tuning and setup is in progress.
S1.1.4 Covers and/or parts may be removed during the judging to facilitate access and presentation
of components or concepts.
S 2 B USINESS PLAN PRESENTATION EVENT
S2.1 Business Plan Presentation Objective
S2.1.1 The objective of the BPP is to assess the team’s ability to develop and present a comprehensive
business model. This business model must offer a product or a service based on the team’s
specific prototype vehicle or a specific component of it, providing a rewarding business
opportunity that creates a monetary profit. The vehicle or component must be an essential
part of the value proposition.
S2.1.2 The judges should be treated as if they were potential investors or partners for the presented
business model.
S2.1.3 The quality of the actual prototype will not be considered as part of the BPP judging, therefore
S1.1 does not apply.
S2.2 Business Plan Presentation Procedure
S2.2.1 Presentations are limited to a maximum of 10 min . The judges will stop any presentation
exceeding 10 min.
S2.2.2 The presentation will not be interrupted by questions. Immediately following the presentation
there will be a question and answer session.
S2.2.3 One or more team members may present the business plan.
S2 Business Plan Presentation Event
S2.2.4 All team members involved in the BPP must be in the podium area and must be introduced to
the judges at the beginning of the presentation. The team members who have been introduced
may answer the judges’ questions even if they were not actually presenting.
S2.2.5 Teams that fail to make their presentation within their assigned time period will receive zero
points for the BPP.
S2.2.6 Before the competition a specific deep dive topic, which has to be part of the 10 min
presentation, will be published on the competition website.
S2.3 Pitch Video
S2.3.1 To convince the potential investors or partners that the team’s presentation is worthy of
their time, it is required that a Business Plan Pitch Video (BPPV) is submitted before the
competition. The pitch video should be considered as the first impression of the business
idea and has to contain the relevant investment figures.
S2.3.2 The BPPV must be submitted online via the competition website, not later than the deadline
specified in the competition handbook.
S2.3.3 The BPPV must not exceed a length of 30 sand must be in a common video format, e.g. avi,
mpg, mp4, wmv.
S2.4 Business Plan Presentation Scoring
S2.4.1 The BPP will be evaluated on the categories specified in table 6.
Category Points
Pitch Video 10
Content 20
Finances 10
Deep Dive Topic 10
Demonstration and Structure 15
Delivery 10
Questions 10
General Impression 15
Total 100
Table 6: BPP evaluation categories
S2.4.2 If the business model presented does not relate to one of the areas listed within S2.1.1,
15 penaltypoints will be deducted from the team’s BPP scoring.
S2.4.3 The judging at the competition will start with an initial judging, where all teams are judged
by different judging groups.
S2.4.4 Some teams may be chosen to participate in the BPP finals to determine the BPP winner.
The BPP finals will be held separately from the initial judging and teams will be informed
about their participation during the event.
S2.4.5 The scoring of the BPP is based on the average of the scores given by each of the judges.
S3 Cost and Manufacturing Event
S2.4.6 The scoring for the non-finalist is calculated as followed:
BPP_SCORE =70Pteam
Pmax
Pteamis the score awarded to the team
Pmaxis the highest score awarded to any team not participating in the finals
S2.4.7 The scoring of the BPP finalists will vary from 75to71points and is scored immediately
after the BPP finals by all judges.
S 3 C OST AND MANUFACTURING EVENT
S3.1 Cost and Manufacturing Objective
S3.1.1 The objective of the cost and manufacturing event is to evaluate the team’s understanding
of the manufacturing processes, costs and greenhouse gas emissions associated with the
construction of a prototype vehicle. This includes trade off decisions between content and
cost, make or buy decisions and understanding the differences between prototype and mass
production.
S3.2 Cost and Manufacturing Procedure
S3.2.1 Prior to the competition, three Cost Report Documents (CRD), see S3.3, must be submitted
to the competition website by the deadline specified in the competition handbook.
S3.2.2 During the competition, a discussion with the judges will take place, next to the team’s
vehicle. The discussion is split into three parts:
S3.2.3 Part 1 “Bill of Material (BOM) Discussion”:
A discussion to evaluate the team’s ability to prepare an accurate engineering and manufac-
turing BOM for the complete vehicle. The team must prove the following:
-The specification of the vehicle in the CRD accurately reflects the vehicle brought to
the competition.
-The costs and emissions within the Costed Carbonized Bill of Material (CCBOM) part
of the BOM are correct and realistic.
- The manufacturing feasibility of the vehicle.
S3.2.4 Part 2 “Cost Understanding”:
A discussion to evaluate the general cost and manufacturing knowledge of the team.
S3.2.5 Part 3 “Real Case”:
A specific task to evaluate the cost and manufacturing knowledge in a certain field. The real
case task will be published on the competition website before the competition.
S3.2.6 The teams must present their vehicle to the judges at the designated time. Teams that miss
their time slot will score 0 points.
S3.2.7 Teams are allowed to bring electronic, handwritten or printed handouts, flip charts or similar
to the event, but the space available may be limited.
S3 Cost and Manufacturing Event
S3.3 Cost Report Documents
S3.3.1 The CRD consist of the following documents:
-The BOM, including CCBOM, created and submitted online on the competition
website
- The supporting material file, submitted as a pdf file to the competition website
-The cost and emissions explanation file, submitted as a pdf file to to the competition
website
S3.3.2 A changelog of the changes on the vehicle since the submission deadline of the CRD can be
presented to the judges at the BOM discussion. Missing parts of the BOM cannot be part of
the changelog.
S3.3.3 All CRD must be brought to the event discussion either as hard copy or as digital version.
S3.3.4 The website tool will provide a printable pdf version of the BOM.
S3.3.5 The team must ensure that at least two judges are able to review the CRD independently.
S3.3.6 The presented CRD must be identical to the submitted versions, otherwise 0 points will be
scored for the “BOM Discussion” part.
S3.4 Bill of Material
S3.4.1 The BOM is a sorted list of all vehicle parts.
S3.4.2 The BOM is structured as follows:
- The BOM is broken down into “systems”, see S3.4.7.
-Each “system” is broken down into “assemblies”, which are defined by the website
tool.
-Each “assembly” can optionally be broken down into “sub-assemblies”, which must
be defined by the team.
-Each “assembly” or “sub-assembly” is broken down into “parts”, which must be
defined by the team.
S3.4.3 The BOM must list all parts fitted to the prototype vehicle at any time during the competition.
S3.4.4 Only dry tires and wheels per T2.7.1 need to be included in the BOM.
S3.4.5 “Fasteners” are additional items necessary to assemble a “part” or “(sub-)assembly” and
should not be listed (e.g. DIN-931 hexagon screw, glue, tape, zip-tie, . . . ).
S3.4.6 A self-manufactured “fastener” is considered a “part”.
S3.4.7 The “systems” are:
- Autonomous System
- Brake System
- Chassis and Body
- Drivetrain
S3 Cost and Manufacturing Event
- Engine and Tractive System
- Grounded Low V oltage System
- Miscellaneous, Fit and Finish
- Steering System
- Suspension System
- Wheels, Wheel Bearings and Tires
S3.4.8 When adding “parts” to the BOM, the comments section should be reviewed thoroughly.
The chosen part name must clearly describe what is included. For example, if a spring is
included, the “part” should not be called “damper”.
S3.4.9 Only metric units must be used within the BOM.
S3.5 Costed Carbonized Bill of Material
S3.5.1 The manufacturing and assembly processes, actual costs and greenhouse gas emissions of all
parts from one or two systems of the BOM must be listed in the CCBOM.
S3.5.2 For 2025, a CCBOM for the “Steering System” must be submitted.
S3.5.3 Additional to the BOM, the CCBOM must:
-Include the actual associated manufacturing processes for each part as used for the
prototype vehicle.
- Include tooling (e.g. welding jigs, molds, patterns and dies).
-Include the actual costs of materials, fabrication, bought parts and assembly for each
part as used for the prototype vehicle.
-Include the system’s carbon footprint for each part, manufacturing and assembly
process of the prototype vehicle in Carbon Dioxide Equivalents (CO 2e).
S3.5.4 Each constituent “part” of an “assembly” must be classified as “bought” or “made”.
S3.5.5 Additional to the structure of the BOM, in the CCBOM each “part” is broken down into
- “materials” used (e.g. aluminium)
- “processes” that describe the necessary steps for manufacturing
- “fasteners” used to assemble the part (if applicable)
- “tooling” required for manufacturing (if applicable)
S3.5.6 “Tooling” is the necessary tools used for transforming the “material” into the desired shape.
If production tooling is associated with processes that are specific to the part geometry, it
must be included. For example the dies to stamp out a chassis bracket are tooling.
S3.5.7 Hand or power tools must not be included.
S3.5.8 For “bought parts”, only fasteners have to be included (if applicable). If the part was modified,
the associated “processes” and “tooling” (if applicable) for this modification must also be
included.
S3 Cost and Manufacturing Event
S3.5.9 Only parts that can be bought from a catalog may be designated as “bought parts”.
S3.5.10 The cost calculations must be completed as realistically as possible and exclude research,
development and capital expenditures for real estates (e.g. plant or development hours of the
team).
S3.5.11 All costs must be displayed in EUR. For calculating the prices in EUR from other currencies,
the team must provide the exchange rates used.
S3.5.12 There is no maximum cost. Receipts are not required for any items.
S3.5.13 The calculations for machine hourly rates, wages (including overheads) etc. must be shown.
S3.5.14 The “carbon footprint” is calculated in CO 2e based on a “Cradle-to-Gate” Life Cycle
Assessment (LCA) of the selected “system(s)”.
S3.5.15 The “Cradle-to-Gate” analysis includes extraction of raw materials needed, manufacturing of
“made parts”, “sub-assemblies” and “assemblies” as well as manufacturing of the “system”
(ready to be mounted into the final prototype vehicle).
S3.5.16 For “bought parts”, only the “carbon footprint” of modifications has to be included.
S3.5.17 The “carbon footprint” for the the transportation between the steps must be included.
S3.5.18 The “carbon footprint” must exclude research and development.
S3.6 Supporting Material File
S3.6.1 The supporting material file is a document containing additional information which allows
the judges to understand the BOM. It should include drawings, exploded view drawings
and/or pictures of the vehicle and the parts included in the BOM.
S3.7 Cost and Emissions Explanation File
S3.7.1 The cost and emissions explanation file is a document which allows the judges to understand
the costs and greenhouse gas emissions within the CCBOM part of the BOM.
S3.7.2 The cost model used must be pointed out, especially which specific costs are included, e.g.
machine operation costs.
S3.7.3 The methodology used for determining the Global Warming Potential (GWP) in CO 2e also
needs to be explained. The specific carbon emission factors associates with e.g one material
type need to be included.
S3.8 Cost and Manufacturing Scoring
S3.8.1 The team must present their vehicle according to S1.1 to score points in the cost and
manufacturing event.
S3.8.2 The cost and manufacturing event will be evaluated on the categories specified in the
following table:
S4 Engineering Design Event
Category Points
Part 1 “BOM Discussion” 50
Part 2 “Cost Understanding” 25
Part 3 “Real Case” 25
Total 100
S3.8.3 If items are missing from the BOM, points are deducted until 0points are scored for “BOM
Discussion”.
S3.8.4 Some teams may be chosen to participate in the cost and manufacturing finals to determine
the cost and manufacturing event winner. The cost and manufacturing finals will be held
separately from the initial judging and teams will be informed about their participation during
the event.
S3.8.5 In case of finals the highest achievable scoring for the non-finalists is 80 points.
S 4 E NGINEERING DESIGN EVENT
S4.1 Engineering Design Objective
S4.1.1 The concept of the design event is to evaluate the student’s engineering process and effort
that went into the design of a vehicle, meeting the intent of the competition.
S4.1.2 Proprietary components and systems that are incorporated into the vehicle design as finished
items are not evaluated as a student designed unit, but are only assessed on the team’s
selection and application of that unit.
S4.1.3 An evaluation concerning the capability of the vehicle to drive autonomously will also be
part of this event. Therefore, all systems that are required to drive autonomously will be
investigated. This also includes a discussion about the hardware and the software used in the
AS.
S4.2 Engineering Design Report
S4.2.1 The EDR should contain a brief description of the overall vehicle including the AS with a
review and derivation of the team’s design objectives. Any information to scope, explain
or highlight design features, concepts, methods or objectives to express the value and
performance of the vehicle to the judges should be included at the teams’ discretion.
S4.2.2 The EDR must not exceed ten pages, consisting of not more than seven pages of content
(text, which may include pictures and graphs) and three pages of drawings.
S4.2.3 The three EDR drawings (no renderings) must show the vehicle from the front, the top and
the side. Each drawing must appear on a separate page.
S4.2.4 Any measures to facilitate reviewing the drawings (e.g. measurements, details, colors) may
be utilized at the teams’ discretion.
S4.2.5 Any portions of the EDR that exceeds seven pages of content and/or three pages of drawings
will not be evaluated.
S4 Engineering Design Event
S4.2.6 If included, cover sheets and tables of contents will count as text pages.
S4.2.7 The EDR will be used to sort the teams into appropriate design queues based on the quality
of its review.
S4.2.8 Evidence of information mentioned in the EDR should be brought to the competition and be
available, on request, for review by the judges.
S4.3 Design Spec Sheet
S4.3.1 A completed DSS must be submitted online on the competition website.
S4.4 Engineering Design Procedure
S4.4.1 The design event starts with the submission of the DSS and the EDR and their review
respectively.
S4.4.2 At the competition, teams will present their knowledge and their vehicle to the judges, which
will evaluate the teams’ performance following the design objectives stated in chapter S4.1.
S4.4.3 Some teams may be chosen to participate in the design finals to determine the engineering
design event winner. The design finals will be held separately from the initial judging and
teams will be informed about their participation during the event.
S4.4.4 Teams may bring any photographs, drawings, charts, spare parts or other material that they
believe are supportive to the design event, but the space provided for design judging may be
limited.
S4.4.5 [EV ONLY ]Only sealed TSACs which passed the accumulator inspection may be presented
or mounted in the vehicle. They must not be opened.
S4.4.6 [EV ONLY ]Only discharged, below 5 %State of Charge, accumulator cells each having all
terminals electrically isolated may be presented.
S4.4.7 [DC ONLY ]There is no extra design presentation for the DC, however scoring will be
adapted, see table 8, and there will be more judges during the normal presentation focusing
on the AS.
S4.4.8 [DC ONLY ] There will be separate design finals for the DC.
S4.5 Engineering Design Judging Criteria
S4.5.1 The judges will evaluate the engineering effort based upon the teams’ DSS and EDR,
responses to questions and an inspection of the vehicle.
S4.5.2 The judges will inspect the vehicle to determine if the design concepts are adequate and
appropriate for the application (relative to the objectives set forth in the rules).
S4.5.3 The judges may deduct points if the team cannot adequately explain the engineering and
construction of the vehicle.
S4 Engineering Design Event
S4.6 Engineering Design Scoring
S4.6.1 The team must present their vehicle according to S1.1 to score points in the engineering
design event.
S4.6.2 The overall engineering design event maximum scoring is 150 points.
S4.6.3 The maximum scores listed in table 7 apply for the engineering design event.
Category Points
Overall Vehicle Concept 20
Software 10
Vehicle Performance 30
Mechanical / Structural 15
Tractive System / Powertrain 25
LV-Electrics / Electronics 10
Autonomous Functionality 20
Driver Interface 10
Engineering Design Report (EDR) 10
Table 7: Maximum scores in engineering design event
Category Points
Overall Vehicle Concept 20
Software / Compute 30
Vehicle Performance 30
Autonomous Functionality 70
Table 8: [DC ONLY ] Maximum scores in engineering design event

D D YNAMIC EVENTS
D 1 D YNAMIC EVENTS GENERAL
D1.1 Definitions
D1.1.1 Starting – crossing the light barrier at the starting line starts a lap.
D1.1.2 Finishing – crossing the light barrier at the finish line ends a lap. Can be the same as the
starting line.
D1.1.3 Lap – a complete trip on a defined track, beginning at the start line and ending at the finish
line.
D1.1.4 Run – a single attempt to compete in a dynamic event. Runs consist of one or more lap(s). A
run is started when receiving a G REEN FLAG or the go-signal by the officials.
D1.1.5 Did Not Finish (DNF) – starting a run without finishing it. For the purpose of scoring, a
DNF is treated as a DQ.
D1.1.6 Disqualified (DQ) – being removed from the scoring due to a rule violation.
D1.1.7 Valid Run – a run that is neither DNF nor DQ.
D1.1.8 Running Order – the sequence in which teams take part in a dynamic event. If not defined
otherwise, the running order is queue based and teams on their first run receive priority.
D1.1.9 To score points in any dynamic event, a team must have at least one valid run in that event.
D1.2 Driver Limitations
D1.2.1 In total, a minimum of three and a maximum of four drivers are allowed for each team.
D1.2.2 An individual driver must not drive in more than two dynamic events.
D1.2.3 The endurance and efficiency event is considered a single event.
D1.2.4 An individual driver must not drive more than two runs in each dynamic event.
D1.2.5 No more than two drivers are allowed to drive in each dynamic event.
D1.3 Number of Runs in the Dynamic Events
D1.3.1 Table 9 defines the number of runs for each dynamic event.
D2 Driving Rules
Runs in Runs in
Dynamic Event Manual Mode Autonomous Mode
Acceleration 2 -
DV Acceleration - 2
Autocross 4 -
[DC ONLY ] DV Autocross - 2
Endurance 1 -
Skidpad 2 -
DV Skidpad - 2
[DC ONLY ] Trackdrive - 1
Table 9: Number of runs for each dynamic event
D1.4 Dynamic Area and Dynamic Vests
D1.4.1 The technical inspections and all dynamic events are held in the dynamic area.
D1.4.2 Four dynamic vests are handed out to each team by the officials and must be worn in the
dynamic area.
D1.4.3 Only four members per team, including the driver, may enter the dynamic area at one time.
D1.4.4 Drivers must not wear the dynamic vest when sitting in the vehicle. The driver’s vest must
be attached to the pushbar.
D1.4.5 The number of tools that may be used in this area is restricted to those which can be safely
carried by the four team members in one trip.
D1.5 Track Walks
D1.5.1 There will be track walks before the Autocross, Endurance and [DC ONLY ]Trackdrive
event.
D1.5.2 During the track walk only analogue measurement devices may be used.
D 2 D RIVING RULES
D2.1 Flags
D2.1.1 Flag signals are commands that must be obeyed immediately and without question.
D2.1.2 There will be no flag signs for vehicles in autonomous mode.
D2.1.3 BLACK FLAG – the driver must pull into the driver change area for discussion with the
officials concerning an incident. A time penalty may be assessed.
D2.1.4 BLACK FLAG WITHORANGE DOT/ M ECHANICAL BLACK FLAG – the driver must pull
into the driver change area for a mechanical inspection of the vehicle, something has been
observed that requires a closer inspection.
D2.1.5 BLUE FLAG – the driver must pull into the designated passing zone to be passed by a faster
competitor. The driver must obey the track marshals’ signals at the end of the passing zone.
D2 Driving Rules
D2.1.6 CHEQUERED FLAG – the session has been completed. The driver must exit the track at the
first opportunity.
D2.1.7 G REEN FLAG
-The session has started, the driver may enter the track under direction of the track
marshals. In case of stalling, the vehicle can be restarted, but the driver has to await
another G REEN FLAG as the opening in traffic may have closed.
-The driver is clear to re-enter the track after using the slow lane to let a faster vehicle
pass.
- The driver may pick up speed again after a Y ELLOW FLAG was displayed.
D2.1.8 REDFLAG – the driver must come to an immediate safe and controlled stop on the track and
must follow track marshals’ directions.
D2.1.9 YELLOW FLAG – danger, the driver must slow down, something has happened beyond the
flag station, no overtaking unless directed by the track marshals.
D2.1.10 REDANDYELLOW STRIPED FLAG – the track is slippery or something is on the racing
surface that should not be there. The driver must be prepared for evasive manoeuvres to
avoid the situation.
D2.2 Teleoperated Driving
D2.2.1 After the vehicle has crossed the starting line it is prohibited to change parameters, send
commands or perform any software changes by wireless communication until the vehicle
has crossed the finish line. Receiving information from the vehicle via one-way-telemetry is
allowed.
D2.2.2 The only device that is allowed to send commands by wireless communication at all times is
the RES described in T14.3.
D2.3 Driving Under Power
D2.3.1 During driving, the mechanical integrity of the vehicle must be maintained.
D2.3.2 Vehicles must not be driven in reverse.
D2.3.3 The vehicle must be capable of starting and restarting without external assistance/batteries at
all times.
D2.3.4 Push starts are prohibited.
D2.3.5 Burnouts before and during the events are prohibited.
D2.3.6 When driving in autonomous mode, an ASR has to be present at the race control with
the RES. Additionally, a single monitoring device (laptop, tablet, ...) may be brought (no
complicated antenna construction or similar!).
D2 Driving Rules
D2.4 Practice Track
D2.4.1 A practice track for testing and tuning vehicles is available.
D2.4.2 To use the practice track, vehicles must have passed all technical inspections.
D2.4.3 Practice or testing at any location other than the practice track is absolutely forbidden.
D2.5 Cones & Markings for Autonomous Running
D2.5.1 Details of the cones used and more detailed track layout figures can be found in the competi-
tion handbook.
D2.6 Start-up Procedure for Autonomous Running
D2.6.1 No additional equipment (e.g. laptop, jack-up device, pressure tank, etc.) is allowed to start
up the vehicle at the staging/starting line.
D2.6.2 If the vehicle does not enter “AS Ready” state within 1 min after being staged, the team may
be sent back to the preparation area by the officials. In this case any priority is lost.
D2.6.3 The vehicle may only be staged with the steering system in straight position.
D2.6.4 The ASMS may only be switched on by the ASR after approval from an official at the starting
line.
D2.7 Vehicle Break Downs and Usage of RES during Autonomous Running
D2.7.1 If a vehicle comes to standstill for any reason, it may have up to 30 sto attempt to continue
to drive. If the vehicle doesn’t restart within 30 s, it will be disqualified.
D2.7.2 If the average speed of the first three laps in trackdrive (after completing the third lap) is
below 2.5m/sor the average speed of any of the following laps is below 3.5m/s, the vehicle
will be disqualified.
D2.7.3 If a traceable signal loss of the RES appears and doubtless proof can be brought by the team
that it was not self-inflicted, a re-run may be granted for the respective autonomous run, if
the officials are notified before the affected dynamic event closes. The data logger data must
be uploaded before notifying the officials.
D2.7.4 At the direction of the officials, team members may be instructed to retrieve broken-down
vehicles. This recovery may only be done under the control of the officials.
D2.8 Procedure After Completing a Driverless (DV) Dynamic Event
D2.8.1 After approval from the officials the ASR has to deactivate the vehicle using the RES.
D2.8.2 The vehicle must be collected by the ASR and an additional team member immediately after
approval from the officials.
D3 Weather Conditions
D2.9 Handling of Re-Runs
D2.9.1 A re-run may be granted in following cases:
- Usage of Y ELLOW FLAG in Autocross.
- Usage of R EDFLAG.
-Usage of RES to ensure safe conditions on the track or traceable signal loss of the
RES according to D2.7.
- After official’s decision due to technical or organizational issues.
D2.9.2 The team will be informed about a granted re-run either by a sign at the exit or by direct
communication through an official.
D2.9.3 It is at the discretion of the team whether they accept the re-run. If the re-run is accepted, it
must be executed immediately and the corresponding initial run is removed from the scoring.
D 3 W EATHER CONDITIONS
D3.1 Operating Conditions
D3.1.1 The following track conditions are recognized:
- Dry
- Damp
- Wet
D3.1.2 The operating condition are decided by the officials and may change at any time.
D3.1.3 The current operating condition will be prominently displayed at the dynamic area.
D3.2 Tires Allowed
D3.2.1 Teams must run the tires allowed for each operating condition:
Operating Condition Tires allowed
Dry Dry
Damp Dry or Wet
Wet Wet
D3.2.2 When the operating condition is damp, teams may change between dry tires and wet tires:
- Any time during the acceleration, skidpad, and autocross events.
- Any time before taking the G REEN FLAG to start endurance and according to D7.6.
D3.2.3 If an event had varied operating conditions, the minimum performance levels to score points
may be adjusted if deemed appropriate by the officials.
D3.2.4 Only one set of tires per type (dry/wet) may be used during all the dynamic events. The
brake test, practice area, [DC ONLY ]driverless autocross, [DC ONLY ]trackdrive and the
static events are excluded from this regulation.
D4 Skidpad Event
D 4 S KIDPAD EVENT
D4.1 Skidpad Track Layout
D4.1.1 The skidpad track consists of two pairs of concentric circles in a figure of eight patterns.
D4.1.2 The centers of these circles are 18.25 m apart. The inner circles are 15.25 m in diameter and
the outer circles are 21 .25 m in diameter.
D4.1.3 17 cones are placed around the inside of each inner circle. 13cones are positioned around
the outside of each outer circle, in the pattern shown in the skidpad layout diagram.
D4.1.4 Each circle is marked with a line, outside the inner circle and inside the outer circle.
D4.1.5 The driving path is the 3 mwide path between the inner and outer circles. The vehicles enter
and exit through gates on a 3 m wide path that is tangent to the circles where they meet.
D4.1.6 The line between the centers of the circles defines the start/finish line. A lap is defined as
traveling around one of the circles, starting and ending at the start/finish line.
Ø15.25 m18.25 m3.00 mCones
Start/Finish Line
Figure 21: Skidpad Track Layout
D4.2 Skidpad Procedure
D4.2.1 A run consists of a sequence of laps in exactly the following order. The vehicle must enter
perpendicular to the figure of eight and must take one full lap on the right circle to establish
the turn. The next lap must be on the right circle and will be timed. Immediately following
the second lap, the vehicle must enter the left circle for the third lap. The fourth lap must be
D4 Skidpad Event
on the left circle and will be timed. Immediately upon finishing the fourth lap, the vehicle
must exit the track perpendicular to the figure of eight and moving in the same direction as
entered.
D4.2.2 [MANUAL MODE ONLY ]The driver has the option to make the second run immediately
after their first run.
D4.2.3 [AUTONOMOUS MODE ONLY ]The foremost part of the vehicle is staged 15 m in front of
the starting line.
D4.2.4 [AUTONOMOUS MODE ONLY ]After exiting the track the vehicle must come to a full stop
within 25 m behind the finish line, inside the marked exit lane and enter the finish-state
described in T14.8.
D4.3 Skidpad Scoring
D4.3.1 The run time is the average time of the timed left and the timed right circle plus penalties
which are added after the averaging.
D4.3.2 [AUTONOMOUS MODE ONLY ]Runs with a run time without penalties >25 swill be dis-
qualified.
D4.3.3 [M ANUAL MODE ONLY ] Points are given based on the following formula:
M_SKIDPAD _SCORE =0.95Pmax

Tmax
Tteam2
−1
0.5625
+0.05Pmax
with
Pmaxis the maximum points for the event according to table 3
Tteam is the team’s best manual mode time including penalties. Tteamis capped to Tmax.
Tmaxis 1.25 times the time of the fastest manual mode vehicle including penalties.
D4.3.4 [A UTONOMOUS MODE ONLY ] Points are given based on the following formula:
DV_SKIDPAD _SCORE =PmaxNall+1−RDV ,team
Nall
with
Pmaxis the maximum points for the event according to table 3
RDV,team is the ranking of team’s best autonomous mode time including penalties within the
best autonomous mode times including penalties of all other teams
Nallis the number of teams who have at least one valid manual mode or autonomous mode
run
D5 Acceleration Event
D4.3.5 [DC ONLY ] Points are given based on the following formula:
DC_SKIDPAD _SCORE =0.95Pmax

Tmax
Tteam2
−1
1.25
+0.05Pmax
with
Pmaxis the maximum points for the event according to table 3
Tteam is the team’s best autonomous mode time including penalties. Tteamis capped to Tmax.
Tmaxis 1.5 times the time of the fastest autonomous mode vehicle including penalties.
D 5 A CCELERATION EVENT
D5.1 Acceleration Track Layout
D5.1.1 The acceleration track is a straight line with a length of 75 m from starting line to finish line.
The track is at least 3 m wide. Cones are placed along the track at intervals of about 5 m.
D5.2 Acceleration Procedure
D5.2.1 A run consists of a single lap.
D5.2.2 [MANUAL MODE ONLY ]The driver has the option to make the second run immediately
after their first run.
D5.2.3 The foremost part of the vehicle is staged 0 .30 m behind the starting line.
D5.2.4 [AUTONOMOUS MODE ONLY ]After the finish line, the vehicle must come to a full stop
within 75 m behind the finish line inside the marked exit lane and enter the finish-state
described in T14.8.
D5.3 Acceleration Scoring
D5.3.1 [AUTONOMOUS MODE ONLY ]Runs with a time without penalties >25 swill be disqualified.
D5.3.2 [M ANUAL MODE ONLY ] Points are given based on the following formula:
M_ACCELERATION _SCORE =0.95Pmax Tmax
Tteam−1
0.5!
+0.05Pmax
with
Pmaxis the maximum points for the event according to table 3
Tteam is the team’s best manual mode time including penalties. Tteamis capped to Tmax.
Tmaxis 1.5 times the time of the fastest manual mode vehicle including penalties.
D6 Autocross Event
D5.3.3 [A UTONOMOUS MODE ONLY ] Points are given based on the following formula:
DV_ACCELERATION _SCORE =PmaxNall+1−RDV ,team
Nall
with
Pmaxis the maximum points for the event according to table 3
RDV,team is the ranking of team’s best autonomous mode time including penalties within the
best autonomous mode times including penalties of all other teams
Nallis the number of teams who have at least one valid manual mode or autonomous mode
run
D5.3.4 [DC ONLY ] Points are given based on the following formula:
DC_ACCELERATION _SCORE =0.95PmaxTmax
Tteam−1
+0.05Pmax
with
Pmaxis the maximum points for the event according to table 3
Tteam is the team’s best autonomous mode time including penalties. Tteamis capped to Tmax.
Tmaxis 2 times the time of the fastest autonomous mode vehicle including penalties.
D 6 A UTOCROSS EVENT
D6.1 Autocross Track Layout
D6.1.1 The autocross track layout is a handling track built to the following guidelines:
- Straights: No longer than 80 m
- Slaloms: Cones in a straight line with 7 .5 m to 12 m spacing
- Miscellaneous: Chicanes, multiple turns, decreasing radius turns, hairpin turns, etc.
- The minimum track width is 3 m
- The minimum required turning diameter is 9 m
D6.1.2 The length of the autocross track is less than 1 .5 km.
D6.1.3 [DC ONLY ] The autocross track layout is instead built to the guidelines defined in D8.1.
D6.2 Autocross Procedure
D6.2.1 A run consists of a single lap.
D6.2.2 [MANUAL MODE ONLY ]Each driver has the option to make the second run immediately
after their first run.
D6.2.3 [AUTONOMOUS MODE ONLY ]The vehicle is staged such that the front wheels are 6 min
front of the starting line on the track.
D7 Endurance and Efficiency Event
D6.2.4 [AUTONOMOUS MODE ONLY ]After the run the vehicle must come to a full stop within
30 m behind the finish line on the track and enter the finish-state described in T14.8.
D6.3 Autocross Scoring
D6.3.1 [M ANUAL MODE ONLY ] Points are given based on the following formula:
AUTOCROSS _SCORE =0.95Pmax Tmax
Tteam−1
0.25!
+0.05Pmax
Pmaxis the maximum points for the event according to table 3.
Tteamis the team’s best manual mode time including penalties. T teamis capped at T max
Tmaxis 1.25 times the time of the fastest manual mode vehicle including penalties.
D6.3.2 [DC ONLY ] Points are given based on the following formula:
AUTOCROSS _SCORE =0.9PmaxTmax−Tteam ,total
Tmax−Tmin
+0.1Pmax
Tteam ,total =min(Tteam ,1,avg(Tteam ,1,Tteam ,2))
Pmaxis the maximum points for the event according to table 3.
Tteam ,1is the team’s autonomous mode time including penalties of run 1.
Tteam ,2is the team’s autonomous mode time including penalties of run 2.
Tmaxis the time for driving the lap with 6m/s.
Tminis the fastest autonomous mode Tteam ,totalof all teams.
For runs that are DNF or DQ or for runs with a Tteam ,iabove Tmax,Tteam ,iis set to Tmax.
D 7 E NDURANCE AND EFFICIENCY EVENT
D7.1 Endurance Track Layout
D7.1.1 The endurance track layout is a closed lap circuit built to the following guidelines:
- Straights: No longer than 80 m
- Slaloms: Cones in a straight line with 9 m to 15 m spacing
- Miscellaneous: Chicanes, multiple turns, decreasing radius turns, hairpin turns, etc.
- The minimum track width is 3 m
- The minimum required turning diameter is 9 m
D7.1.2 The length of one lap of the endurance track is approximately 1 km.
D7.1.3 The length of the complete endurance is approximately 22 km.
D7.2 Endurance Procedure
D7.2.1 Before entering the event, each CV’s fuel tank must be filled to the fuel level line, see CV2 .6.4,
at the fueling station. During fueling, once filled to the scribe line, no shaking or tilting of
the tank, the fuel system or the entire vehicle is allowed.
D7 Endurance and Efficiency Event
D7.2.2 A run consists of a multiple laps driven by two different drivers.
D7.2.3 The first driver will drive for 11 km and will then be signaled into the driver change area.
D7.2.4 After the driver change specified in D7.5, the second driver will drive for an additional 11 km
and will be signaled to exit the track after crossing the finish line.
D7.2.5 [CV ONLY ]The second driver will proceed directly to the fueling station. The tank will be
filled to the refill mark and the amount of fuel will be recorded.
D7.3 Endurance Running Order
D7.3.1 The running order for the endurance will be established in a way that vehicles with similar
speeds are on the track together.
D7.3.2 The running order will be published according to the competition handbook.
D7.3.3 The procedure for handling the running order is defined in the competition handbook.
D7.4 Passing
D7.4.1 During the endurance event, overtaking is only permissible in the designated passing zones
and under the control of the track marshals.
D7.4.2 Passing zones have two parallel lanes, a slow lane only used by the vehicles that are being
overtaken and a fast lane for the vehicles that are overtaking.
D7.4.3 Passing zones may be situated on either the left or right of the fast lane.
D7.4.4 The passing zone procedure will be as follows:
-A slower leading vehicle will be shown the BLUE FLAG and must drive into the slow
lane and decelerate.
- The following faster vehicle will continue in the fast lane to pass the slow vehicle.
-The vehicle that has been overtaken may re-enter the track when the track marshal
who is in charge of that passing zone is showing the G REEN FLAG.
D7.4.5 The passing rules do not apply to vehicles that are stopped on track or vehicles that have
spun out and are not moving. When passing a stationary vehicle, it is critical to slow down,
drive cautiously and to follow the instructions from the track marshals.
D7.5 Endurance Driver Change Procedure
D7.5.1 Only three team members including the drivers may enter the driver change area. They may
only bring the tools required to adjust the vehicle to accommodate the second driver and/or
change tires.
D7.5.2 [EV ONLY ] One team member must be an ESO.
D7.5.3 During the driver change, the team may:
- perform changes to accommodate the second driver
D7 Endurance and Efficiency Event
- operate the master switch(es)
- change tires as per D7.6.
No other work may be performed during the driver change.
D7.5.4 Each team is given 3 min to change their driver.
D7.5.5 The driver change time will start once the vehicle is stopped in the driver change area and
the first driver has turned off the [CV ONLY ] engine / [EV ONLY ] TS.
D7.5.6 [EV ONLY ]The TSMS must be switched off by the ESO and the TSAL must have changed
to green color, before anyone is allowed to touch the vehicle or to climb out of the vehicle.
D7.5.7 The first driver will climb out of the vehicle and any necessary adjustments will be made to
the vehicle to fit the second driver (seat cushions, head restraint, pedal position, etc.). The
second driver will then be secured in the vehicle.
D7.5.8 When the second driver is fully secured in the vehicle, the vehicle has restarted and is R2D
again, the driver change time is stopped.
D7.5.9 If the driver change takes longer than 3 min, the extra time is included in the final time.
D7.6 Endurance Event Tire Changes
D7.6.1 All tire changes after a vehicle has received the GREEN FLAG to start the endurance event
must take place in the driver change area.
D7.6.2 If the operating condition changes to wet during endurance, the track will be REDFLAGGED
or vehicles will be B LACK FLAGGED and brought into the driver change area.
D7.6.3 If a team wants to change tires, the officials must be informed beforehand.
D7.6.4 Tire changes can be carried out during the driver change or during an extra stop.
D7.6.5 If the tire change is carried out during the driver change, in deviation from D7.5, four team
members may enter the driver change area.
D7.6.6 The allowed tire changes and associated conditions are given in table 10.
D7.6.7 Teams that have incurred a puncture during the endurance event due to external factors (e.g.
debris on track) may change the tire with no time penalty, if the vehicle reaches the driver
change area under its own power without external assistance.
D7.6.8 The wheel will be inspected by the officials. If the deflation was not caused by external
factors, the vehicle will be disqualified.
D7.6.9 Deflation caused by running Off-Course (OC) or impacting barriers or other objects due to
driver error will not be regarded as external factors.
D7.7 Endurance Specific Regulations
D7.7.1 Teams are prohibited from working on or fueling their vehicles during the run.
D7.7.2 Wheel-to-wheel racing is prohibited.
D7 Endurance and Efficiency Event
Existing
Operating
ConditionCurrently
running onCondition
changes to
DryCondition
changes to
DampCondition
changes to
Wet
Dry Dry Tires – A B
Damp Dry Tires – A B
Damp Wet Tires C – –
Wet Wet Tires C C –
Requirement Time Allowed
A may change from dry to wet Note 1
Bmust change from dry to wet Note 1
C may change from wet to dry Note 2
Note 1: Any time in excess of 10 min without driver change, or 13 min with driver change,
is added to the team’s total time for endurance.
Note 2: The time used to change to dry tires is added to the team’s total time for endurance.
Table 10: Endurance event tire change
D7.7.3 If a vehicle stalls out on the track, it is allowed one lap by the vehicle that is following it
(approximately one minute) to restart.
D7.7.4 If a vehicle has a restart problem at the driver change or after a REDFLAG, it is allowed
2 min to restart the engine or to enter R2D. The 2 min start from the time the driver first tries
to restart the engine or to enter R2D. The time is added to the endurance time.
D7.7.5 If restarts are not accomplished within the above times, the vehicle is disqualified for the run.
D7.7.6 If a vehicle breaks down it will be removed from the track and will not be allowed to re-enter
the track.
D7.7.7 Team members may be instructed by the officials to retrieve broken down vehicles. This
recovery may only be carried out under the control of the officials.
D7.8 Endurance Restart Procedure After Red Flag
D7.8.1 When the cause of the REDFLAG has been rectified, all vehicles on the track will be guided
to the driver change area under YELLOW FLAG in order to receive further instructions from
the officials.
D7.8.2 The lap in which the REDFLAG occurred is completely ignored for endurance and efficiency
scoring and repeated after the restart.
D7.9 Endurance Scoring
D7.9.1 Each lap of the endurance event is individually timed. The corrected elapsed time is
determined by subtracting the extra-long lap for the driver change from the total time and
adding any penalty times.
D7 Endurance and Efficiency Event
D7.9.2 Points are given based on the following formula:
ENDURANCE _SCORE =0.9Pmax Tmax
Tteam−1
0.333!
+0.1Pmax
Pmaxis the maximum points for the event according to table 3.
Tteamis the team’s corrected elapsed time. T teamis capped at T max.
Tmaxis 1.333 times of the corrected elapsed time of the fastest vehicle.
D7.10 Efficiency Scoring
D7.10.1 Efficiency is measured during the endurance event.
D7.10.2 Only vehicles which meet all of the following requirements are considered for efficiency
scoring:
- the vehicle received points for the endurance event
-the uncorrected elapsed endurance time does not exceed 1.333 times the uncorrected
elapsed time of the fastest vehicle
-[CV ONLY ]the consumed fuel mass does not exceed 15 kg /100 km 98 RON or
21.75 kg/100km E85
D7.10.3 [CV ONLY ] Fuel pumps must be on and fuel valves must be opened during refueling.
D7.10.4 [CV ONLY ]The measured fuel mass of vehicles using E85 fuel is divided by 1.45 to be
comparable to the vehicles using 98 RON.
D7.10.5 [EV ONLY ]The endurance energy is calculated as the time integrated value of the mea-
sured voltage multiplied by the measured current logged by the data logger, see EV4 .6.
Regenerated energy is multiplied by 0.9 and subtracted from the used energy.
D7.10.6 Efficiency points based on the following formula are given:
EFFICIENCY _SCORE =PmaxEFmax−EFteam
EFmax−EFmin
with
Pmaxis the maximum points for the event according to table 3
EFteam the team’s efficiency factor
EFminthe lowest efficiency factor of all teams which were considered for efficiency
EFmaxis defined as 1 .5·EFmin
D7.10.7 The efficiency factor is calculated based on the following formula:
EF=T2·E
with
Tuncorrected elapsed driving time
E[CV ONLY ] corrected used fuel mass / [EV ONLY ] used energy
D8 [DC ONLY ] Trackdrive Event
D 8 [DC ONLY ] TRACKDRIVE EVENT
D8.1 Trackdrive Tracklayout
D8.1.1 The trackdrive layout is a closed loop circuit built to the following guidelines:
- Straights: No longer than 80 m
- Miscellaneous: Chicanes, multiple turns, decreasing radius turns, hairpin turns, etc.
- The minimum track width is 3 m
- The minimum required turning diameter is 9 m
D8.1.2 The length of one lap is approximately 200 m to 500 m.
D8.2 Trackdrive Running Order
D8.2.1 The running order will be defined by the officials, based on previous dynamic event results.
D8.2.2 The running order will be published according to the competition handbook.
D8.2.3 The procedure for handling the running order is defined in the competition handbook.
D8.3 Trackdrive Procedure
D8.3.1 A run consists of ten laps.
D8.3.2 The vehicle is staged such that the front wheels are 6 min front of the starting line on the
track.
D8.3.3 After ten laps the vehicle must come to a full stop within 30 m behind the finish line on the
track and enter the finish-state described in T14.8.
D8.3.4 There will be no last lap signal i.e. the vehicle should count laps itself.
D8.4 Trackdrive Scoring
D8.4.1 Each lap of the trackdrive event is individually timed. The corrected elapsed time is deter-
mined by adding any penalty times.
D8.4.2 Points are given based on the following formula:
TRACKDRIVE _SCORE =0.75PmaxTmax
Tteam−1
Pmaxis the maximum points for the event according to table 3.
Tteamis the team’s corrected elapsed time. T teamis capped at T max.
Tmaxis 2 times of the corrected elapsed time of the fastest vehicle.
D8.4.3 In deviation of D1.1.9, an additional 2.5 %of the maximum points for the event according
to table 3 are given for every completed lap.
D9 Dynamic Events Penalties
D 9 D YNAMIC EVENTS PENALTIES
D9.1 General Penalties
D9.1.1 Penalties will not be assessed for accident avoidance or other reasons deemed sufficient by
the officials.
D9.1.2 A cone is Down or Out (DOO) if the cone has been knocked over or the entire base of the
cone lies outside the box marked around the cone in its undisturbed position.
D9.1.3 Cones that are DOO are not replaced/reset during autonomous running. There will be no
re-run due to cones in the driving path or disorientation due to missing cones.
D9.1.4 The DOO penalty, see D9.1.7, is added for each DOO including entry and exit gate cones
before the start and after the finish line, that occur on that particular run.
D9.1.5 Off-Course (OC)
-An OC occurs when the vehicle has all four wheels outside the track boundary as
indicated by edge marking.
-Missing one or more gates of a given slalom at autocross or endurance is counted as
one OC per occurrence.
- When an OC occurs, the driver must re-enter the track at the next possible point.
-When re-entering the driver needs to wait for a gap and follow the instructions of the
track marshals.
D9.1.6 An Unsafe Stop (USS) is defined as not stopping within the specified area and/or not entering
the finish-state described in T14.8 within 30 s after stopping during autonomous running.
D9.1.7 Acceleration Skidpad Autocross Endurance Trackdrive
DOO 2 s 0 .2 s 2 s 2 s 2 s
OC DQ DQ 10 s 10 s 10 s
USS DQ DQ DQ n/a −50 points
D9.1.8 Failure to obey a flag: 1 min time penalty.
D9.1.9 Reckless or aggressive driving or “Over Driving”: B LACK FLAG, see D2.1.2.
D9.1.10 Vehicle to vehicle contact: 2 min up to DQ depending on the nature of the incident.
D9.1.11 If a vehicle is not able to start the run, within 30 safter receiving a GREEN FLAG or go-signal,
the vehicle is DQ for that run.
D9.2 Endurance Penalties
D9.2.1 Teams that are running out-of-order as defined in the competition handbook, are penalized
by 2 min and may then run at the discretion of the officials.
D9.2.2 Mechanical Problem: The time taken for mechanical inspection under a BLACK FLAG WITH
ORANGE DOT, see D2.1.3, is considered officials’ time and is not included in the team’s
total time. If the inspection reveals a mechanical integrity problem the vehicle is disqualified.
D9 Dynamic Events Penalties
D9.2.3 If it is impossible to impose a penalty by a stop under a BLACK FLAG, e.g. not enough laps
left, the officials may add an appropriate time penalty to the team’s elapsed time.
D9.2.4 A team may be disqualified if their vehicle is too slow or being driven without proper control.
A vehicle is considered to be too slow if the average speed, based on lap times, for two
consecutive laps is below 8m/sin dry conditions or below 5m/sin wet or damp conditions.
D9.2.5 Any violation to the procedure of driver change, see D7.5.3, will lead to a time penalty of up
to 2 min.
D9.2.6 All rules and penalties from IN12 are also applicable during driver change.
D9.3 [CV ONLY ] Efficiency Penalties
D9.3.1 Should the fuel level change after refueling due to effects such as described in CV2 .7.1, the
difference in fuel level will be measured and twice the amount will be added to the official
fuel consumption figure.
D9.4 [EV ONLY ] Power and Voltage Violation Penalties
D9.4.1 A violation is defined as using more than the maximum power, see EV2 .2, or exceeding
the specified voltage, see EV4 .1.1, after a moving average over 500 ms is applied to the
respective data logger signal, see EV4.6.
D9.4.2 Each violation will result in the team being disqualified for the fastest valid run of the event..
If a violation occurred during two runs, the two fastest valid runs will be disqualified etc. .
D9.4.3 The respective data and the resulting decision of violations may be made public.
D9.4.4 Non-availability of data logger data will be treated as a violation.
